










 







GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1), LLC - Pooled Investment Fund- Bienen  FormDs.com - SEC filings of fundraisings and investments in hedge funds, private equity firms, startups, and growing companies 











 FormDs.com 





 Newest
 Filter
 Local




 









GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1), LLC

      Industry: Pooled Investment Fund
      (See others in industry)

Address:



    900 North Michigan Avenue Suite 1100 
    Chicago, IL, 60611Phone: 312-506-6500 




Filings



Date
FilingType
Reported Sold
Incremental Cash 
Type
Exemptions
Link to Raw Filing




	2013-07-18


Amended


$74,206,707


$8,930,578


Equity Only


06


SEC link




	2012-07-19


Amended


$65,276,129


$13,723,750


Equity Only


06


SEC link




	2011-07-21


Amended


$51,552,379


$49,855,625


Equity Only


06


SEC link




	2010-11-29


New


$1,696,754


$1,696,754


Equity Only


06


SEC link






Directors and Executives (Current and Past)



Name
Role



 Henry S. Bienen 
 Director 


 Alan Brott 
 Director 


 Jodie L. Crotteau 
 Executive 


 Brian P. Gallagher 
 Director 


 John C. Hover Ii 
 Director 


 Victor F. Imbimbo, Jr. 
 Director 


 Scott J. Lederman 
 Director, Executive 


 Stephen V. Murphy 
 Director 


 Victor J. Raskin 
 Director 


 Zachary D. Weber 
 Executive 


 Thomas G. Yellin 
 Director 












Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version

















SEC Info - Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC - ‘N-2’ on 11/18/09 - EX-99.2A










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘N-2’ on 11/18/09 – EX-99.2AOn:  Wednesday, 11/18/09, at 4:13pm ET   ·   Accession #:  950123-9-63922   ·   File #:  811-22352
Previous ‘N-2’:  None   ·   Next:  ‘N-2’ on 6/27/13   ·   Latest:  ‘N-2/A’ on 7/19/16   ·   10 Referenced via Accession #:  By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 7/25/17 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 6/6/17 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – Latest ‘N-2/A’ on 7/19/16 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘N-2’ on 5/31/16 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 7/28/15 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 6/2/15 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 7/29/14 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 6/9/14 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – ‘N-2/A’ on 8/15/13 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), LLC – Next ‘N-2’ on 6/27/13 



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size              Issuer               Agent

11/18/09  Grosvenor Registered Mult..1) LLC N-2                    2:235K                                   RR Donnelley/FAF-->Registration Statement of a Closed-End Investment Company   —   Form N-2Filing Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: N-2         Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1),      71    303K 
                          LLC                                                    
 2: EX-99.2A    Exhibit (A)(1) Certificate of Formation                1      4K 

D-->EX-99.2A   —   Exhibit (A)(1) Certificate of Formation
P-->
                                                                  Exhibit (a)(1)

CERTIFICATE OF FORMATION
OF
GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1), LLC

  FIRST: The name of the limited liability company is Grosvenor Registered
Multi-Strategy Fund (TI 1), LLC.                                                

  SECOND: The address of its registered office in the State of Delaware is
615 South DuPont Highway, County of Kent, City of Dover, State of Delaware,     
19901. The name of its registered agent at such address is National Corporate   
Research, Ltd.                                                                  

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has executed this Certificate of  
Formation this 26th day of October 2009.                                        

GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1), LLC

                     By: /s/ Karen Spiegel
                                            ------------------------------------
                           Name: Karen Spiegel
                                Title: Authorized Person

↑TopFiling Submission 0000950123-09-063922   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Fri, 28 Jul 22:39:59.0 GMT 








Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc -  Management Team, Executives, Board Members - Equilar Atlas 











 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In
















Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc

View Full Profile


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view profiles of Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc management team, executives and board members. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY the most recent Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc executives and board members.
												FOLLOW changes in Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc executives' and board members' employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc executives and board members through your network of contacts.
												







Executives (1)

Formers (4)








															Stay current on Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc executives »
															


 







Zack D. Weber
CFO


View Full Profile









															Stay current on former Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc executives and board members »
															


 







Jodie Crotteau
															
Former VP and CCO


View Full Profile









Stephen W. Misner
															
Former Assistant Treasurer


View Full Profile









Timothy A. Knight
															
Former Assistant Treasurer


View Full Profile









Maria E. Okeke
															
Assistant Treasurer


View Full Profile








 



Search

Search for over 80,000 public and private companies, universities and non-profits in the Equilar Atlas real-time database.





/bio



													Example: Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc
















Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc Connections





															View the complete list »
														




Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Master Fund, LLC
(1 Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc  Executive)
														




GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC
(1 Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc  Executive)
														




Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (W), Llc
(1 Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc  Executive)
														








About Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 1), Llc





Type
Public




Ticker
XXXXX













			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

ï¿½ 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993















GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1), LLC Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1), LLC
                    

•   CHICAGO, IL
                          • Hedge Fund
                          • Mutual Fund
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Grosvenor Registered Multi-strategy Fund (TI 1) is based out of Chicago.    WhaleWisdom has at least 7 insider transactions (Form 3,4,5) in our database for Grosvenor Registered Multi-strategy Fund (TI 1).  The firm last filed a Form D notice of exempt offering of securities on 2013-07-18. The filing was for a pooled investment fund:  other investment fund The notice  included securities offered of Equity,Pooled Investment Fund Interests
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)
Form D 4



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1), LLC, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




grosvenor registered multi-strategy fund (ti 1), llc


900 NORTH MICHIGAN AVENUE

CHICAGO
IL
                                                        
                                                    60611


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      312-506-6500







Recent SEC Filings




POS 8C filed on 07/25/2017
SC TO-I filed on 06/27/2017
4 filed on 06/21/2017
3 filed on 06/21/2017
N-CSR filed on 06/08/2017
POS 8C filed on 06/06/2017
NSAR-B filed on 05/26/2017
SC TO-I/A filed on 05/09/2017
40-17G filed on 04/21/2017
SC TO-I filed on 03/27/2017
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...



Form D Filings

  Form D is a form to be used to file a notice of an exempt offering of securities with the Securities and Exchange Commission.
  Form D contains basic information about the offering and the company.


Form D Filings


Filing Date
Form Type
Industry Group
Securities Offered
Total Offering Amount
Total Amount Sold
Total Remaining




2013-07-18
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Equity,Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
74,206,707
INDEFINITE


2012-07-19
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Equity,Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
65,276,129
INDEFINITE


2011-07-21
D/A
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  OTHER INVESTMENT FUND

      Equity,Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
51,552,379
INDEFINITE


2010-11-29
D
POOLED INVESTMENT FUND:  HEDGE FUND

      Equity,Pooled Investment Fund Interests
    
INDEFINITE
1,696,754
INDEFINITE




Other Issuers in Filings


Name
Address





  No Other Issuers
  




Related Parties included in filings


Name
Address
Relationship




ALAN   BROTT

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



BRIAN P.  GALLAGHER

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



HENRY S.  BIENEN

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



JODIE L.  CROTTEAU

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      



JOHN C.  HOVER II

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



SCOTT J.  LEDERMAN

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      



STEPHEN V.  MURPHY

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



THOMAS G.  YELLIN

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



VICTOR F.  IMBIMBO, JR.

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



VICTOR J.  RASKIN

          subscription required
    


          DIRECTOR
      



ZACHARY D.  WEBER

          subscription required
    


          EXECUTIVE OFFICER
      











Elevate your investments
Try it for free






















SEC Info - Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC - ‘N-2’ on 11/18/09










SEC Info uses JavaScript!  To view pages properly, enable JavaScript in your browser.


    SEC Info      Home      Search      My Interests      Help      Sign In      Please Sign In




Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘N-2’ on 11/18/09On:  Wednesday, 11/18/09, at 4:14pm ET   ·   Accession #:  950123-9-63923   ·   File #:  811-22353
Previous ‘N-2’:  None   ·   Next:  ‘N-2’ on 6/27/13   ·   Latest:  ‘N-2/A’ on 7/19/16   ·   11 Referenced via Accession #:  By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 7/25/17 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 6/8/17 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 6/6/17 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – Latest ‘N-2/A’ on 7/19/16 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘N-2’ on 5/31/16 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 7/28/15 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 6/2/15 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 7/29/14 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘POS 8C’ on 6/9/14 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘N-2/A’ on 8/15/13 By:  Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLC – ‘N-2/A’ on 7/9/13 



  in 
this entire Filing.
an "Entity" Search.
  Show 
Docs searched
 and 
every "hit".
the 1st "hit".

Help... Wildcards:  ? (any letter),  * (many).  Logic:  for Docs:  & (and),  | (or);  for Text:  | (anywhere),  "(&)" (near).    ↓Bottom
 
T-->  As Of                Filer                Filing    For·On·As Docs:Size              Issuer               Agent

11/18/09  Grosvenor Registered Mult..2) LLC N-2                    2:221K                                   RR Donnelley/FAF-->Registration Statement of a Closed-End Investment Company   —   Form N-2Filing Table of Contents
Document/Exhibit                   Description                      Pages   Size 

 1: N-2         Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2),      69    287K 
                          LLC                                                    
 2: EX-99.2A    Exhibit (A)(1) Certificate of Formation                1      4K 

D-->N-2   —   Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (Ti 2), LLCDocument Table of Contents
Page (sequential) | (alphabetic) Top A-->
Alternative Formats (Word, et al.)
Administrator
Arbitrage/Credit Strategies
Brokerage Allocation and Other Practices
Business and Other Connections of Investment Adviser
Capital Stock
Capital Stock, Long-Term Debt, and Other Securities
Certain Securities Futures Contracts
Control Persons and Principal Holders of Securities
Cover Page
Defaults and Arrears on Senior Securities
Equity Strategies
Fee Table
Financial Statements
Financial Statements and Exhibits
General
General Description of the Registrant
General Information and History
Grosvenor's Investment Committee and Operations Committee
Indemnification
Investment Advisory and Other Services
Investment Objectives and Policies
Legal Proceedings
Limitation on Deductibility of Interest and Short Sale Expenses
Location of Accounts and Records
Long-Term Debt
Management
Management Services
Marketing Arrangements
NON-RESIDENT MANAGERS: Not Applicable
Number of Holders of Securities
Opportunistic Strategies
Other Expenses of Issuance and Distribution
Outstanding Securities
Persons Controlled by or Under Common Control
PORTFOLIO MANAGEMENT: Grosvenor maintains an Investment Committee that is responsible for, among other things:
Portfolio Managers
Securities Ratings
Table of Contents
Taxes
Tax Shelter Reporting Requirements
Tax Status
Undertakings
S-->
11st Page   -   Filing Submission
3Item 3. Fee Table
5Item 8. General Description of the Registrant
11Item 9. Management
14Item 9.1(c). PORTFOLIO MANAGEMENT: Grosvenor maintains an Investment Committee that is responsible for, among other things:
15Item 9.1(D). Administrator
16Item 9.2. NON-RESIDENT MANAGERS: Not Applicable
17Item 10. Capital Stock, Long-Term Debt, and Other Securities
"Item 10.1. Capital Stock
"Item 10.2. Long-Term Debt
18Item 10.3. General
"Item 10.4. Taxes
22Item 10.5. Outstanding Securities
"Item 10.6. Securities Ratings
"Item 11. Defaults and Arrears on Senior Securities
"Item 12. Legal Proceedings
24Item 14. Cover Page
"Item 15. Table of Contents
"Item 16. General Information and History
"Item 17. Investment Objectives and Policies
26Grosvenor's Investment Committee and Operations Committee
27Equity Strategies
28Arbitrage/Credit Strategies
31Opportunistic Strategies
44Item 19. Control Persons and Principal Holders of Securities
"Item 20. Investment Advisory and Other Services
45Item 21. Portfolio Managers
58Item 22. Brokerage Allocation and Other Practices
"Item 23. Tax Status
60Certain Securities Futures Contracts
61Limitation on Deductibility of Interest and Short Sale Expenses
63Tax Shelter Reporting Requirements
64Item 24. Financial Statements
65Item 25. Financial Statements and Exhibits
66Item 26. Marketing Arrangements
"Item 27. Other Expenses of Issuance and Distribution
"Item 28. Persons Controlled by or Under Common Control
"Item 29. Number of Holders of Securities
"Item 30. Indemnification
"Item 31. Business and Other Connections of Investment Adviser
67Item 32. Location of Accounts and Records
"Item 33. Management Services
"Item 34. Undertakings
P-->N-21st Page of 69TOC↑TopPreviousNext↓BottomJust 1st 
 As filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on November 18, 2009

                                       Investment Company Act File No. 811-22353
 U.S. SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549

----------

FORM N-2
(CHECK APPROPRIATE BOX OR BOXES)
[X]  REGISTRATION STATEMENT UNDER THE INVESTMENT COMPANY ACT OF 1940            

[ ]  Amendment No. ___                                                          

----------

GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC
(Exact name of Registrant as specified in Charter)

One Financial Center
Boston, MA 02111
(Address of principal executive offices)

Registrant's Telephone Number, including Area Code: (617) 772-3672

----------

 Michelle Rhee, Esq.
 c/o Banc of America Investment Advisors, Inc.
One Financial Center
Boston, MA 02111
 (Name and address of agent for service)

COPY TO:
 Kenneth S. Gerstein, Esq.
Schulte Roth & Zabel LLP
919 Third Avenue
New York, NY 10022
EXPLANATORY NOTE

This Registration Statement of Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (TI 2), 
LLC (the "Registrant" or the "Fund") has been filed by Registrant pursuant to   
Section 8(b) of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended (the "1940 Act").
However, limited liability company interests in the Registrant ("Interests") are
not being registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the          
"Securities Act"), since such Interests will be issued solely in private        
placement transactions that do not involve any "public offering" within the     
meaning of Section 4(2) of, and/or Regulation D under, the Securities Act.      

P-->N-22nd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 2nd
Investments in the Registrant may only be made by individuals or entities       
meeting the definition of an "accredited investor" in Regulation D under the    
Securities Act and a "qualified client" within the meaning of Rule 205-3 under  
the Investment Advisers Act of 1940, as amended (the "Advisers Act"). This      
Registration Statement does not constitute an offer to sell, or the solicitation
of an offer to buy, any Interest in the Registrant.                             

 2

P-->N-23rd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 3rd
CONTENTS OF REGISTRATION STATEMENT

This Registration Statement contains the following documents:                   

Facing Sheet                                                          

Explanatory Note                                                      

Contents of Registration Statement                                    

Part A                                                                

Part B                                                                

Part C                                                                

Signature Page                                                        

Exhibits                                                              

PART A

 Responses to Items 1, 2, 3.2, 4, 5, 6 and 7 of Part A have been omitted
pursuant to Paragraph 3 of Instruction G of the General Instructions to Form    
N-2.                                                                            

ITEM 3. FEE TABLE. 

This table describes the fees and expenses of the Fund and the Master Fund (as  
defined below) that you will pay if you buy and hold Interests. Based on        
estimates of expenses for the fiscal year ending March 31, 2010.                

                                                                [Download Table]
                                                                                 
Investor Transaction Expenses                                                    
   Maximum Sales Load (as percentage of offering price) (1)                 2.50%

Annual Expenses (as a percentage of net assets attributable to Interests):       
   Management Fee (2)                                                       1.50%
   Other Expenses (3)                                                       0.84%
   Acquired Fund (Investment Funds) Fees and Expenses (4)                   5.39%
Total Annual Expenses (5)                                                   7.73%

----------                                                                      
(1)  In connection with initial and additional purchases of Interests, investors
may be charged a placement fee (sales load) (the "Placement Fee") by  
    Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated (the "Placement Agent")
 of up to 2.50% of the investment amount. No Placement Fee is charged to
certain types of investors.                                           

(2)  Includes the investment advisory fee (the "Advisory Fee") of Grosvenor     
  Registered Multi-Strategy Master Fund, LLC, a Delaware limited liability
     company that is also registered under the 1940 Act (the "Master Fund"), and
     the management fee (the "Management Fee") of the Fund, both paid to Banc of

 A-1

P-->N-24th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 4th
 America Investment Advisors, Inc., the Master Fund's investment adviser
     ("BAIA" or the "Adviser"). The Advisory Fee is a monthly fee payable at the
annual rate of 1.0% of the average net assets of the Master Fund. The 
    Management Fee is a monthly fee payable at the annual rate of 0.50% of the
average net assets of the Fund.                                       

(3)  Includes direct expenses of the Fund (other than the Management Fee),      
     including a servicing fee (the "Servicing Fee") paid by the Fund to Merrill
   Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith, Incorporated (the "Servicing Agent") which
     provides certain investor and account maintenance services to the Fund. The
   Servicing Fee is a monthly fee of 0.02083% (0.25% on an annualized basis)
  of the average net assets of the Fund. Also includes the Fund's pro rata
share of the Master Fund's ordinary operating expenses (other than the
 Advisory Fee) that are expected to be borne by the Fund for the current
fiscal year.                                                          

(4)  Includes the fees and expenses of the private investment funds ("Investment
Funds") in which the Master Fund intends to invest, based upon the    
anticipated net proceeds from this offering. Fees and expenses of     
     Investment Funds are based on historic fees and expenses. Future Investment
  Funds' fees and expenses may be higher or lower because certain fees are
    based on the performance of the Investment Funds, which may fluctuate over
    time. The amount of the Fund's average net assets used in calculating this
  percentage was based on anticipated net proceeds of $80 million from the
initial offering of Interests.                                        

(5)  The Fund is subject to an expense limitation and reimbursement agreement   
    (the "Expense Limitation Agreement") with the Adviser capping the ordinary
    operating expenses of the Fund (including the Fund's share of the ordinary
    operating expenses of the Master Fund, but excluding any fees and expenses
   of the Investment Funds) at 2.34% per annum of the Fund's average monthly
  net assets (the "Expense Limitation"). In consideration of the Adviser's
 agreement to limit the Fund's expenses, the Fund will carry forward the
     amount of expenses paid or absorbed by the Adviser in excess of the Expense
Limitation, for a period not to exceed three years from the end of the
fiscal year in which the expense was incurred, and will reimburse the 
   Adviser such amounts. Reimbursement will be made as promptly as possible,
but only to the extent it does not cause the Fund's ordinary operating
 expenses for any year to exceed the Expense Limitation in effect at the
time that the expense was paid or absorbed. The Expense Limitation    
    Agreement will remain in effect through March 31, 2011 and may continue in
   effect thereafter for an additional period or periods as may be agreed to
by the Fund and the Adviser.                                          

Under the current fee structure of the Columbia Fund, a member of the Columbia  
Fund with a positive loss carryforward (which tracks the difference between net 
losses and net profits allocated to a member) does not bear the Columbia Fund's 
10% incentive allocation to the Adviser and to Grosvenor Capital Management.    
L.P., until such time as the loss carryforward is zero. To preserve the loss    
carryforward benefit to members of the Columbia Fund who become Members of the  
Fund, it is contemplated that a Member with a positive loss carryforward will   
not pay the Management Fee until that Member's loss carryforward has been       
reduced to zero.                                                                

The purpose of the table above and the example below is to assist an  
investor in understanding the various costs and expenses that an investor in the
Fund will bear directly or indirectly.                                          

                                                                [Download Table]

                       Example                    1 Year  3 Years  5 Years  10 Years
------------------------------------------------  ------  -------  -------  --------
                                                                                    
You would pay the following expenses on a $1,000                                    
   investment in the Fund, assuming a 5% annual                                     
   return:                                         $99     $242     $377     $683   

   The example above is based on the expenses set forth above and should not
be considered a representation of future expenses. Actual expenses may be higher
or lower than those shown and the actual rate of return may be greater or less  
than the hypothetical 5% return assumed in the examples.                        

 A-2

P-->N-25th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 5th
The Adviser and Subadviser generally bears all of their own expenses  
incurred in services to the Master Fund and the Fund, except that the Master    
Fund reimburses the Subadviser up to $25,000 per year for certain out-of-pocket 
costs and expenses incurred in connection with the operation of the Master Fund.
The Master Fund does not pay any of the Subadviser's allocable overhead.        

    The Fund bears its own expenses, and, indirectly through its investment in
the Master Fund, a PRO RATA portion of the Master Fund's fees and expenses not  
otherwise borne by the Adviser, including, but not limited to: all              
investment-related expenses (including, but not limited to, fees paid directly  
or indirectly to the select group of alternative asset managers who manage the  
Investment Funds (the "Investment Managers"), all costs and expenses directly   
related to portfolio transactions and positions for the Master Fund's account   
such as direct and indirect expenses associated with the Master Fund's          
investments, including its investments in Investment Funds, transfer taxes and  
premiums, taxes withheld on foreign dividends; any non-investment related       
interest expense; fees and disbursements of any attorneys and accountants       
engaged on behalf of the Fund; audit and tax preparation fees and expenses;     
administrative expenses and fees; custody and escrow fees and expenses; the     
costs of an errors and omissions/directors and officers liability insurance     
policy and a fidelity bond; the Advisory Fee and the Management Fee payable to  
the Adviser; the Servicing Fee payable to the Servicing Agent; fees and         
travel-related expenses of the board of directors of the Master Fund who are not
employees of the Adviser or any affiliate of the Adviser; all costs and charges 
for equipment or services used in communicating information regarding the Fund's
transactions among the Adviser and any custodian or other agent engaged by the  
Fund; any extraordinary expenses; and such other expenses as may be approved    
from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Fund (the "Board").          

     The Adviser and the Fund have entered into an Expense Limitation Agreement.
Under the terms of the Expense Limitation Agreement, the Adviser will pay or    
absorb (subject to the reimbursement described below) the ordinary operating    
expenses of the Fund to the extent necessary to limit the ordinary operating    
expenses of the Fund to 2.34% per annum of the Fund's average monthly net       
assets. In consideration of the Adviser's agreement to limit the Fund's         
expenses, the Fund will carry forward the amount of expenses paid or absorbed by
the Adviser in excess of the Expense Limitation, for a period not to exceed     
three years from the end of the fiscal year in which the expense was incurred,  
and will reimburse the Adviser such amounts. Reimbursement will be made as      
promptly as possible, but only to the extent it does not cause the Fund's       
ordinary operating expenses for any year to exceed the Expense Limitation in    
effect at the time that the expense was paid or absorbed. The Expense Limitation
Agreement will remain in effect through March 31, 2011 and may continue in      
effect thereafter for an additional period or periods as may be agreed to by the
Fund and the Adviser.                                                           

The Investment Funds bear various expenses in connection with their   
operations. These expenses are similar to those incurred by the Fund and the    
Master Fund. The Investment Managers generally charge asset-based management    
fees to and receive performance-based allocations from the Investment Funds,    
which effectively will reduce the investment returns of the Investment Funds.   
These expenses, fees and allocations will be in addition to those incurred by   
the Fund and the Master Fund. As an investor in Investment Funds, the Master    
Fund will bear its PRO RATA share of the expenses and fees of the Investment    
Funds and will also be subject to performance allocations to the Investment     
Managers. The Fund will pay a PRO RATA of its share of these expenses and fees  
by virtue of investment in the Master Fund.                                     

ITEM 8. GENERAL DESCRIPTION OF THE REGISTRANT. 

  The Fund is a closed-end, diversified management investment company that
was organized as a limited liability company under the laws of the State of     
Delaware on October 26, 2009. The Master Fund is a closed-end, diversified      
management investment company that was organized as a limited liability         

 A-3

P-->N-26th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 6th
company under the laws of the State of Delaware on July 12, 2002. Interests in  
the Fund are being issued solely in private placement transactions that do not  
involve any "public offering" within the meaning of Section 4(2) of, and/or     
Regulation D under, the Securities Act. Investments in the Fund may be made only
by "accredited investors," as defined in Regulation D under the Securities Act, 
that have a net worth at the time of subscription of more than $1.5 million (or 
such greater amount as may be required by applicable law or by the Board of     
Directors, in its sole discretion) and persons who have at least $750,000 under 
the Adviser's or its affiliates' management, including any amount invested in   
the Fund. The relevant investor qualifications for initial and subsequent       
subscriptions by investors will be set forth in a subscription agreement that   
must be completed by each prospective investor. This Registration Statement does
not constitute an offer to sell, or the solicitation of an offer to buy, any    
"security" within the meaning of the Securities Act.                            

    Banc of America Investment Advisors, Inc. ("BAIA" or the "Adviser") is the
Master Fund's investment adviser. The Adviser has retained Grosvenor Capital    
Management, L.P., an Illinois limited partnership ("Grosvenor" or the           
"Subadviser"), as the subadviser of the Master Fund.                            

INVESTMENT OBJECTIVES AND PRACTICES                                   

  The Fund's primary investment objectives are to provide investors (i) an
attractive, long-term rate of return, on an absolute as well as a risk-adjusted 
basis, (ii) low performance volatility and (iii) minimal correlation with the   
equity and fixed income markets. In pursuing its investment objectives, the Fund
will invest substantially all of its assets in Grosvenor Registered             
Multi-Strategy Master Fund, LLC (the "Master Fund"), a Delaware limited         
liability company that is also registered under the 1940 Act. The Master Fund   
has the same investment objectives and substantially the same investment        
policies as those of the Fund. This form of investment structure is commonly    
known as a "master/feeder fund" arrangement. The Adviser serves as investment   
adviser of the Master Fund and as manager to the Fund.                          

     The Master Fund employs a multi-strategy, multi-manager investment strategy
premised on the risk control benefits of diversification and the value of a     
hedged investment approach. The Master Fund seeks diversification by investing  
in Investment Funds that (i) pursue non-traditional investment strategies and   
(ii) are expected to exhibit a low degree of performance correlation, not only  
with broad market indices but also with each other. These Investment Funds are  
managed by selected Investment Managers who specialize in the chosen strategies.
The Master Fund generally invests in between 25 and 50 Investment Funds.        

Investment Managers are selected by Grosvenor on the basis of various 
criteria, as described below under Item 17 - Investment Objectives and Policies.
Investment Managers selected by Grosvenor generally conduct their investment    
programs through Investment Funds. Generally, Investment Funds are private      
investment funds that have investors other than the Master Fund. The Master Fund
currently intends to invest its assets primarily in Investment Funds.           

     The Investment Managers utilized by the Master Fund may invest and trade in
a wide range of instruments and markets and may pursue various investment       
strategies. The Investment Managers may use various investment techniques for   
hedging and non-hedging purposes. For example, an Investment Manager may sell   
securities short and purchase and sell options and futures contracts and engage 
in other derivative transactions. The use of these techniques may be an integral
part of an Investment Manager's investment program, and involve certain risks.  
The Investment Managers may use leverage, which also entails risk. The          
Investment Funds in which the Master Fund invests are not subject to the        
investment restrictions of the Fund or the Master Fund and, unless registered   
under the 1940 Act, are not subject to any of the investment limitations imposed
by the 1940 Act.                                                                

 A-4

P-->N-27th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 7th
The investment objectives of the Fund are not fundamental and may be  
changed by the Board without a vote of a majority of the Fund's outstanding     
voting securities.                                                              

FUNDAMENTAL INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS:                                  

 The Fund has adopted certain fundamental investment restrictions, which
cannot be changed without the vote of a majority of the Fund's outstanding      
voting securities (as defined by the 1940 Act). The Fund's fundamental          
investment restrictions are as follows:                                         

       (1)  The Fund will not invest 25% or more of the value of its total
              assets in the securities (other than U.S. Government Securities)
             of issuers engaged in any single industry except that: the Fund
             may pursue its investment objectives by investing substantially
         all of its assets in the Master Fund (or another investment
               company that has the same investment objectives and substantially
            the same investment policies as the Fund); and the Fund (if it
               invests directly in Investment Funds rather than investing in the
            Master Fund) and the Master Fund may invest 25% or more of the
           value of their total assets in Investment Funds except during
               temporary adverse market conditions affecting Investment Funds in
          which they may invest, but may not invest 25% or more of the
           value of their total assets in Investment Funds that focus on
              investing in any single industry or group of related industries.

          (2)  With respect to 75% of its total assets, the Fund will not invest
             more than 5% of the value of its total assets in the securities
            of any one issuer or purchase more than 10% of the outstanding
               voting securities of any one issuer, except that such limitations
          do not apply to U.S. Government securities and securities of
other investment companies.                       

      (3)  The Fund will not issue senior securities representing stock,
           except that, to the extent permitted by the 1940 Act, (a) the
             Fund may borrow money from banks, brokers and other lenders, to
             finance portfolio transactions and engage in other transactions
       involving the issuance by the Fund of "senior securities"
               representing indebtedness, and (b) the Fund may borrow money from
             banks for temporary or emergency purposes or in connection with
repurchases of, or tenders for, Interests.        

         (4)  The Fund will not underwrite securities of other issuers, except
        insofar as the Fund may be deemed an underwriter under the
      Securities Act in connection with the disposition of its
portfolio securities.                             

     (5)  The Fund will not make loans of money or securities to other
         persons, except through purchasing fixed-income securities,
      lending portfolio securities or entering into repurchase
          agreements in a manner consistent with the Fund's investment
policies.                                         

    (6)  The Fund will not purchase or sell commodities or commodity
               contracts, except that it may purchase and sell foreign currency,
             options, futures and forward contracts, including those related
             to indexes, and options on indices, and may invest in commodity
             pools and other entities that purchase and sell commodities and
commodity contracts.                              

 A-5

P-->N-28th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 8th
        (7)  The Fund will not purchase, hold or deal in real estate, except
              that it may invest in securities that are secured by real estate
         or that are issued by companies that invest or deal in real
estate.                                           

     While it is in the current master/feeder structure, with respect to its own
investment restrictions, the Fund will "look through" to the Master Fund's      
investments.                                                                    

 The Master Fund adheres to fundamental investment restrictions that are
substantially the same as those of the Fund. These investment restrictions may  
not be changed by the Master Fund without the vote of a majority of the         
outstanding voting securities of the Master Fund. The investment restrictions   
and other policies described herein do not apply to Investment Funds. If a      
percentage restriction is adhered to at the time of an investment or            
transaction, a later change in percentage resulting from a change in the values 
of investments or the value of the Fund's or the Master Fund's total assets,    
unless otherwise stated, will not constitute a violation of such restriction or 
policy.                                                                         

RISK FACTORS:                                                         

     The Fund's investment program is speculative and entails substantial risks.
There can be no assurance that the Fund's investment objectives will be         
achieved. The Fund's performance depends upon the performance of the Master     
Fund, which, in turn, will depend on the performance of the Investment Managers 
with which the Master Fund invests, and Grosvenor's ability to select, allocate 
and reallocate effectively the Master Fund's assets among them. Each Investment 
Manager's use of leverage, short sales and derivative transactions, in certain  
circumstances, can result in significant losses. The value of an investment in  
the Fund will fluctuate with changes in the values of the Master Fund's         
investments.                                                                    

An investment in the Fund involves the following general risks:       

   -    Investing in the Fund can result in loss of invested capital. Use of
   leverage, short sales and derivative transactions by Investment
      Managers can result in significant losses to the Master Fund, and,
indirectly, to the Fund.                                    

-    The Master Fund invests in Investment Funds that may not have    
          diversified investment portfolios, thereby increasing investment risk.

     -    There are special tax risks associated with an investment in the Fund.
(SEE Item 10.4 and Item 23).                                

  -    Interests are not traded on any securities exchange or other market
      and are subject to substantial restrictions on transfer. Liquidity
    will be provided to members of the Fund ("Members") only through
     repurchase offers made from time to time by the Fund. There is no
   assurance that a Member tendering an Interest for repurchase in
      connection with a repurchase offer made by the Fund will have that
Interest repurchased in that repurchase offer.              

-    An investor who meets the conditions imposed by the Investment   
         Managers, including minimum initial investment requirements that may,
     in many cases, be substantially higher than $50,000, could invest
          directly in Investment Funds or with Investment Managers. By investing
         in Investment Funds indirectly through the Fund, a Member bears a PRO
          RATA portion of the asset-based fees and other expenses of the Fund, a
       PRO RATA portion of the asset-based fees and expenses of the Master
Fund and also indirectly bears a PRO RATA                   

 A-6

P-->N-29th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 9th
      portion of the asset-based fees, performance-based allocations and
        other expenses borne by the Master Fund as an investor in Investment
Funds.                                                      

     -    The fees and other expenses borne directly and indirectly by the Fund,
 including those of the Master Fund and the fees, expenses and
         performance-based allocations that are borne by the Master Fund as an
       investor in Investment Funds may be higher than those of most other
registered investment companies.                            

Investing in Investment Funds involves special risks, including the   
following:                                                                      

        -    Investment Funds generally will not be registered as investment
             companies under the 1940 Act. Therefore, the Master Fund, as an
            investor in Investment Funds, will not have the benefit of the
             protections afforded by the 1940 Act to investors in registered
investment companies, such as mutual funds.       

-    An Investment Fund may, in some cases, concentrate its 
              investments in a single industry or group of related industries.
         This increases the sensitivity of its investment returns to
              economic factors affecting that industry or group of industries.
        However, the Master Fund will adhere to its own investment
          restrictions with respect to concentration when investing in
Investment Funds.                                 

        -    The Adviser and/or Grosvenor receives detailed information from
              each Investment Manager regarding its investment performance and
               investment strategy. The Adviser and/or Grosvenor may have little
            or no means of independently verifying information provided by
        Investment Managers and thus, may not be able to ascertain
         whether Investment Managers are adhering to their disclosed
            investment strategies and their investment and risk management
            policies. An Investment Manager may use proprietary investment
           strategies that are not fully disclosed to the Adviser and/or
            Grosvenor, which may involve risks that are not anticipated by
the Adviser and/or Grosvenor.                     

          -    The board of directors of the Master Fund has approved procedures
             pursuant to which the Master Fund will value its investments in
      Investment Funds at fair value. In accordance with these
            procedures, fair value of these investments ordinarily will be
            the value determined as of the end of the fiscal period by the
               Investment Manager of each Investment Fund in accordance with the
         Investment Fund's valuation policies and as reported by the
     Investment Manager. The Master Fund relies primarily on
        information provided by Investment Managers in valuing its
              investments in Investment Funds. There is a risk that inaccurate
               valuations provided by Investment Managers could adversely affect
             the value of Interests and the amounts Members receive upon the
           repurchase of Interests. Because Investment Funds provide net
             asset value information on a monthly basis, and may not provide
             detailed information on their investment positions except on an
         annual basis, the Master Fund generally will not be able to
             determine the fair value of its investments in Investment Funds
               or its net asset value other than as of the end of each month and
          may not be able to verify valuation information given to the
Master Fund by Investment Managers.               

          -    Investment Managers typically charge asset-based management fees,
          and typically also are entitled to receive performance-based
               allocations. The Master Fund, as an investor in Investment Funds,
will be subject to these fees and                 

 A-7

P-->N-210th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 10th
          allocations, which will reduce the investment returns of the
     Fund. These fees and allocations are in addition to the
              Management Fee the Fund pays to the Adviser and the advisory fee
the Master Fund pays to the Adviser.              

     -    The performance-based allocations to Investment Managers may
             create an incentive for Investment Managers to make investments
             that are riskier or more speculative than those that might have
           been made in the absence of performance-based allocations. In
           addition, because a performance-based allocation is generally
               calculated on a basis that includes unrealized appreciation of an
             Investment Fund's assets, the allocation may be greater than if
it were based solely on realized gains.           

   -    Each Investment Manager will receive any performance-based
      allocations to which it is entitled, irrespective of the
              performance of the other Investment Managers and the Master Fund
         generally. Accordingly, an Investment Manager with positive
             performance may receive performance-based compensation from the
            Master Fund, which is borne indirectly by Members, even if the
Master Fund's overall returns are negative.       

         -    Investment decisions for Investment Funds are made by Investment
       Managers independently of each other. As a result, at any
              particular time, one Investment Fund may be purchasing shares of
               an issuer whose shares are being sold by another Investment Fund.
          Consequently, the Master Fund could incur indirectly certain
        transaction costs without accomplishing any net investment
result.                                           

        -    The Master Fund expects to purchase non-voting securities of an
           Investment Fund or waive some or all of its right to vote its
           securities with respect to Investment Funds. Consequently, it
              will not be able to vote on matters that require the approval of
          the investors in the Investment Fund, including matters that
        could adversely affect the Master Fund's investment in the
Investment Fund.                                  

     -    The Master Fund may make additional investments in or effect
         withdrawals from Investment Funds only at certain specified
               times. The Master Fund may not be able to withdraw its investment
               in an Investment Fund promptly after it has made a decision to do
            so, which may result in a loss and adversely affect the Fund's
investment return.                                

      -    Investment Funds may be permitted to distribute securities in
              kind to investors making withdrawals of capital. Upon the Master
         Fund's withdrawal of all or a portion of its interest in an
              Investment Fund, the Master Fund may receive securities that are
        illiquid or difficult to value. In such circumstances, the
         Adviser would determine whether to attempt to liquidate the
               security, hold it in the Master Fund's portfolio or distribute it
            to investors in the Master Fund. In the event the Fund were to
       receive such securities from the Master Fund, it would be
               required to dispose of such securities immediately either through
          liquidation or by distributing such securities to Members in
             connection with a repurchase by the Fund of all or a portion of
Interests in the Fund of Members.                 

Investing in a master/feeder fund arrangement involves certain risks, 
including the following:                                                        

 A-8

P-->N-211th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 11th
       -    The Fund pursues its investment objectives by investing in the
           Master Fund. The Fund does not have the right to withdraw its
               investment in the Master Fund. Instead, it may only do so through
             periodic repurchases by the Master Fund of the Fund's interests
           in the Master Fund. This may limit the ability of the Fund to
            make offers to repurchase Interests. In addition, the Fund may
              receive securities and other investments from the Master Fund in
              lieu of cash when it withdraws capital from the Master Fund. The
             Fund will incur expenses in liquidating investments received in
connection with any in-kind distributions.        

        -    A change in the investment objectives, policies or restrictions
              of the Master Fund may cause the Fund to withdraw its investment
              in the Master Fund. Alternatively, the Fund could seek to change
               its investment objectives, policies or restrictions to conform to
              those of the Master Fund. The investment objectives and policies
               of the Master Fund are not fundamental and may be changed without
         the approval of investors in the Master Fund (including the
Fund).                                            

         -    Interests in the Master Fund also may be held by investors other
         than the Fund. These investors may include other investment
            funds, including investment companies that, like the Fund, are
      registered under the 1940 Act, and other types of pooled
            investment vehicles. When investors in the Master Fund vote on
              matters affecting the Master Fund, the Fund could be outvoted by
        other investors. The Fund also may be indirectly adversely
       affected otherwise by other investors in the Master Fund.

-    Other investors in the Master Fund may offer shares (or
               interests) to their respective investors, if any, that have costs
        and expenses that differ from those of the Fund. Thus, the
            investment returns for investors in other funds that invest in
      the Master Fund may differ from the investment return of
investors in the Fund.                            

ITEM 9. MANAGEMENT 

Item 9.1(a)   BOARD OF DIRECTORS: The Board of Directors of the Fund has overall
    responsibility for the management and supervision of the
              operations of the Fund, pursuant to the Delaware Limited Liability
      Company Act, and approved the Fund's investment program on
        [_______], 2009. It exercises the same powers, authority and
             responsibility on behalf of the Fund as are customarily exercised
        by the board of directors of a registered investment company
      organized as a corporation, and has complete and exclusive
        authority to oversee and to establish policies regarding the
     management, conduct and operation of the Fund's business.

              The Master Fund also has a board of directors that is comprised of
            the same persons who comprise the Board. The Master Fund's board
          of directors has overall responsibility for the management and
supervision of the operations of the Master Fund.   

Item 9.1(b)   INVESTMENT ADVISER: The Adviser, Banc of America Investment       
          Advisors, Inc., serves as the investment adviser of the Master
    Fund. The Adviser is an indirect wholly-owned investment
          management subsidiary of Bank of America Corporation ("Bank of
          America") and is registered as an investment adviser under the
           Advisers Act. The principal office of the Adviser is located at
              100 Federal Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02110, and its telephone
number is 866-921-7951.                             

 A-9

P-->N-212th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 12th
        The Adviser is part of Global Wealth & Investment Management
            ("GWIM"), a division of Bank of America which provides qualified
           clients with a range of alternative asset products. GWIM is the
         wealth and investment management division of Bank of America,
            which serves, among others, affluent, wealthy, ultra wealthy and
          institutional clients. As of September 30, 2009, GWIM entities
        managed total client assets of $739.8 billion, which include
assets under discretionary management and certain   
non-discretionary wrap assets.                      

    Bank of America, a Delaware corporation headquartered in
      Charlotte, North Carolina, is a bank holding company and a
       financial holding company and is one of the world's largest
           financial institutions, serving individual consumers, small and
             middle market businesses and large corporations with a full range
           of banking, investing, asset management and other financial and
           risk-management products and services. Bank of America services
          more than 59 million consumer and small business relationships
       with more than 6,100 retail banking offices and more than 4
            million small business owners through a suite of online products
     and services. The company serves clients in more than 150
       countries and has relationships with 99 percent of the U.S.
           Fortune 500 companies and 83 percent of the Fortune Global 500.
            Bank of America stock is a component of the Dow Jones Industrial
  Average and is listed on the New York Stock Exchanges.

             Pursuant to an investment advisory agreement with the Master Fund
      (the "Advisory Agreement"), the Adviser is responsible for
      providing all portfolio management and investment-advisory
         services for the Master Fund. As noted below, the Adviser has
      delegated certain of its responsibilities to Grosvenor, as
           permitted by the Advisory Agreement. The Adviser is authorized,
           subject to the approval of the Master Fund's board of directors
             and members, to retain one or more other organizations, including
             its affiliates, to provide any or all of the services required to
         be provided by the Adviser to the Master Fund or to assist in
       providing these services. In consideration for the services
           provided under the Advisory Agreement, the Master Fund pays the
           Adviser the Advisory Fee, a monthly fee of 0.0833% (1.00% on an
             annualized basis) of the net assets of the Master Fund determined
           as of the last business day of the previous month (prior to any
        withdrawal or distribution of capital during the month). The
Advisory Fee is payable monthly in arrears.         

         The Adviser has entered into an agreement with Grosvenor (the
            "Subadvisory Agreement") to manage the investments of the Master
           Fund on a day-to-day basis, subject to the general oversight of
    the Adviser and the Board. Since 1971, Grosvenor and its
  predecessors have specialized in creating and managing
            multi-manager investment portfolios utilizing non-traditional or
            "alternative" investment strategies. A pioneer of the hedge fund
             of funds investment approach, Grosvenor is one of the largest and
            most established firms in its industry, with approximately $21.9
            billion in total assets under management and over 225 employees,
           including over 36 investment professionals, as of September 30,
2009.                                               

              Grosvenor is registered with the SEC as an investment adviser. The
          Subadviser does not manage any registered investment companies
             other than the Master Fund. The Subadviser's sole general partner
           is GCM, L.L.C., a Delaware limited liability company. Grosvenor
   Holdings, L.L.C., an Illinois limited liability company
          ("Grosvenor Holdings"), is the sole member and manager of GCM,
              L.L.C. and, in that capacity, is responsible for the management of
              the day-to-day business and affairs of GCM, L.L.C. GCM, L.L.C., in
          turn, in its capacity as general partner of the Subadviser, is
         responsible for the management of the day-to-day business and
             affairs of the Subadviser. Grosvenor Capital Management Holdings,
   LLLP, an Illinois limited liability limited partnership
("GCMHLLLP"), is the                                

A-10

P-->N-213th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 13th
         Subadviser's sole limited partner. GCMH GP, LLC ("GCMHGP"), a
              Delaware limited liability company, is the sole general partner of
              GCMHLLLP, and Grosvenor Holdings is the sole member and manager of
            GCMHGP. The limited partners of GCMHLLLP are Grosvenor Holdings,
           which owns the majority of the limited partnership interests in
          GCMHLLLP, and three entities under the management of Hellman &
    Friedman LLC, a private equity investment firm (the "H&F
     Partners"). The H&F Partners are passive investors in the
     Subadviser through GCMHLLLP and do not play a role in the
day-to-day management of the Subadviser.            

              The Subadvisory Agreement entitles the Subadviser to a subadvisory
          fee at an annual rate of 0.75% of the net assets of the Master
              Fund. The Adviser pays the Subadviser's fee monthly in arrears out
          of the Advisory Fee that it receives from the Master Fund. The
             Adviser has delegated to the Subadviser day-to-day responsibility
              for managing all of the Master Fund's assets, but has the right to
     allocate less than all of the Master Fund's assets to the
              Subadviser for management. Investors in the Master Fund and in the
      Fund will be notified if at any time the Adviser elects to
exercise this right.                                

           The Adviser also provides various management and administrative
            services to the Fund pursuant to a management agreement with the
      Fund (the "Management Agreement"). These services include:
          providing office space and other support services to the Fund;
             maintaining and preserving certain records of the Fund; preparing
           and filing various materials with state and federal regulators;
      supervising services provided by the Fund's administrator,
             transfer agent and custodian; reviewing and arranging for payment
              of the Fund's expenses; reviewing subscription documents submitted
            by prospective investors; preparing communications and quarterly
             reports to Members; and coordinating the preparation of materials
          relating to meetings of the Board of Directors and meetings of
        Members. Under the Management Agreement, the Adviser also is
            responsible for the investment of the cash reserves of the Fund.
             In consideration for these services provided under the Management
              Agreement, the Fund pays the Adviser the Management Fee, a monthly
              fee of 0.04166% (0.50% on an annualized basis ) of the average net
            assets of the Fund determined as of the last business day of the
              previous month (prior to any withdrawal or distribution of capital
       during the month). The Management Fee is payable monthly in
           arrears. Under the current fee structure of Columbia Management
             Multi-Strategy Hedge Fund, LLC (the "Columbia Fund"), a member of
             the Columbia Fund with a positive loss carryforward (which tracks
            the difference between net losses and net profits allocated to a
              member) does not bear the Columbia Fund's 10% incentive allocation
           to the Adviser and to Grosvenor Capital Management. L.P., until
            such time as the loss carryforward is zero. To preserve the loss
           carryforward benefit to members of the Columbia Fund who become
        Members of the Fund, it is contemplated that a Member with a
            positive loss carryforward will not pay the Management Fee until
     that Member's loss carryforward has been reduced to zero.

         The Fund has also entered into a servicing agreement with the
        Servicing Agent to provide (or arrange for the provision of)
           ongoing Member and account maintenance services (the "Servicing
        Agreement"). These services include, but are not limited to,
          handling Member inquiries regarding the Fund; assisting in the
       enhancement of communications between Members and the Fund;
            notifying the Fund of any changes to Member information, such as
        changes of address; and providing such other information and
  Member services as the Fund may reasonably request. As
     consideration for these services, the Fund pays a monthly
         Servicing Fee to the Servicing Agent at an annualized rate of
            0.25% of the average net assets of the Fund determined as of the
last business day of the previous month (prior to   

A-11

P-->N-214th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 14th
        any withdrawal or distribution of capital during the month).

             A discussion regarding the basis for the approval by the board of
             directors of the Master Fund of the investment advisory agreement
              between the Adviser and the Master Fund is available in the Master
            Fund's annual report to its members, for the annual period ended
March 31, 2007.                                     

Item 9.1(c)   PORTFOLIO MANAGEMENT: Grosvenor maintains an Investment Committee 
that is responsible for, among other things:        

      -    establishing internal portfolio management guidelines
                   ("Investment Guidelines") for each investment fund or account
      that is managed or advised by Grosvenor (each, a
                   "Grosvenor-Managed Account"). In the case of the Master Fund,
                these Investment Guidelines are subject to approval by the
Master Fund's board of directors.         

            -    identifying, evaluating and approving (or disapproving) the
          investment strategies in which the Grosvenor-Managed
        Accounts, including the Master Fund, may invest. o
             identifying, evaluating and approving (or disapproving)
          third-party investment management firms ("Investment
Managers") that employ investment strategies that have been
approved by the Investment Committee.     

          -    monitoring investment strategies and Investment Managers.

            Grosvenor's Chief Executive Officer is responsible for assigning
      one or more senior level investment professionals (each, a
             "Grosvenor Portfolio Manager") to each Grosvenor-Managed Account,
       including the Master Fund, whose function is to construct a
            portfolio for such Grosvenor-Managed Account by using investment
             strategies and Investment Managers that have been approved by the
              Investment Committee (subject to the Investment Guidelines of such
Grosvenor-Managed Account).                         

            Grosvenor's Investment Committee is currently comprised of David
            B. Small, David S. Richter, and Brian A. Wolf. All three members
            of the Investment Committee are Managing Directors of Grosvenor.
           Michael J. Sacks, Grosvenor's Chief Executive Officer, is not a
           member of the Investment Committee, but has veto power over all
decisions made by the Investment Committee.         

          The Investment Committee has assigned David B. Small, David S.
             Richter and Brian A. Wolf as the Grosvenor Portfolio Managers for
the Master Fund.                                    

        MICHAEL J. SACKS, MANAGING DIRECTOR, CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER

            Mr. Sacks, born 1962, joined Grosvenor in 1990 and serves as its
          Chief Executive Officer. From 1988 through 1990, Mr. Sacks was
             associated with Harris Associates, L.P. Mr. Sacks received a B.A.
            in Economics from Tulane University in 1984 and two degrees from
            Northwestern University in 1988: an M.B.A. from the J.L. Kellogg
            Graduate School of Management and a J.D. from the School of Law.
             Mr. Sacks is a trustee of Northwestern University. He is a member
of the Illinois Bar.                                

DAVID B. SMALL, MANAGING DIRECTOR, INVESTMENTS      

            Mr. Small, born 1956, joined Grosvenor in 1994. Mr. Small serves
       as the Chair of Grosvenor's Investment Committee and shares
      responsibility for portfolio management as well as for the
      evaluation, selection and monitoring of various investment
              strategies and managers. Prior to joining Grosvenor, Mr. Small was
            a consultant to Grosvenor and the founder and, from 1987 through
         1993, Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Engineer of
              David Bruce & Co., a software firm specializing in the development
of risk                                             

A-12

P-->N-215th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 15th
          management systems for derivatives trading firms. From 1979 to
      1982, Mr. Small was associated with Philadelphia Insurance
            Research Group. He received a B.S. in Economics from the Wharton
             School of the University of Pennsylvania in 1978 and an M.B.A. in
          Finance/Econometrics from the University of Chicago's Graduate
School of Business in 1985.                         

BRIAN A. WOLF, MANAGING DIRECTOR, INVESTMENTS       

        Mr. Wolf, born 1970, joined Grosvenor in 1995. Mr. Wolf is a
 member of Grosvenor's Investment Committee and shares
      responsibility for portfolio management as well as for the
      evaluation, selection and monitoring of various investment
             strategies and managers. From 1993 to 1995, he was an analyst and
            trader for M&M Financial, a Chicago-based money management firm.
      He received a B.S. SUMMA CUM LAUDE in Finance from Bradley
     University in 1992 and an M.B.A. MAGNA CUM LAUDE from the
     University of Notre Dame in 1993. Mr. Wolf is a Chartered
             Financial Analyst and a member of The CFA Society of Chicago. Mr.
            Wolf is the author of a chapter on hedged equity funds contained
         in Kenneth S. Phillips and Ronald J. Surz. eds., HEDGE FUNDS:
              DEFINITIVE STRATEGIES AND TECHNIQUES (New York: John Wiley & Sons,
Inc., 2003).                                        

DAVID S. RICHTER, MANAGING DIRECTOR, INVESTMENTS    

            Mr. Richter, born 1961, has been associated with Grosvenor since
       1994 and joined Grosvenor on a full-time basis in 2003. Mr.
              Richter is a member of Grosvenor's Investment Committee and shares
      responsibility for portfolio management as well as for the
      evaluation, selection and monitoring of various investment
              strategies and managers. From 1994 to 2002, he was the founder and
            Managing Partner of a Chicago-based U.S. long-short equity hedge
            fund. Previously, Mr. Richter was a vice-president of JMB Realty
              Corporation from 1988 to 1994 in the corporate acquisitions group.
              Prior to 1988, Mr. Richter was a manager at KPMG Peat Marwick. Mr.
              Richter graduated with a B.S. degree SUMMA CUM LAUDE in Accounting
     from the University of Illinois in 1983. Mr. Richter is a
           Certified Public Accountant and received a national Elijah Watt
       Sells award from the American Institute of Certified Public
      Accountants for his scores on the Uniform CPA Examination.

        For more information regarding other accounts managed by the
            Investment Committee, ownership of Master Fund, interests by the
       above-named members and a description of their compensation
          structure, please refer to the Master Fund's annual Form N-CSR
filed with the SEC.                                 

Item 9.1(d)   ADMINISTRATOR: The Fund has retained PNC Global Investment        
             Servicing (U.S.) Inc. (the "Administrator") to provide accounting
         and certain administrative and investor services to the Fund,
        including fund accounting, investor accounting, and taxation
         services. In consideration of these services, the Fund pays a
           monthly fee to the Administrator based primarily upon month-end
            Members' capital, described below. Similar services are provided
        by the Administrator to the Master Fund. The Administrator's
           principal business address is 103 Bellevue Parkway, Wilmington,
Delaware 19809.                                     

Item 9.1(e)   CUSTODIANS: PFPC Trust Company (the "Custodian") serves as        
           custodian for the assets of the Fund. The Custodian's principal
          business address is 103 Bellevue Parkway, Wilmington, Delaware
19809.                                              

Item 9.1(f)   EXPENSES: The Fund bears its own expenses and, indirectly through 
        its investment in the Master Fund, a PRO RATA portion of the
Master Fund's fees and expenses, not otherwise      

A-13

P-->N-216th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 16th
    borne by the Adviser, including, but not limited to: all
            investment-related expenses (including, but not limited to, fees
             paid directly or indirectly to Investment Managers, all costs and
             expenses directly related to portfolio transactions and positions
              for the Master Fund's account such as direct and indirect expenses
        associated with the Master Fund's investments, including its
         investments in Investment Funds, transfer taxes and premiums,
           taxes withheld on foreign dividends; any non-investment related
         interest expense; fees and disbursements of any attorneys and
    accountants engaged on behalf of the Fund; audit and tax
            preparation fees and expenses; administrative expenses and fees;
            custody and escrow fees and expenses; the costs of an errors and
             omissions/directors and officers liability insurance policy and a
             fidelity bond; the Advisory Fee and the Management Fee payable to
          the Adviser; the Servicing Fee payable to the Servicing Agent;
             fees and travel-related expenses of the board of directors of the
             Master Fund who are not employees of the Adviser or any affiliate
           of the Adviser; all costs and charges for equipment or services
  used in communicating information regarding the Fund's
           transactions among the Adviser and any custodian or other agent
           engaged by the Fund; any extraordinary expenses; and such other
         expenses as may be approved from time to time by the Board of
Directors.                                          

Item 9.1(g)   AFFILIATED BROKERAGE: Transactions for any Investment Fund        
           organized by the Fund will not be effected on a principal basis
             with the Adviser or any of its affiliates. However, broker-dealer
           affiliates of the Adviser may effect brokerage transactions for
            such an Investment Fund. These transactions would be effected in
              accordance with procedures adopted by the Fund pursuant to Section
        17(e) of the 1940 Act and Rule 17e-1 thereunder. Among other
        things, Section 17(e) and those procedures provide that when
        acting as broker for the Fund in connection with the sale of
           securities to or by the Fund, the affiliated broker may receive
            compensation not exceeding the following limits: (i) if the sale
          is effected on a securities exchange, the compensation may not
            exceed the "usual and customary broker's commission" (as defined
              in Rule 17e-1 under the 1940 Act); (ii) if the sale is effected in
       connection with a secondary distribution of securities, the
          compensation cannot exceed 2% of the sale price; and (iii) the
             compensation for sales otherwise effected cannot exceed 1% of the
           sales price. Rule 17e-1 defines a "usual and customary broker's
      commission" as one that is fair compared to the commission
   received by other brokers in connection with comparable
             transactions involving similar securities being purchased or sold
on an exchange during a comparable period of time.  

Item 9.2      NON-RESIDENT MANAGERS: Not Applicable                             

Item 9.3      CONTROL PERSONS: As the sole member of the Registrant, Steven L.  
       Suss is deemed to be a control person of the Registrant. In
            addition, by virtue of Mr. Suss being an officer of the Adviser,
         the Adviser may be deemed a control person of the Registrant.
      However, Mr. Suss shall withdraw from the Fund immediately
              preceding the commencement of operations of the Fund and, thus, at
             such time, the Adviser would no longer be deemed a control person
             of the Registrant. For purposes of this item, "control" means (1)
            the beneficial ownership, either directly or through one or more
       controlled companies, of more than 25 percent of the voting
           securities of a company; (2) the acknowledgment or assertion by
          either the controlled or controlling party of the existence of
             control; or (3) an adjudication under Section 2(a)(9) of the 1940
Act, which has become final, that control exists.   

A-14

P-->N-217th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 17th
ITEM 10. CAPITAL STOCK, LONG-TERM DEBT, AND OTHER SECURITIES 

ITEM 10.1. CAPITAL STOCK 

    The Fund is organized as a limited liability company under the laws of the
State of Delaware and intends to be classified as a partnership for Federal tax 
purposes. An investor in the Fund will be a Member and his or her rights in the 
Fund will be established and governed by the limited liability company agreement
of the Fund (the "LLC Agreement") which is attached as Appendix A hereto. The   
following is a summary description of certain provisions of the LLC Agreement.  
The description of such provisions is not definitive and reference should be    
made to the complete text of the LLC Agreement.                                 

   The security purchased by an Investor is an Interest, a limited liability
company interest in the Fund. All Interests shall be fully paid and             
nonassessable. Investors shall have no preemptive or other rights to subscribe  
for any additional Interests.                                                   

    The management and operation of the Fund and its business and affairs will
be vested solely in a board of directors, and the members of the Board will be  
the "directors" of the Fund (each, a "Director," and collectively, the          
"Directors"). In no event shall any Member, in his or her capacity as such, have
any role in the management of the Fund's affairs. The Members shall have power  
to vote only: (i) for the election of Directors as provided in the following    
paragraph; (ii) with respect to any amendment of the LLC Agreement, to the      
extent and as provided therein; and (iii) with respect to such additional       
matters relating to the Fund as may be required by the LLC Agreement, applicable
law or as the Board may consider necessary or desirable. With respect to any    
matter requiring the vote of Members, the Members shall vote in proportion to   
the value of their respective capital accounts as of the record date applicable 
to the consideration of such matter.                                            

   There will normally be no meetings of Members for the purpose of electing
Directors except that, in accordance with the 1940 Act: (i) the Fund will hold a
meeting of Members for the election of Directors at such time as less than a    
majority of the Directors holding office have been elected by Members; and (ii) 
if, as a result of a vacancy on the Board, less than two-thirds of the members  
of the Board holding office have been elected by the Members, that vacancy may  
be filled only by a vote of the Members.                                        

The Board may admit Members to the Fund from time to time upon the    
execution by a prospective investor of an appropriate signature page to the LLC 
Agreement or upon the completion and execution, and the acceptance of the same  
by the Board, of a subscription agreement in a form specified by the Board from 
time to time. The Board has the right to refuse to accept investments in the    
Fund for any reason. Interests will be issued only in a transaction or          
transactions not requiring registration under the Securities Act.               

 The Fund may be dissolved (i) upon the affirmative vote to dissolve the
Fund by (a) the Board or (b) Members of the Fund holding at least two-thirds    
(2/3) of the total number of votes eligible to be cast by all Members; (ii) upon
the failure of Members to elect a success Manager at a meeting called by the    
Adviser in accordance with the Fund's Limited Liability Company Agreement (the  
"LLC Agreement"); (iii) upon the expiration of any two year period that         
commences on the date on which any Member has submitted, in accordance with the 
procedure specified in the LLC Agreement, a written notice to the Fund          
requesting to tender its entire Interest for repurchase by the Fund if such     
Interest has not been repurchased by the Fund; and (iv) as required by          
applicable law.                                                                 

ITEM 10.2. LONG-TERM DEBT. 
A-15

P-->N-218th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 18th
Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 10.3. GENERAL. 

Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 10.4. TAXES. 

        The following is a summary of certain aspects of the income taxation
of the Fund and its Members which should be considered by a prospective Member. 
The Fund has not sought a ruling from the Internal Revenue Service (the         
"Service") or any other Federal, state or local agency with respect to any of   
the tax issues affecting the Fund, nor has it obtained an opinion of counsel    
with respect to any Federal tax issues other than the characterization of the   
Fund as a partnership for Federal tax purposes.                                 

          This summary of certain aspects of the Federal income tax treatment of
the Fund is based upon the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the  
"Code"), judicial decisions, Treasury Regulations (the "Regulations") and       
rulings in existence on the date hereof, all of which are subject to change.    
This summary does not discuss the impact of various proposals to amend the Code 
which could change certain of the tax consequences of an investment in the Fund.
This summary also does not discuss all of the tax consequences that may be      
relevant to a particular investor or to certain investors subject to special    
treatment under the Federal income tax laws, such as insurance companies.       

      EACH PROSPECTIVE MEMBER SHOULD CONSULT WITH ITS OWN TAX ADVISOR IN
ORDER FULLY TO UNDERSTAND THE FEDERAL, STATE, LOCAL AND FOREIGN INCOME TAX      
CONSEQUENCES OF AN INVESTMENT IN THE FUND.                                      
TAX TREATMENT OF FUND OPERATIONS                                                

   CLASSIFICATION OF THE FUND. The Fund will receive an opinion of
Schulte Roth & Zabel LLP, counsel to the Fund, that under the provisions of the 
Code and the Regulations, as in effect on the date of the opinion, as well as   
under the relevant authority interpreting the Code and the Regulations, and     
based upon certain representations of the Board of Directors, the Fund will be  
classified as a partnership for Federal tax purposes and not as an association  
taxable as a corporation.                                                       

      Under Section 7704 of the Code, "publicly traded partnerships" are
generally treated as corporations for Federal tax purposes. A publicly traded   
partnership is any partnership the interests in which are traded on an          
established securities market or which are readily tradable on a secondary      
market (or the substantial equivalent thereof). Interests in the Fund will not  
be traded on an established securities market. Regulations concerning the       
classification of partnerships as publicly traded partnerships (the "Section    
7704 Regulations") provide certain safe harbors under which interests in a      
partnership will not be considered readily tradable on a secondary market (or   
the substantial equivalent thereof). The Fund may not be eligible for any of    
those safe harbors. In particular, it will not qualify under the private        
placement safe harbor set forth in the Section 7704 Regulations if the Fund has 
more than 100 Members.                                                          

          The Section 7704 Regulations specifically provide that the fact that a
partnership does not qualify for the safe harbors is disregarded for purposes of
determining whether interests in a partnership are readily tradable on a        
secondary market (or the substantial equivalent thereof). Rather, in this event 
the partnership's status is examined under a general facts and circumstances    
test. Schulte Roth & Zabel LLP also will render its opinion that, under this    
"facts and circumstances" test, and based upon the anticipated operations of the
Fund as well as the legislative history to Section 7704, the text of the Section
7704 Regulations and certain representations of the Board of Directors, the     
interests in the Fund                                                           

A-16

P-->N-219th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 19th
will not be readily tradable on a secondary market (or the substantial          
equivalent thereof) and, therefore, that the Fund will not be treated as a      
publicly traded partnership taxable as a corporation.                           

   Neither of the opinions of counsel described above, however, is
binding on the Service or the courts. If it were determined that the Fund should
be treated as an association or a publicly traded partnership taxable as a      
corporation for Federal tax purposes (as a result of a successful challenge to  
such opinions by the Service, changes in the Code, the Regulations or judicial  
interpretations thereof, a material adverse change in facts, or otherwise), the 
taxable income of the Fund would be subject to corporate income tax when        
recognized by the Fund; distributions of such income, other than in certain     
redemptions of Interests, would be treated as dividend income when received by  
Members to the extent of the current or accumulated earnings and profits of the 
Fund; and Members would not be entitled to report profits or losses realized by 
the Fund.                                                                       

         UNLESS OTHERWISE INDICATED, REFERENCES IN THE FOLLOWING DISCUSSION OF
THE TAX CONSEQUENCES OF FUND INVESTMENTS, ACTIVITIES, INCOME, GAIN AND LOSS,    
INCLUDE THE DIRECT INVESTMENTS, ACTIVITIES, INCOME, GAIN AND LOSS OF THE FUND,  
AND THOSE INDIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE FUND AS A RESULT OF IT BEING AN        
INVESTOR IN THE MASTER FUND OR AS A RESULT OF THE MASTER FUND'S INVESTMENTS IN  
AN INVESTMENT FUND OR OTHER SUBADVISORY ACCOUNT THAT IS TREATED AS A PASS       
THROUGH ENTITY FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES (AN "INVESTMENT PARTNERSHIP").   

      As a partnership, the Fund is not itself subject to Federal income
tax. The Fund files an annual partnership information return with the Service   
which reports the results of operations. Each Member is required to report      
separately on its income tax return its distributive share of the Fund's net    
long-term capital gain or loss, net short-term capital gain or loss and all     
other items of ordinary income or loss. Each Member is taxed on its distributive
share of the Fund's taxable income and gain regardless of whether it has        
received or will receive a distribution from the Fund.                          

         ALLOCATION OF PROFITS AND LOSSES. Under the LLC Agreement, the Fund's
net profit or net loss for each fiscal period is allocated among Members and to 
their capital accounts without regard to the amount of income or loss actually  
recognized by the Fund for Federal income tax purposes. The LLC Agreement       
provides that items of income, deduction, gain, loss or credit actually         
recognized by the Fund for each fiscal year generally are to be allocated for   
income tax purposes among Members pursuant to the principles of Regulations     
issued under Sections 704(b) and 704(c) of the Code, based upon amounts of the  
Fund's net profit or net loss allocated to each Member's capital account for the
current and prior fiscal years. There can be no assurance however, that the     
particular methodology of allocations used by the Fund will be accepted by the  
Service. If such allocations are successfully challenged by the Service, the    
allocation of the Fund's tax items among the Members may be affected.           

         Under the LLC Agreement, the Board of Directors has the discretion to
allocate specially an amount of the Fund's ordinary income and/or capital gain  
(including short-term capital gain) and deductions, ordinary loss and/or capital
loss (including long-term capital loss) for Federal income tax purposes to a    
withdrawing Member to the extent that the Member's capital account exceeds, or  
is less than, as the case may be, its Federal income tax basis in its           
partnership interest. There can be no assurance that, if the Board of Directors 
makes any such special allocations, the Service will accept such allocations. If
such allocations are successfully challenged by the Service, the Fund's tax     
items allocable to the remaining Members would be affected.                     

TAX CONSEQUENCES TO A WITHDRAWING MEMBER                                        
A-17

P-->N-220th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 20th
        A Member receiving a cash liquidating distribution from the Fund, in
connection with a complete withdrawal from the Fund, generally will recognize   
capital gain or loss to the extent of the difference between the proceeds       
received by such Member and such Member's adjusted tax basis in its partnership 
interest. Such capital gain or loss will be short-term, long-term, or some      
combination of both, depending upon the timing of the Member's contributions to 
the Fund. However, a withdrawing Member will recognize ordinary income to the   
extent such Member's allocable share of the Fund's "unrealized receivables"     
exceeds the Member's basis in such unrealized receivables (as determined        
pursuant to the Regulations). For these purposes, accrued but untaxed market    
discount, if any, on securities held by the Fund will be treated as an          
unrealized receivable, with respect to which a withdrawing Member would         
recognize ordinary income. A Member receiving a cash nonliquidating distribution
will recognize income in a similar manner only to the extent that the amount of 
the distribution exceeds such Member's adjusted tax basis in its partnership    
interest.                                                                       

    As discussed above, the LLC Agreement provides that the Board of
Directors may specially allocate items of Fund ordinary income and/or capital   
gain (including short-term capital gain) and deductions, ordinary loss and/or   
capital loss (including long-term capital loss) to a withdrawing Member to the  
extent its capital account would otherwise exceed or be less than, as the case  
may be, its adjusted tax basis in its partnership interest. Such a special      
allocation of income or gain may result in the withdrawing Member recognizing   
ordinary income and/or capital gain, which may include short-term capital gain, 
in the Member's last taxable year in the Fund, thereby reducing the amount of   
long-term capital gain recognized during the tax year in which it receives its  
liquidating distribution upon withdrawal. Such a special allocation of deduction
or loss may result in the withdrawing Member recognizing ordinary loss and/or   
capital loss, which may include long-term capital loss, in the Member's last    
taxable year in the Fund, thereby reducing the amount of short-term capital loss
recognized during the tax year in which it receives its liquidating distribution
upon withdrawal.                                                                

TAX TREATMENT OF FUND INVESTMENTS                                               

    In General. It is generally expected that each of the Investment
Partnerships will act as a trader or investor, and not as a dealer, with respect
to its securities transactions. A trader and an investor are persons who buy and
sell securities for their own accounts. A dealer, on the other hand, is a person
who purchases securities for resale to customers rather than for investment or  
speculation.                                                                    

          Generally, the gains and losses realized by a trader or an investor on
the sale of securities are capital gains and losses. Capital gains and losses   
recognized by the Fund may be long-term or short-term depending, in general,    
upon the length of time the Fund maintains a particular investment position and,
in some cases, upon the nature of the transaction. Property held for more than  
one year generally will be eligible for long-term capital gain or loss          
treatment. The application of certain rules relating to short sales, to         
so-called "straddle" and "wash sale" transactions and to Section 1256 Contracts 
(defined below) may serve to alter the treatment of the Fund's securities       
positions.                                                                      

        The Fund may also realize ordinary income and losses with respect to
its transactions. The Fund may hold debt obligations with "original issue       
discount." In such case the Fund would be required to include amounts in taxable
income on a current basis even though receipt of such amounts may occur in a    
subsequent year.                                                                

       The maximum ordinary income tax rate for individuals is 35% and, in
general, the maximum individual income tax rate for "Qualified Dividends" and   
long-term capital gains is 15% (unless the taxpayer elects to be taxed at       
ordinary rates - see "Limitation on Deductibility of Interest and Short Sale
Expenses" below), although in all cases the actual rates may be higher due to   
the phase out of certain tax deductions, exemptions and credits. The excess of  
capital losses over capital gains may be                                        

A-18

P-->N-221st Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 21st
offset against the ordinary income of an individual taxpayer, subject to an     
annual deduction limitation of $3,000. Capital losses of an individual taxpayer 
may generally be carried forward to succeeding tax years to offset capital gains
and then ordinary income (subject to the $3,000 annual limitation). For         
corporate taxpayers, the maximum income tax rate is 35%. Capital losses of a    
corporate taxpayer may be offset only against capital gains, but unused capital 
losses may be carried back three years (subject to certain limitations) and     
carried forward five years. More specific discussion of the tax treatment of    
various Fund investments is provided in the SAI.                                

FOREIGN TAXES                                                                   

  It is possible that certain dividends and interest directly or
indirectly received by the Fund from sources within foreign countries will be   
subject to withholding taxes imposed by such countries. In addition, the Fund or
an Investment Partnership may also be subject to capital gains taxes in some of 
the foreign countries where they purchase and sell securities. Tax treaties     
between certain countries and the United States may reduce or eliminate such    
taxes. It is impossible to predict in advance the rate of foreign tax the Fund  
will directly or indirectly pay since the amount of the Fund's assets to be     
invested in various countries is not known.                                     

      The Members will be informed by the Fund as to their proportionate
share of the foreign taxes paid by the Fund or an Investment Partnership, which 
they will be required to include in their income. The Members generally will be 
entitled to claim either a credit (subject, however, to various limitations on  
foreign tax credits) or, if they itemize their deductions, a deduction (subject 
to the limitations generally applicable to deductions) for their share of such  
foreign taxes in computing their Federal income taxes.                          

STATE AND LOCAL TAXATION                                                        

       In addition to the Federal income tax consequences described above,
prospective investors should consider potential state and local tax consequences
of an investment in the Fund. State and local tax laws differ in the treatment  
of limited liability companies such as the Fund. A few jurisdictions may impose 
entity level taxes on a limited liability company if it is found to have        
sufficient contact with that jurisdiction. Such taxes are frequently based on   
the income and capital of the entity that is allocated to the jurisdiction.     
Although there can be no assurance, the Fund intends to conduct its activities  
so that it will not be subject to entity level taxation by any state or local   
jurisdiction.                                                                   

        The tax laws of various states and localities limit or eliminate the
deductibility of itemized deductions for certain taxpayers. These limitations   
may apply to a Member's share of some or all of the Fund's expenses, including  
interest expense, to the extent that the expenses are not considered to be trade
or business expenses in the applicable jurisdiction. Prospective investors are  
urged to consult their tax advisors with respect to the impact of these         
provisions on the deductibility of certain itemized deductions, including       
interest expense, on their tax liabilities in the jurisdictions in which they   
are resident.                                                                   

       State and local laws often differ from Federal income tax laws with
respect to the treatment of specific items of income, gain, loss, deduction and 
credit. A Member's distributive share of the taxable income or loss of the Fund 
generally will be required to be included in determining its reportable income  
for state and local tax purposes in the jurisdiction in which it is a resident. 
A partnership in which the Fund acquires an interest may conduct business in a  
jurisdiction which will subject to tax a Member's share of the partnership's    
income from that business and may cause Members to file tax returns in those    
jurisdictions. Prospective investors should consult their tax advisors with     
respect to the availability of a credit for such tax in the jurisdiction in     
which that Member is a resident.                                                

A-19

P-->N-222nd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 22nd
    One or more states may impose reporting requirements on the Fund
and/or its Members in a manner similar to that described in the SAI, under "Tax
Shelter Reporting Requirements." Investors should consult with their own        
advisors as to the applicability of such rules in jurisdictions which may       
require or impose a filing requirement.                                         

 [Massachusetts taxation section to be added by amendment]

ITEM 10.5. OUTSTANDING SECURITIES. 

On or after the date of filing of this Registration Statement, the    
Interests will be issued to Members of the Fund.                                

ITEM 10.6. SECURITIES RATINGS. 

Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 11. DEFAULTS AND ARREARS ON SENIOR SECURITIES. 

Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 12. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS. 

On February 9, 2005, certain affiliates of the Adviser, including the 
former investment adviser to the Fund, entered into Assurances of Discontinuance
with the New York Attorney General ("NYAG") (the "NYAG Settlements") and        
consented to the entry of cease-and-desist orders by the Securities and Exchange
Commission ("SEC") (the "SEC Orders") in connection with matters related to late
trading and market timing of mutual funds advised and distributed by affiliates 
of the Adviser. The SEC Orders and the NYAG Settlements contain substantially   
the same terms and conditions outlined in the agreements in principle that      
affiliates of the Adviser entered into with the SEC and NYAG in March 2004. A   
copy of the SEC Orders is available on the SEC website at http://www.sec.gov. A 
copy of the NYAG settlements is available as part of the Bank of America        
Corporation Form 8-K filing of February 10, 2005.                               

   In connection with these matters, various parties have filed suit against
certain Columbia Funds (including former Nations Funds), the Trustees of the    
Columbia Funds, FleetBoston Financial Corporation (the former parent of the     
Adviser) and certain of its affiliated entities and/or Bank of America          
Corporation and certain of its affiliated entities. More than 300 cases,        
including those filed against entities unaffiliated with the Columbia Funds,    
their Boards, FleetBoston Financial Corporation and its affiliated entities     
and/or Bank of America Corporation and its affiliated entities, have been       
transferred to a multi-district proceeding in the Federal District Court in     
Maryland. The parties have reached settlements or settlements in principle with 
respect to the claims in the proceeding concerning the Columbia Funds. All such 
settlements are subject to court approval. Other actions against certain        
Columbia Funds, the Trustees of the Columbia Funds, advisers and affiliated     
entities, alleging among other things excessive fees and inappropriate use of   
fund assets for distribution and other improper purposes, have been consolidated
in the Massachusetts federal court as IN RE COLUMBIA ENTITIES LITIGATION on     
March 2, 2005. On November 30, 2005, the judge dismissed all claims by          
plaintiffs and ordered that the case be closed. The plaintiffs filed a notice of
appeal to the United States Court of Appeals for the First Circuit on December
30, 2005; this appeal is currently pending. The parties have advised the        
appellate court that they are engaged in settlement discussions and the court   
has, accordingly, deferred the briefing schedule for the appeal. The settlement 
has not yet been finalized. Any settlement ultimately agreed by the parties will
be subject to court approval. These actions are ongoing.                        

A-20

P-->N-223rd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 23rd
Neither the Fund, the Master Fund nor the Adviser is a party to these 
actions.                                                                        

ITEM 13. TABLE OF CONTENTS OF STATEMENT OF ADDITIONAL INFORMATION.              

Not applicable.                                                       

A-21

P-->N-224th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 24th
PART B

Part B of this Registration Statement should be read in conjunction with Part A.
Capitalized terms used in this Part B and not otherwise defined have the        
meanings given them in Part A of this Registration Statement.                   

ITEM 14. COVER PAGE. 

Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 15. TABLE OF CONTENTS. 

Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 16. GENERAL INFORMATION AND HISTORY. 

Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 17. INVESTMENT OBJECTIVES AND POLICIES. 

     Part A contains basic information about the investment objectives, policies
and limitations of the Fund. This Part B supplements the discussion in Part A of
the investment objectives, policies, and limitations of the Fund.               

   In pursuing its investment objectives, the Fund will invest substantially
all of its assets in the Master Fund.                                           

(A) Investment Philosophy                                                       

The investment process for the Master Fund is based on three fundamental        
principles:                                                                     

1.   SEEK ABSOLUTE RETURNS                                                      

-    Focus on investment strategies and sub-strategies (collectively, 
   "investment strategies") that, when combined, generally seek to
    achieve positive returns that are not dependent upon directional
movements of traditional equity and fixed-income markets.   

2.   SUPERIOR INVESTMENT MANAGERS                                               

     -    Identify and invest with Investment Managers that Grosvenor regards as
     among the most talented Investment Managers available on a global
basis within their respective investment strategies.        

3.   SYSTEMATIC DIVERSIFICATION                                                 

  -    Combine investment strategies that historically have, over the long
     term, demonstrated a relatively low degree of correlation to each
     other into a broadly-diversified portfolio in an effort to reduce
volatility and mitigate strategy and market risks.          

 -    Seek to select multiple Investment Managers within each investment
strategy in order to provide style diversity and reduce     
manager-specific risk.                                      

(B) Overview of Investment Process                                              

B-22

P-->N-225th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 25th
There are five (5) primary facets of Grosvenor's approach to maintaining a      
diversified, multi-strategy, multi-manager portfolio for the Master Fund:       

1.   IDENTIFYING, EVALUATING AND APPROVING INVESTMENT STRATEGIES IN WHICH THE   
VARIOUS INVESTMENT FUNDS AND OTHER ACCOUNTS MANAGED OR ADVISED BY     
GROSVENOR, INCLUDING THE MASTER FUND, MAY INVEST                      

Grosvenor's Investment Committee is responsible for overseeing the    
identification and evaluation of, and approving (or disapproving), the
  investment strategies in which the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, including
the Master Fund, may invest. See "Grosvenor's Investment Committee and
Operations Committee" and "Identification, Evaluation and Approval of 
Investment Strategies," below.                                        

2.   IDENTIFYING, EVALUATING AND APPROVING INVESTMENT MANAGERS THAT EMPLOY      
    INVESTMENT STRATEGIES THAT HAVE BEEN APPROVED BY THE INVESTMENT COMMITTEE.

 Grosvenor's process for approving such Investment Managers has four key
phases:                                                               

1.   identifying potential Investment Managers;             

  2.   "investment" due diligence with respect to such potential
Investment Managers;                              

   3.   "operational" due diligence with respect to such potential
           Investment Managers, including both operational and legal due
diligence; and                                    

       4.   Investment Committee and Operations Committee approval of such
potential Investment Managers.                    

See "Identification, Evaluation and Approval of Investment Managers," 
below.                                                                

3.   MANAGING THE PORTFOLIO IN ACCORDANCE WITH INVESTMENT GUIDELINES FOR THE    
MASTER FUND.                                                          

     The Adviser and the Subadviser have agreed to certain Investment Guidelines
 for the Master Fund. The Investment Guidelines may from time to time be
amended or modified, based on any number of factors. See "Investment  
Guidelines," below.                                                   

4.   CONSTRUCTING A PORTFOLIO DESIGNED TO MEET THE MASTER FUND'S INVESTMENT     
     OBJECTIVES THROUGH THE USE OF APPROVED INVESTMENT STRATEGIES AND INVESTMENT
MANAGERS.                                                             

   The Master Fund is managed on a day-to-day basis by one or more Grosvenor
Portfolio Managers assigned to the Master Fund by Grosvenor's Chief   
    Executive Officer. The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers assigned to the Master
    Fund are responsible for constructing the Master Fund's portfolio by using
   the investment strategies and Investment Managers that have been approved
by the Investment Committee (subject to the Master Fund's investment  
     objectives and Investment Guidelines). See "Portfolio Construction," below.

5.   MONITORING INVESTMENT STRATEGIES, INVESTMENT MANAGERS AND THE MASTER FUND'S
PORTFOLIO AND ADJUSTING THE MASTER FUND'S PORTFOLIO FROM TIME TO TIME.

See "Ongoing Monitoring and Portfolio Adjustment," below.             

Adequate systems are critical to managing the volume of information utilized    
throughout the investment process. Grosvenor utilizes a customized proprietary  
software system to support its investment process                               

B-23

P-->N-226th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 26th
and the administration of the Master Fund. This system: (i) includes a database 
of qualitative and quantitative information about each Investment Manager       
approved by the Investment Committee; (ii) provides analytical tools to evaluate
the historical performance of Investment Managers; (iii) provides modeling tools
used to monitor portfolio performance and evaluate prospective portfolio        
modifications; and (iv) contains a series of proprietary risk-management tools  
used to evaluate the risk and market exposure of existing and prospective       
portfolios.                                                                     

GROSVENOR'S INVESTMENT COMMITTEE AND OPERATIONS COMMITTEE 

The Subadviser's Investment Committee, as described above, currently comprises  
three members: Mr. David B. Small, Mr. Brian A. Wolf and Mr. David S. Richter.  
All three members of the Investment Committee are Managing Directors of         
Grosvenor. The Investment Committee makes decisions by majority vote. However,  
Mr. Michael J. Sacks, Grosvenor's Chief Executive Officer, has a veto right over
all decisions made by the Investment Committee.                                 

The Subadviser's Operations Committee currently comprises three members: Mr.    
Paul A. Meister, Mr. Eric A. Felton and Mr. Joseph H. Nesler. All three members 
of the Operations Committee are Managing Directors of Grosvenor. The Operations 
Committee makes decisions by majority vote. However, as is the case with respect
to decisions made by the Investment Committee, Grosvenor's Chief Executive      
Officer has a veto right over all decisions made by the Operations Committee.   

Paul A. Meister, Managing Director, Chief Operating Officer. Mr. Meister, born  
1962, joined Grosvenor in 1991 and serves as its Chief Operating Officer. Mr.   
Meister also serves as the Chair of Grosvenor's Operations Committee. From 1987 
to 1991, Mr. Meister was with the law firm of Barack, Ferrazzano, Kirschbaum &  
Perlman, except for a 12 month period when he managed the real estate operations
for a Chicago based retailer. He received a B.S. in Accounting from the         
University of Illinois in 1984 and a J.D. cum laude in 1987 from the            
Northwestern University School of Law, where he was a member of the Law Review  
and the Order of the Coif. Mr. Meister is a Certified Public Accountant and a   
member of the Illinois Bar. In addition, since 2000, Mr. Meister has served on  
the Law Board of Northwestern University School of Law, and is currently a Vice 
Chair of its Executive Committee.                                               

Eric A. Felton, Managing Director, Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Felton, born    
1964, joined Grosvenor in 2004 and serves as its Chief Financial Officer. Mr.   
Felton also serves as a member of Grosvenor's Operations Committee. From 2002 to
2004, Mr. Felton was a partner in the Financial Services Industry practice for  
Ernst & Young, LLP in their Chicago office, where he served as an advisor to    
Grosvenor. From 1986 to 2002, he was with Arthur Andersen, LLP, also in their   
Chicago office. He was admitted as a partner of Arthur Andersen, LLP in 1998, at
which time he acted as audit partner for Grosvenor. He received a B.S. in       
Accounting from Valparaiso University in 1986, graduating with high distinction,
and an M.B.A. from the University of Chicago in 1992, graduating with honors.   
Mr. Felton is a Certified Public Accountant and a Chartered Financial Analyst.  
He is a member of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants, The   
Illinois CPA Society, the CFA Institute and The CFA Society of Chicago.         

Joseph H. Nesler, Managing Director, General Counsel and Chief Compliance       
Officer. Mr. Nesler, born 1956, joined Grosvenor in 2004 and serves as its      
General Counsel and Chief Compliance Officer. Mr. Nesler also serves as a member
of Grosvenor's Operations Committee. Mr. Nesler began his legal career as an    
associate with Gardner, Carton & Douglas in Chicago in 1982. He spent four years
in the Corporate Department of that firm before leaving to practice with Schiff 
Hardin & Waite, another Chicago law firm. After 10 years with Schiff Hardin &   
Waite, he accepted a position with Sidley & Austin (now Sidley Austin LLP) as a 
partner in its Investment Products and Derivatives Group, where he practiced for

B-24

P-->N-227th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 27th
approximately six years before returning to Gardner, Carton & Douglas LLP as a  
partner in 2002 to head that firm's Hedge Fund Practice Group. Sidley Austin LLP
served as outside general legal counsel to Grosvenor both prior to and during   
Mr. Nesler's tenure with that firm and continues to serve as outside general    
legal counsel to Grosvenor. Gardner, Carton & Douglas LLP served as outside     
legal counsel to Grosvenor with respect to certain matters during Mr. Nesler's  
tenure with that firm and continues to serve as outside legal counsel to        
Grosvenor with respect to certain matters. Mr. Nesler received a B.A. magna cum 
laude, Phi Beta Kappa, from Amherst College in 1978 and a J.D. from Yale        
University in 1982. He is a member of the Illinois Bar and the Chicago Bar      
Association, and a former Co Chairman of the Chicago Bar Association's          
Subcommittee on Investment Company Regulation.                                  

(C) Identification, Evaluation and Approval of Investment Strategies            

The Subadviser's Investment Committee is responsible for overseeing the         
identification and evaluation of, and approving (or disapproving), the          
investment strategies in which the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, including the    
Master Fund, may invest.                                                        

In determining whether to approve a particular investment strategy, the         
Subadviser's Investment Committee typically examines factors such as the        
following: (i) the historical returns of the investment strategy in various     
market environments; (ii) the fundamental factors driving the expected          
profitability of the investment strategy; (iii) the expected returns from the   
investment strategy over a market cycle; (iv) the expected variability of the   
investment strategy's returns over a market cycle; (v) the magnitude of a       
potential loss in extremely adverse markets; (vi) the extent to which the       
performance of the investment strategy is expected to correlate with that of    
traditional market indices, as well as with investment strategies already being 
used by the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts and with certain other investment        
strategies; (vii) the liquidity characteristics of the underlying securities    
used in implementing the investment strategy; (viii) the degree of difficulty in
pricing and hedging the underlying securities used in implementing the          
investment strategy; (ix) the cost of implementing the investment strategy,     
including transaction costs and fees and expenses paid to the Investment        
Managers that implement the investment strategy; and (x) the quality of the pool
of Investment Managers available to implement the investment strategy.          

The Subadviser's Investment Committee generally focuses on identifying          
strategies that rely on a fundamental investment approach and that employ       
techniques designed to mitigate systemic or market risks. The Investment        
Committee believes that such strategies are better suited to achieving quality  
returns than strategies driven solely by "market timing," technical analysis or 
market direction.                                                               

As described more fully below, the Subadviser's Investment Committee currently  
approves three general categories of investment strategies for use by the       
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, which it defines as "Equity Strategies,"
"Arbitrage/Credit Strategies" and "Opportunistic Strategies." The strategies    
currently approved by the Investment Committee focus primarily on the markets in
the United States, Europe and Japan, and to a lesser extent, in the emerging    
markets in Latin America, Eastern Europe and Asia-Ex-Japan. The general         
categories of investment strategies approved by the Investment Committee may    
change from time to time.                                                       

EQUITY STRATEGIES 

Equity strategies involve the purchase and/or short sale of equity and          
equity-linked securities in global markets. An equity Investment Manager may    
focus on a particular capitalization range (e.g., small cap vs. large cap) or a 
particular industry sector (e.g., healthcare, technology, or consumer), may     
employ a specific investment style (e.g., value vs. growth) or may pursue a     
broad mandate, investing in securities without specific regard for their        
issuers' capitalization, sector or geography. Some Investment Managers          

B-25

P-->N-228th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 28th
may employ an activist approach whereby they attempt to influence company       
management to take specific measures to maximize shareholder value, while others
may utilize "top down" macroeconomic analysis to guide capital-allocation       
strategies and fundamental security selection. An equity Investment Manager     
generally seeks to capitalize on discrepancies between such Investment Manager's
own evaluation of the intrinsic value of an equity security and assessment of   
the forward-looking prospects of the issuer of such security, on the one hand,  
and the consensus view reflected in the market price of such security, on the   
other hand.                                                                     

To the extent the Master Fund invests with equity Investment Managers, it       
focuses and expects to continue to focus on Investment Managers that primarily  
employ "hedged equity" investment strategies. A hedged equity Investment Manager
typically implements its particular investment strategy by establishing long and
short positions in equity or equity-linked instruments. However, although most  
hedged equity Investment Managers focus on establishing both long and short     
positions, some of these Investment Managers may focus exclusively on           
establishing long or short positions. In addition to selling securities short,  
an equity Investment Manager may seek to hedge portfolio exposure by using      
instruments such as exchange-traded funds, equity-linked options, index options 
and futures. An equity Investment Manager may also seek to manage risk by       
adopting "top-down" constraints on leverage, limits on net market exposure, net 
regional exposure and net sector exposure, position size limits, position       
stop-loss limits and parameters relating to the number of its positions.        

ARBITRAGE/CREDIT STRATEGIES 

Arbitrage/credit strategies are broadly defined and include credit-oriented,    
event-driven and relative-value strategies that generally seek to exploit       
pricing anomalies across a variety of debt or equity securities or instruments. 
The primary arbitrage/credit strategies used by the Investment Managers         
currently approved by Grosvenor are described below.                            

CREDIT                                                                          

Credit strategies include directional and hedged investments in debt securities,
credit derivatives and related instruments. The primary investment approaches   
include directional credit - long, credit long - short and directional credit - 
short. Credit strategies, although diverse, can exhibit highly correlated losses
during certain market periods.                                                  

DIRECTIONAL CREDIT - LONG                                                       

Directional Credit - Long includes distressed investing, long high-yield credit,
direct lending, structured credit, and equity restructurings. Investment        
Managers assigned to this category typically have a net exposure greater than   
50% net long.                                                                   

    -    DISTRESSED INVESTING consists primarily of long and short directional
        investments in securities of companies that are in various stages of
          financial difficulty, including investments in stressed and distressed
         companies. The goal of the strategy is to earn an attractive absolute
    rate of return through investing in specific events with limited
      exposure to broad market fluctuations. Investment Managers seek to
capitalize on market opportunities resulting from a lack of 
        information, illiquidity, excessive selling pressure, and complexity
of capital structures or securities.                        

     -    LONG HIGH-YIELD CREDIT involves taking long positions in levered loans
         or high-yield bonds. The positions in this sub-strategy typically are
          motivated by fundamental credit views that may also consider technical
  market factors such as short-term supply/demand imbalances. An
Investment                                                  

B-26

P-->N-229th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 29th
       Manager may be long an issuing company's credit either by investing
  directly in bonds or loans or by establishing a synthetic long
position through a credit default swap ("CDS").             

    -    DIRECT LENDING investments typically are high-yield loans to stressed
or distressed companies that are asset rich but have limited
       liquidity, and that need quick access to capital to refinance other
   debt, prevent a covenant default or exploit an opportunity. The
       Investment Manager directly originates these loans, which typically
     include relatively high coupons and generous structuring fees. In
         order to compensate for the less liquid nature of the instruments and
         other inherent risks of direct lending, direct financing arrangements
 often will be collateralized with assets, include restrictive
covenants and provide upside equity participation.          

     -    STRUCTURED CREDIT consists of positions in residential mortgage-backed
        securities ("RMBS"), commercial mortgage-backed securities ("CMBS"),
 asset-backed securities ("ABS"), and corporate credit-related
         structured credit instruments such as collateralized debt obligations
    ("CDO"). Trade selection is based on fundamental analysis of the
      underlying assets as well as structural analysis of the structured
   credit vehicle, including such vehicle's cash flow "waterfall."

 -    EQUITY RESTRUCTURING includes investing in spin-offs, stub-trades,
     post-restructuring equities, post-bankruptcy equities, litigation
    equity trades and recapitalizations. A post-restructuring equity
   investment involves purchasing the equity of a company that has
completed a recent restructuring, most commonly as part of a
         bankruptcy plan. Spin-offs are subsidiaries of large public companies
that are distributed to shareholders as a means of enhancing
shareholder value.                                          

CREDIT LONG-SHORT                                                               

Credit Long-Short includes long/short credit, intra-credit arbitrage,           
correlation trades and credit volatility arbitrage.                             

-    LONG/SHORT CREDIT involves taking long and short positions that  
      reflect relative-value views between, or among, different credits,
groups of credits, sectors or indices. The positions in this
         sub-strategy typically are motivated by fundamental credit views with
      an appreciation for market technicals. One example of a long/short
        credit trade is a pairs trade in which the Investment Manager may be
          long a company's CDS and short a competitor's CDS, or long a basket of
    telecom credits via CDS and short a basket of financial services
  credits via CDS. Not all positions entail related credits; for
          example, an Investment Manager may construct a portfolio that includes
    long positions in what it believes to be under-priced high-yield
   credits and short positions in richly priced crossover credits.

-    INTRA-CREDIT ARBITRAGE involves taking long and short positions  
         related to the same issuer and may include: curve trades in which the
        Investment Manager establishes both long and short positions along a
       single issuer's credit curve; basis trades, which consist of a long
      position in an issuer's bond and a synthetic short position in the
       same bond via a CDS, or VICE VERSA; senior versus subordinated debt
          trades in which the Investment Manager is long senior secured debt and
        short subordinated debt of the same company, or VICE VERSA; and debt
         versus equity trades in which the Investment Manager is long debt (or
      CDS) of an issuer and short equity (or equity options) of the same
issuer, or VICE VERSA.                                      

-    CORRELATION TRADES involve arbitraging perceived mispricings in  
        baskets or portfolios of credits versus the individual components of
         the basket, an index or a highly-correlated derivative of the basket.
      Frequently, the trade is structured to be neutral to credit spread
movements in the broad                                      

B-27

P-->N-230th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 30th
  market. The securities used in the arbitrage may include CDOs,
       synthetic CDOs, bespoke CDS baskets, credit indices, and individual
        CDS. Synthetic CDOs are similar to CDOs, except that the credits are
         included in the pool via CDS contracts instead of cash bonds. Bespoke
   CDS baskets represent a collection of credits that are selected
          individually to create a customized hedge of specific portfolio risks.
     These instruments are less liquid due to their customized nature.

-    CREDIT VOLATILITY ARBITRAGE generally involves buying and selling
  options on credit spreads of individual companies or on traded
          indices. An Investment Manager also may buy and sell volatility across
      various asset classes. For example, an Investment Manager may sell
      volatility via options on credit spreads and buy volatility on the
same company via the equity markets.                        

DIRECTIONAL CREDIT - SHORT                                                      

Directional Credit - Short involves shorting individual investment-grade or     
high-yield credits that exhibit either perceived anomalous pricing relative to  
similar credits or perceived weakening fundamentals with a high probability of  
credit deterioration. The short position typically is established using CDS. In 
addition to using single name CDS to short specific issuers, an Investment      
Manager may also use specific indices, such as the Dow Jones CDX suite of index 
products, to short the overall investment grade market or specific sectors.     

RISK (MERGER) ARBITRAGE                                                         

Risk arbitrage is a strategy that seeks to capitalize on perceived pricing      
discrepancies, or "spreads," in the equity securities of two companies involved 
in announced corporate transactions, such as mergers, tender or exchange offers,
reorganizations, liquidations and recapitalizations. For merger transactions,   
the strategy typically entails buying the security of the company being         
acquired, while simultaneously selling short the security of the acquirer. When 
a merger deal is pending, uncertainty about the outcome typically creates a     
pricing disparity; the stock of the target company typically sells at a discount
to the expected acquisition price. Investment Managers investing in merger      
arbitrage seek to capture the spread between the current stock price and the    
price upon the completion of the deal. In a cash/tender transaction, the        
Investment Manager seeks to capture the spread between the tender price and the 
price at which the target company's stock is trading.                           

CONVERTIBLE ARBITRAGE                                                           

Convertible arbitrage strategies include a variety of strategies involving      
investments in convertible securities that Investment Managers perceive to be   
undervalued from a fundamental or volatility perspective. The primary           
convertible arbitrage strategies include, but are not limited to, long          
volatility/gamma trading, catalyst/event-driven investing, credit sensitive     
investing and activist investing. In general, a position in each particular     
strategy involves taking a long position in convertible bonds or convertible    
preferred shares and short positions in the underlying common stock into which  
the convertible securities are exchangeable, in order to isolate the aspect of  
the security that the Investment Manager believes is mispriced and largely      
eliminate the effect of directional moves in the underlying stock price.        

Long volatility/gamma trading primarily involves taking positions where the     
Investment Manager perceives that the volatility level implied by the price of  
the convertible security is too low relative to historical or expected future   
volatility of the security.                                                     

Catalyst/event-driven investing involves taking positions where the Investment  
Manager expects that a catalyst or event will cause the implied volatility of   
the convertible bonds or the actual volatility of stock price changes to        
increase. Such catalysts may include new product announcements, litigation,     

B-28

P-->N-231st Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 31st
management changes, or regulatory approval of a new drug. The Investment Manager
typically will seek to hedge interest rate and credit risk by using interest    
rate futures or swaps and credit derivatives.                                   

Credit sensitive investing involves taking positions where the Investment       
Manager expects that the financial condition of the underlying company will     
improve and credit spreads of the convertible bond will narrow. The credit risk 
of such a position typically will be largely unhedged. Such a view may be based 
on improved trends in earnings, refinancing of existing debt, or the selling of 
assets.                                                                         

Activist investing relies on the ability of a manager with a significant        
economic stake in the equity, debt, convertible bond or other instruments of a  
company to influence management and corporate decisions in such a way as to     
increase the value of the holdings. Examples include seeking management changes,
corporate restructuring, securing special dividends or other payments, or the   
buying back of equity or debt.                                                  

STATISTICAL ARBITRAGE                                                           

Statistical arbitrage is a strategy that seeks to exploit temporary price       
disparities among equity securities that historically have maintained stable    
price relationships. The strategy uses quantitative models to determine which   
securities to purchase and which to sell short and to measure market exposure.  
Often, these models rely upon fundamental balance sheet and income statement    
data such as: earnings yield, dividend yield, revisions in earnings forecasts,  
relationships between market capitalization, revenues and net asset values,     
earnings forecasts and price histories. Other approaches utilize factor analysis
to measure factor risks and relative attractiveness. Investment Managers that   
employ the strategy purchase and sell securities in relative quantities in a    
manner designed to result in an aggregate portfolio that is generally neutral to
broad equity market movements and/or to exposure across sectors, investment     
style and market capitalization.                                                

FIXED-INCOME ARBITRAGE                                                          

Fixed-income arbitrage includes a variety of strategies involving investments in
fixed-income instruments that are weighted in an attempt to eliminate or reduce 
exposure to changes in the level of interest rates. These strategies attempt to 
exploit relative perceived mispricings (I.E., anomalous yield differences)      
between related sets of fixed-income securities. The generic types of           
fixed-income arbitrage trades include the following: yield curve arbitrage,     
corporate versus government yield spreads (or swap spreads), municipal bond     
versus government yield spreads, cash versus futures basis trades, mortgages    
versus swaps and U.S. Treasuries, mortgage derivative arbitrage and hedged ABS. 

OPPORTUNISTIC STRATEGIES 

Opportunistic strategies refer to investment strategies with broad mandates to  
invest in a wide range of opportunities in debt, equities, non-U.S. currencies, 
physical commodities and derivatives in both developed and emerging markets     
globally. Opportunistic Investment Managers may establish both directional as   
well as hedged positions and typically use leverage in order to increase their  
invested positions.                                                             

Strategies Not Pursued                                                          

The Subadviser's Investment Committee currently does not intend to permit the   
Master Fund to invest with Investment Managers whose primary focus is, in       
Grosvenor's judgment, one or more of the following strategies: (i) systematic   
commodity trend-following; (ii) so-called "Regulation D arbitrage"; (iii)       
investing in certain types of mortgage derivative trading; and (iv) investing in
certain emerging markets. The Master Fund may, however, invest with an          
Investment Manager that engages in such                                         

B-29

P-->N-232nd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 32nd
strategies as long as Grosvenor determines that such Investment Manager's       
primary focus is on approved strategies. The Investment Committee may modify    
these restrictions from time to time without notice to Investors.               

(D) Investment Guidelines                                                       

The Adviser and Subadviser have agreed to certain Investment Guidelines for the 
Master Fund. Grosvenor, as part of its risk management program for the Master   
Fund, manages the Master Fund's portfolio on a day-to-day basis in accordance   
with these Investment Guidelines. Among other things, the Adviser and Grosvenor 
have established maximum exposure amounts for certain of the investment         
strategies in which the Master Fund may invest, based in part on the outlook of 
Grosvenor's Investment Committee for the investment strategies. The Investment  
Committee bases its outlook for particular strategies on its evaluation of the  
risk/reward profiles of such strategies. In evaluating the risk/reward profiles 
of specific strategies, the Investment Committee ordinarily considers factors   
such as:                                                                        

  -    its ongoing review and monitoring of the macro-economic environment
          and assessment of the likely impact of macro-economic variables on the
investment strategies pursued by the Master Fund;           

    -    its ongoing analysis of the primary drivers impacting such investment
strategies;                                                 

     -    communications with Investment Managers regarding their assessments of
their particular opportunity sets; and                      

     -    communications with other market participants, such as broker-dealers.

The Board, the Adviser and Subadviser may reevaluate the Investment Guidelines  
from time to time based on various factors, including their assessment of market
conditions, and the Investment Guidelines may be amended or modified from time  
to time based on such factors. Such modifications may be made without notice to 
Investors in the Master Fund.                                                   

Grosvenor seeks to ensure that whenever the Master Fund invests in, or          
withdraws/redeems capital from, an Investment Fund, the Master Fund does so in  
accordance with the Investment Guidelines in effect at the time of such         
investment or withdrawal/redemption. In certain cases, however, the Master Fund 
may fall out of compliance with the Investment Guidelines because of, among     
other things, appreciation or depreciation in the value of investments,         
recharacterization or reclassification of investments, limitations on           
withdrawals/redemptions by one or more Investment Funds, inadvertent errors or  
other factors that are beyond Grosvenor's control.                              

Should the Master Fund not be in compliance with the Investment Guidelines,     
Grosvenor ordinarily will implement measures designed to bring the Master Fund  
into compliance with the Investment Guidelines as soon as reasonably            
practicable. In certain cases, however, factors (such as liquidity restrictions 
relating to one or more investments) may affect Grosvenor's ability to bring the
Master Fund into compliance with the Investment Guidelines in an expeditious    
manner.                                                                         

In certain cases, the Investment Committee may recommend to the Adviser that,   
under the circumstances, it is appropriate to modify an Investment Guideline, or
to adjust or refine the method or formula by which compliance with an Investment
Guideline is tested, resulting in the change of the status of the Master Fund   
from non-compliant to compliant. The Investment Committee may also conclude and 
recommend to the Adviser that, under the circumstances, it is appropriate for   
the Master Fund to continue to be non-compliant, even though the Investment     
Committee has also concluded that, as a general matter, it is not               

B-30

P-->N-233rd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 33rd
appropriate to modify the relevant Investment Guideline or to adjust or refine  
the method or formula by which compliance with such Investment Guideline is     
tested.                                                                         

(E) Identification, Evaluation and Approval of Investment Managers              

Identifying New Investment Opportunities                                        

Grosvenor's research staff seeks to identify superior Investment Managers within
each investment strategy that has been approved by the Investment Committee.    
Although the research staff uses a number of methods to identify prospective    
Investment Managers, it relies heavily upon Grosvenor's proprietary and         
confidential network of information and individuals developed over a long period
of time managing multi-manager investment funds.                                

Investment Due Diligence                                                        

If Grosvenor's research staff identifies a prospective Investment Manager that  
the staff regards as promising, the Grosvenor Portfolio Managers assign a team  
(an "Investment Team") comprised of at least one Grosvenor Portfolio Manager and
at least two research analysts to assess:                                       

  -    certain qualitative factors relating to such prospective Investment
      Manager, such as its investment philosophy, investment mandate and
          investment decision-making structure, the skills and commitment of its
          key professionals, its depth and breadth of experience in the relevant
         investment strategy, its investment and risk management processes and
its organizational infrastructure; and                      

-    the quality of such prospective Investment Manager's historical  
 returns. In assessing the quality of a prospective Investment
         Manager's historical returns, the Investment Team may address some or
all of the following factors:                               

-    Performance, Volatility and Correlation                

             -    absolute performance, and performance relative to relevant
benchmarks and peers                    

-    in advancing and declining markets           

-    evaluation of extreme performance periods    

-    standard deviation and semi-deviation        

-    peak-to-trough drawdown and recovery period  

              -    beta to relevant indices and in varying market environments

            -    expected correlation to other Investment Managers used by
the Master Fund                         

-    Analysis of Exposure, Attribution and Portfolio Data   

    -    gross and net invested position, long/short ratio

      -    profit and loss attribution by investment strategy,
geography, longs and shorts             

-    return on invested capital                   

 -    ratio of profitable and unprofitable positions

-    portfolio concentration                      

B-31

P-->N-234th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 34th
In conducting investment due diligence, the assigned Investment Team generally  
will complete the following:                                                    

-    multiple on-site visits to the prospective Investment Manager's primary    
 investment office and, if applicable, key satellite investment offices;

-    multiple character reference checks on key investment personnel; and       

-    a proprietary information packet that may include an introductory          
   memorandum, a profile of the prospective Investment Manager, a summary of
completed due diligence and references and the applicable quantitative
analyses listed in the table above.                                   

Operational Due Diligence                                                       

If the Investment Team assigned to a prospective Investment Manager believes    
that such Investment Manager is likely to pass Grosvenor's investment due       
diligence process, the Investment Team initiates "operational" due diligence by 
requesting Grosvenor's Operational Due Diligence Team (a group within           
Grosvenor's Finance Department) to evaluate such Investment Manager from an     
operational and legal perspective. Upon receiving such a request with respect to
an Investment Manager, the Operational Due Diligence Team is responsible for:   

   -    reviewing and analyzing relevant legal and regulatory documentation;

    -    performing reference and background checks of such Investment Manager
         and its key personnel utilizing independent third-party investigative
firms; and                                                  

-    evaluating the people, processes and systems that support such   
Investment Manager's infrastructure and operations.         

The Operational Due Diligence Team evaluates the Investment Manager's           
operational infrastructure and the overall design of the Investment Manager's   
internal control environment. This evaluation includes a review of the audited  
financial statements of the Investment Fund(s) managed by such Investment       
Manager and evaluation of the audit firm engaged by such Investment Manager to  
audit such Investment Fund(s).                                                  

(F) Investment Committee and Operations Committee Approval                      

The Investment Committee must approve an Investment Manager before a            
Grosvenor-Managed Account, including the Master Fund, may invest with such      
Investment Manager. The Investment Committee will not consider an Investment    
Manager for approval unless: (i) such Investment Manager has been sponsored by  
at least one senior level investment professional (who may be a Grosvenor       
Portfolio Manager) who has been designated as an "Authorized Sponsor" by the    
Investment Committee and (ii) at least one other senior level investment        
professional (who may be a Grosvenor Portfolio Manager), also designated as an  
"Authorized Sponsor" by the Investment Committee has interviewed an appropriate 
representative or representatives of such Investment Manager.                   

If the Investment Team assigned to a particular prospective Investment Manager  
believes that such Investment Manager would be appropriate for certain          
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, it prepares a recommendation for the Investment     
Committee to consider. If the Investment Committee approves a                   

B-32

P-->N-235th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 35th
particular Investment Manager (and if the Operations Committee has also approved
such Investment Manager based on its "operational" due diligence review, as     
discussed below), any Grosvenor-Managed Account, including the Master Fund,     
ordinarily may invest with such Investment Manager, subject to applicable       
investment objectives and Investment Guidelines.                                

The Operations Committee must approve an Investment Manager (by majority vote)  
based on its review and analysis of the "operational" due diligence performed by
the Operational Due Diligence Team, before a Grosvenor-Managed Account,         
including the Master Fund, may invest with such Investment Manager.             

(G) Portfolio Construction                                                      

As discussed above, the Master Fund is managed on a day-to-day basis by one or  
more Grosvenor Portfolio Managers assigned to the Master Fund by Grosvenor's    
Chief Executive Officer. The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers assigned to the Master
Fund employ a combination of "top down" and "bottom-up" inputs in constructing  
the Master Fund's portfolio. The "top down" inputs consist of: (i) the          
requirement to use investment strategies and Investment Managers that have been 
approved by the Investment Committee; (ii) the Master Fund's investment         
objectives; and (iii) the Master Fund's Investment Guidelines. The "bottom-up"  
inputs consist of the Grosvenor Portfolio Managers' judgment in selecting and   
allocating capital to approved Investment Managers in a manner that such        
Grosvenor Portfolio Managers determine to be appropriate in light of the Master 
Fund's investment objectives and Investment Guidelines. The Grosvenor Portfolio 
Managers base their allocation decisions upon both qualitative and quantitative 
factors, supplementing experienced investment judgment with quantitative        
analyses.                                                                       

Selection of Investment Managers                                                

The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers assigned to the Master Fund generally seek to  
achieve diversification across both investment strategies and Investment        
Managers, often selecting multiple Investment Managers within each such strategy
in order to access differing investment styles, mitigate manager-specific risk  
and provide for future capacity as capital is added to the Master Fund.         

The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers assigned to the Master Fund may consider a     
number of factors in selecting Investment Managers for the Master Fund,         
including, but not limited to:                                                  

-    investment style (E.G., generalist versus sector specialist;     
          shorter-term versus longer-term investment horizon; level of activism;
     value versus growth orientation; concentrated versus diversified;
long- versus short-bias; ETC.);                             

  -    correlation with other Investment Managers used by the Master Fund;

  -    compatibility of the Investment Manager's liquidity provisions with
those of the Master Fund; and                               

   -    capacity of the Investment Manager to accept additional capital over
time.                                                       

PORTFOLIO ALLOCATIONS                                                           

The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers assigned to the Master Fund utilize certain    
quantitative analytical reports generated by Grosvenor's proprietary risk       
management software to test and refine their judgment regarding: (i) their      
selection of Investment Managers for the Master Fund; and (ii) the amount of    
assets to be allocated to each such Investment Manager. Such reports are        
designed to enable the Grosvenor Portfolio Managers to evaluate the risk and    
return characteristics of proposed alternative allocations to particular        
Investment Managers. Such reports currently consist of historical simulation    
analyses,                                                                       

B-33

P-->N-236th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 36th
historical simulation stress tests and scenario analyses, forward-looking       
analyses, look-through exposure analyses and portfolio liquidity analyses.      

(H) Ongoing Monitoring and Portfolio Adjustment                                 

Strategy Monitoring                                                             

Certain personnel within Grosvenor's Investments Department are responsible for 
staying abreast of market developments affecting specific investment strategies 
and communicating their findings to the Investment Committee. The Investment    
Committee reviews such findings to determine whether particular investment      
strategies (and the exposure target ranges applicable to such investment        
strategies) continue to be appropriate. The Investment Committee may recommend  
to the Master Fund's Board and the Adviser to add or terminate a particular     
investment strategy, or change the exposure target ranges applicable to such    
investment strategy, based on any number of factors, such as: (i) a better      
alternative for investing the capital invested in such investment strategy; (ii)
a change in the expectations for such investment strategy; or (iii) a change in 
the investment or economic environment.                                         

Investment Manager Monitoring                                                   

INVESTMENT MONITORING                                                           

The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers and certain other personnel within Grosvenor's 
Investments Department are responsible for staying abreast of current           
developments affecting Investment Managers and communicating their findings to  
the Investment Committee.                                                       

Grosvenor's research staff monitors certain aspects of Investment Manager       
performance and communicates from time to time with Investment Managers to      
review the performance of the Investment Funds managed by such Investment       
Managers and to discuss such Investment Managers' investment outlook.           

Grosvenor obtains certain exposure-level information that enables the Investment
Committee and the Grosvenor Portfolio Managers to analyze various investment    
strategies, markets and sectors on a "look-through" basis. Although Grosvenor   
does not require that Investment Managers provide position-level transparency,  
Investment Managers typically provide aggregated, portfolio-level information   
with respect to the invested positions and risk profiles of their Investment    
Funds. This information typically includes, but is not necessarily limited to,  
data related to each Investment Fund's long, short, gross and net exposure,     
industry sector and/or geographic exposure (where appropriate), concentration,  
and leverage. The information set provided by Investment Managers varies        
depending upon their investment strategy focus and investment style. This       
summary-level risk information is augmented through ongoing conversations with  
the Investment Manager and, together with such conversations, is intended to    
provide an overall view of the relevant Investment Fund's risk exposure.        

Although the Grosvenor Portfolio Managers ordinarily make medium- to long-term  
commitments to Investment Managers on behalf of the Master Fund (in order to    
give the Investment Managers a reasonable opportunity to achieve their          
objectives), the Investment Committee may determine to terminate an existing    
Investment Manager based on any number of factors, such as:                     

-    disappointing performance relative to the Investment Committee's 
   expectations for such Investment Manager or to other Investment
Managers using the same general type of investment strategy;

    -    excessive returns which may be indicative of risk taking inconsistent
with the Investment                                         

B-34

P-->N-237th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 37th
Committee's expectations;                                   

-    deviation from stated investment strategy;                       

-    deviation from area of expertise;                                

-    significant revisions of reported results;                       

-    a change in circumstances regarding such Investment Manager,     
including:                                                  

 -    changes in such Investment Manager's investment process;

-    complacency or "shell shock";                          

     -    changes in such Investment Manager's back-office operations;

        -    changes in the type or amount of assets under the management of
such Investment Manager;                          

      -    changes in the type(s) of products offered by such Investment
Manager;                                          

       -    changes in key personnel or development of personnel problems;

  -    changes in the terms and conditions of investments in the
    Investment Fund(s) managed by such Investment Manager;

     -    new conflicts of interest affecting such Investment Manager;

-    legal or ethical issues; and/or                        

-    lack of or misleading disclosure; and                  

  -    withdrawal of such Investment Manager's investment or withdrawal of
investments by such Investment Manager's personnel;         

in each case, as determined in Grosvenor's judgment.                            

These factors, either alone or in combination, are not necessarily grounds for  
immediate Investment Manager termination, but may lead the Investment Committee 
to place an Investment Manager on its "watch list," thereby triggering a        
thorough review of such Investment Manager. Ordinarily, no additional capital is
allocated to an Investment Manager during such time as such Investment Manager  
is on the Investment Committee's "watch list." The Investment Committee may     
remove an Investment Manager from its "watch list" if the results of the review 
are favorable, or terminate the Investment Manager if the results of the review 
are unfavorable. The Investment Committee may also determine that developments  
at the Investment Manager should be followed more closely for a period of time  
before reaching a final decision. While Grosvenor may elect to terminate an     
Investment Manager, its ability to cause a Grosvenor-Managed Account such as the
Master Fund to fully withdraw/redeem from such Investment Manager's Investment  
Fund(s) is determined by the investor liquidity provisions of such Investment   
Fund(s).                                                                        

MONITORING OF NON-INVESTMENT OPERATIONS.                                        

The Operational Due Diligence Team is responsible for staying abreast of current
developments affecting the Investment Managers' personnel, infrastructure,      
operations and service providers, and communicates its findings to the          
Operations Committee.                                                           

The Operational Due Diligence Team monitors certain aspects of the Investment   
Managers' operations and stays in frequent communication with the Investment    
Managers in reviewing the timeliness and accuracy of the investment performance 
reports of the Investment Funds provided by such Investment                     

B-35

P-->N-238th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 38th
Managers. Grosvenor's Finance Department has developed an ongoing investment    
manager monitoring program, utilized by the Operational Due Diligence Team,     
designed to (i) identify inaccuracies in financial results and Investment Fund  
valuations reported by Investment Managers; (ii) identify changes in the        
Investment Managers' personnel, processes or systems that support the Investment
Managers' operations; (iii) identify changes in third-party service providers   
such as administrators or auditors used by the Investment Managers; and (iv)    
determine the nature and extent of future due diligence procedures to perform.  

The Operational Due Diligence Team, through its monitoring procedures described 
above, may identify issues that are not necessarily grounds for immediate       
Investment Manager termination, but may lead the Operations Committee to place  
an Investment Manager on its "close monitor list," thereby triggering a thorough
operational review and heightened monitoring of such Investment Manager's       
operations. Ordinarily, without specific approval from the Operations Committee,
no additional capital is allocated to an Investment Manager during such time as 
such Investment Manager is on the Operations Committee's "close monitor list."  
The Operations Committee may remove an Investment Manager from its "close       
monitor list" if the results of the review are favorable, or terminate the      
Investment Manager if the results of the review are unfavorable. The Operations 
Committee may also determine that developments at the Investment Manager should 
be followed more closely for a period of time before reaching a final decision. 

The Operational Due Diligence Team is also responsible for:                     

-    consulting from time to time with Grosvenor's Legal Department in
 order to stay abreast of current legal developments affecting
Investment Managers and their Investment Funds;             

     -    periodically updating background investigations into the key personnel
of the Investment Managers; and                             

-    communicating its findings to the Operations Committee.          

Portfolio Adjustment                                                            

The Master Fund has a dynamic portfolio. The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers       
responsible for managing the Master Fund change the amounts they allocate to    
particular Investment Managers on behalf of the Master Fund from time to time   
based on factors such as:                                                       

  -    the Investment Committee's approval of new investment strategies or
termination of existing investment strategies;              

-    the Investment Committee's approval of new Investment Managers or
termination of existing Investment Managers;                

-    changes in the Master Fund's Investment Guidelines; and          

-    such Grosvenor Portfolio Managers' ongoing analysis of Investment
Manager allocations in light of the Master Fund's investment
objectives.                                                 

(I) Modifications of Investment Process                                         

The foregoing summarizes Grosvenor's investment process in effect as of the date
of this Registration Statement. Grosvenor has modified its investment process   
from time to time in the past, and expects to continue to modify its investment 
process from time to time in the future. Such modifications may be material and 
may be made without notice to investors in the Master Fund.                     

B-36

P-->N-239th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 39th
(J) Limited Direct Investments                                                  

Grosvenor may from time to time invest the Master Fund's assets directly in the 
types of financial instruments in which Investment Funds invest ("Direct        
Investments"). Although Direct Investments may be made to recognize gains,      
Direct Investments are typically (i) for hedging purposes involving the purchase
or sale of securities or derivatives to reduce certain exposures of the Master  
Fund (for example, the purchase of puts on the S&P 500 index) and (ii) for cash 
management purposes (for example, the purchase of high quality, fixed income    
securities, money market instruments, money market mutual funds, or cash or cash
equivalents). Direct Investments are expected to be minimal in light of         
Grosvenor's focus on investing in Investment Funds.                             

RESTRICTED AND ILLIQUID INVESTMENTS                                             

     Although it is anticipated that most Investment Funds will invest primarily
in publicly traded securities, they generally may invest a portion of the value 
of their total assets in restricted securities and other investments which are  
illiquid. Restricted securities are securities that may not be sold to the      
public without an effective registration statement under the Securities Act or, 
if they are unregistered, may be sold only in a privately negotiated transaction
or pursuant to an exemption from registration.                                  

   Where registration is required to sell a security, an Investment Fund may
be obligated to pay all or part of the registration expenses, and a considerable
period may elapse between the decision to sell and the time the Investment      
Manager may be permitted to sell a security under an effective registration     
statement. If, during such period, adverse market conditions were to develop, an
Investment Fund might obtain a less favorable price than prevailed when it      
decided to sell. Investment Managers may be unable to sell restricted and other 
illiquid securities at the most opportune times or at prices approximating the  
value at which they purchased such securities.                                  

   In addition, the Master Fund's interests in unregistered Investment Funds
are themselves illiquid and subject to substantial restrictions on transfer. The
Master Fund may liquidate an interest and withdraw from an unregistered         
Investment Fund pursuant to limited withdrawal rights. The illiquidity of these 
interests may adversely affect the Master Fund were it to have to sell interests
at an inopportune time.                                                         

BORROWING                                                                       

 The Fund and the Master Fund are authorized to borrow. The Fund and the
Master Fund may borrow money for certain purposes, such as making payments to   
Investment Funds in accordance with the Master Fund's investment commitments and
paying fees and expenses of the Fund and the Master Fund, subject to any        
limitations imposed by applicable law. The Fund and the Master Fund expect to   
borrow money from time to time on a short-term basis for liquidity purposes. All
interest and other fees charged under any line of credit will be paid by the    
Fund or the Master Fund, as applicable. If the cash flows of the Master Fund are
insufficient to meet required payments on this line of credit, the Master Fund  
could be forced to liquidate investments in Investment Funds at times or in     
amounts that are not advantageous to the Master Fund.                           

INCENTIVE ALLOCATION                                                            

    Each Investment Manager generally will receive performance-based
allocations, expected to range from 15% to 25% of net profits. The              
performance-based allocation that will be received by an Investment Manager may 
create an incentive for the Investment Manager to make investments that are     
riskier or more speculative than those that might have been made in the absence 
of the performance-based                                                        

B-37

P-->N-240th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 40th
allocation. In addition, because the performance-based allocation will be       
calculated on a basis that includes realized and unrealized appreciation of an  
Investment Fund's assets, the performance-based allocation may be greater than  
if it were based solely on realized gains. The fees and other expenses borne by 
the Master Fund, including the performance-based allocations indirectly payable 
by the Master Fund as a result of its investments in Investment Funds, are      
higher than those of other registered investment companies.                     

LIQUIDITY RISKS                                                                 

       Interests are not traded on any securities exchange or other market
and are subject to substantial restrictions on transfer. Although the Fund may  
offer to repurchase Interests from time to time, a Member may not be able to    
liquidate its Interest in the Fund for an extended period of time. The Adviser  
expects that it will recommend to the Board of Directors that the Fund offer to 
repurchase Interests from members four times each year, effective at the end of 
each calendar quarter.                                                          

DISTRIBUTIONS TO MEMBERS AND PAYMENT OF TAX LIABILITY                           

      The Fund does not intend to make periodic distributions of its net
income or gains, if any, to Members. Whether or not distributions are made,     
Members are required each year to pay applicable Federal and state income taxes 
on their respective shares of the Fund's taxable income, and will have to pay   
applicable taxes from other sources. The amount and times of any distributions  
will be determined in the sole discretion of the Board of Directors.            

SPECIAL RISKS OF MULTI-MANAGER STRUCTURE                                        

       The Investment Funds generally will not be registered as investment
companies under the 1940 Act and, therefore, the Fund, as an indirect investor  
in these Investment Funds, will not have the benefit of the protections afforded
by the 1940 Act to investors in registered investment companies, such as mutual 
funds. Although the Adviser receives detailed information from each Investment  
Manager regarding its investment performance and investment strategy. However,  
the Adviser may have little or no means of independently verifying this         
information. An Investment Manager may use proprietary investment strategies    
that are not fully disclosed to the Adviser, which may involve risks that are   
not anticipated by the Adviser.                                                 

          The Master Fund relies primarily on information provided by Investment
Managers in valuing its investments in Investment Funds and determining the     
value of Interests, and thus, there is a risk that inaccurate valuations        
provided by Investment Managers could indirectly adversely affect the value of  
Interests and the amounts Members receive upon the repurchase of Interests.     

          For the Fund to complete its tax reporting requirements and to provide
an audited annual report to Members, it must receive information on a timely    
basis from the Master Fund, which, in turn, receives such information from the  
Investment Managers. The Investment Manager's delay in providing this           
information could delay the Fund's preparation of tax information for investors,
which might require Members to seek extensions on the time to file their tax    
returns, or could delay the preparation of the Fund's annual report.            

  An investor who meets the conditions imposed by the Investment
Managers, including minimum initial investment requirements that may be         
substantially higher than those imposed by the Fund, could invest directly with 
the Investment Managers. By investing in the Investment Funds indirectly through
the Fund, an investor bears a PRO RATA portion of the asset-based fee and other 
expenses of the Fund, a PRO RATA portion of the asset-based fees and other      
expenses of the Master Fund and also                                            

B-38

P-->N-241st Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 41st
indirectly bears a PRO RATA portion of the asset-based fees, performance-based  
allocations and other expenses borne by the Master Fund as an investor in       
Investment Funds.                                                               

         Each Investment Manager receives any performance-based allocations to
which it is entitled irrespective of the performance of the other Investment    
Managers and the Master Fund generally. Accordingly, an Investment Manager with 
positive performance may receive compensation from the Master Fund, and thus    
indirectly from the investors in the Fund, even if the Master Fund's overall    
returns are negative. Investment decisions of the Investment Funds are made by  
the Investment Managers independently of each other. As a result, at any        
particular time, one Investment Fund may be purchasing shares of an issuer whose
shares are being sold by another Investment Fund. Consequently, the Master Fund 
could directly or indirectly incur certain transaction costs without            
accomplishing any net investment result.                                        

The Master Fund may make additional investments in or effect
withdrawals from Investment Funds only at certain times pursuant to limitations 
set forth in the governing documents of the Investment Funds. Therefore, the    
Master Fund may not be able to withdraw its investment in an Investment Fund    
promptly after it has made a decision to do so, which may result in a loss to   
the Master Fund and adversely affect the Fund's investment return. Additionally,
the Master Fund from time to time may have to invest some of its assets         
temporarily in money market securities or, subject to the limitations of the    
1940 Act, money market funds, due to these limitations.                         

          The Master Fund expects to hold non-voting securities of an Investment
Fund or irrevocably waive its right to vote some or all of its securities with  
respect to Investment Funds. It will therefore not be able to vote on matters   
that require the approval of the investors in the Investment Fund, including a  
matter that could adversely affect the Master Fund's investment in the          
Investment Fund.                                                                

        Investment Funds may be permitted to redeem their interests in kind.
Thus, upon the Master Fund's withdrawal of all or a portion of its interest in  
an Investment Fund, the Master Fund may receive securities that are illiquid or 
difficult to value. In the event the Fund were to receive such securities from  
the Master Fund, it would be required to dispose of such securities immediately 
either through liquidation or by distributing such securities to Members in     
connection with a repurchase by the Fund of all or a portion of Interests of    
Members.                                                                        

   A noncorporate investor's share of the Master Fund's investment
expenses attributable to the Fund (including (i) asset-based fees at the Master 
Fund, Fund and the Investment Fund level, and (ii) performance-based allocations
at the Investment Fund level) may be subject to certain limitations on          
deductibility for regular Federal income tax purposes and may be completely     
disallowed for purposes of determining the noncorporate investor's alternative  
minimum tax liability.                                                          

          The Master Fund may agree to indemnify certain of the Investment Funds
and their Investment Managers from any liability, damage, cost or expense       
arising out of, among other things, certain acts or omissions relating to the   
offer or sale of the Interests.                                                 

OTHER CONSIDERATIONS                                                            

        Other investors in the Master Fund may alone or collectively acquire
sufficient voting interests in the Master Fund to control matters relating to   
the operation of the Master Fund. If other investors control the Master Fund, it
could adversely affect the Fund's ability to meet repurchase requests, which    
requires the cooperation of the Master Fund's board of directors, could result  
in a change to the Master Fund's investment objectives, or could have other     
adverse consequences to the Fund. As a result,                                  

B-39

P-->N-242nd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 42nd
the Fund could be required to withdraw its investment in the Master Fund or take
other appropriate action. Any such withdrawal could result in an in-kind        
distribution of securities (as opposed to a cash distribution from the Master   
Fund). If securities and other noncash assets are distributed, the Fund would   
incur brokerage, tax, or other charges in converting those assets to cash.      

MASTER-FEEDER STRUCTURES                                                        

        The Fund does not invest directly in individual securities. Instead,
it invests substantially all of its investable assets in the Master Fund. The   
Master Fund, in turn, purchases, holds and sells investments in accordance with 
its investment objectives and policies. The Board of Directors of the Fund      
believes that the fees and expenses of the Fund (including its share of the fees
and expenses of the Master Fund as an investor in the Master Fund) will be less 
than or approximately equal to the expenses that the Fund would incur if its    
assets were invested directly in securities and other investments. The Fund does
not have the right to withdraw its investment in the Master Fund. Instead, it   
may do so only through periodic repurchases by the Master Fund of its interests 
in the Master Fund. This may limit the ability of the Fund to make offers to    
repurchase Interests. In addition, the Fund may receive securities and other    
investments from the Master Fund in lieu of cash when it withdraws capital from 
the Master Fund. The Fund will incur expenses in liquidating investments        
received in connection with any in-kind distributions. A change in the          
investment objectives, policies or restrictions of the Master Fund may cause the
Fund to seek to have repurchased its interests in the Master Fund.              
Alternatively, the Fund could seek to change its investment objectives, policies
or restrictions to conform to those of the Master Fund. The investment          
objectives and policies of the Master Fund may be changed without the approval  
of investors in the Master Fund (including the Fund). These investors may       
include other types of pooled investment vehicles that may or may not be        
investment companies registered under the 1940 Act.                             

ITEM 18.  MANAGEMENT. 

                                                                [Download Table]

                                                     NUMBER OF                 
                                                     FUNDS IN                  
 NAME, AGE,      TERM OF                               FUND           OTHER    
AND POSITION   OFFICE AND                             COMPLEX     DIRECTORSHIPS
  WITH THE      LENGTH OF    PRINCIPAL OCCUPATION    OVERSEEN        HELD BY   
    FUND       TIME SERVED    DURING PAST 5 YEARS   BY MANAGER      DIRECTORS  
------------   -----------   --------------------   ----------   --------------

                             DISINTERESTED DIRECTORS                           
                         OFFICERS WHO ARE NOT DIRECTORS                        

   The Directors will serve on the Board of Directors for terms of
indefinite duration. A Director's position in that capacity will terminate if   
the Director is removed, resigns or is subject to various disabling events such 
as death, incapacity or bankruptcy. A Director may resign, subject to giving 90 
days' prior written notice to the other Directors if such resignation is likely 
to affect adversely the tax status of the Fund, and may be removed either by    
vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the Directors not subject to the removal vote or by 
a vote of Members holding not less than two-thirds (2/3) of the total number of 

B-40

P-->N-243rd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 43rd
votes eligible to be cast by all Members. In the event of any vacancy in the    
position of a Director, the remaining Directors may appoint an individual to    
serve as a Director so long as immediately after the appointment at least       
two-thirds (2/3) of the Directors then serving have been elected by Members. The
Board of Directors may call a meeting of Members to fill any vacancy in the     
position of a Director, and must do so within 60 days after any date on which   
Managers who were elected by Members cease to constitute a majority of the      
Directors then serving.                                                         

The following table sets forth certain information regarding the compensation   
expected to be received by the Directors who are not "interested persons" (as   
defined by the 1940 Act) of the Fund or the Adviser (the "Independent Directors 
") from the Fund and from all registered investment companies for which the     
Adviser or its affiliates serve as investment adviser for the fiscal year ending
March 31, 2010. No compensation is paid by the Fund to Directors who are        
"interested persons" (as defined by the 1940 Act) of the Fund or the Adviser.   
All of the Directors currently serving on the Board are Independent Directors.  

COMPENSATION TABLE FOR FISCAL YEAR
 ENDING MARCH 31, 2010

                                                                [Download Table]

                                   Pension or        Estimated                      
                              Retirement Benefits      Annual     Total Compensation
                Compensation  Accrued as Part of   Benefits Upon      from Fund     
NAME OF PERSON    FROM FUND      FUND EXPENSES       RETIREMENT       COMPLEX*      
--------------  ------------  -------------------  -------------  ------------------


*    The total compensation paid by the Fund Complex is estimated for the fiscal
    year ending March 31, 2010. The parenthetical number represents the number
     of affiliated investment companies (including the Fund and the Master Fund)
   from which such person receives compensation. The "Fund Complex" consists
  of Excelsior Directional Hedge Fund of Funds Master Fund, LLC, Excelsior
   Multi-Strategy Hedge Fund of Funds (TI 2), Excelsior Multi-Strategy Hedge
    Fund of Funds (TE 2), LLC, Excelsior Directional Hedge Fund of Funds (TI),
     LLC, Excelsior Directional Hedge Fund of Funds (TE), LLC, Excelsior Venture
     Partners III, LLC, Excelsior Venture Investors III, LLC, Excelsior Absolute
   Return Fund of Funds, LLC, Excelsior Absolute Return Fund of Funds Master
Fund, LLC, Excelsior Buyout Investors, LLC, UST Global Private Markets
    Fund, LLC, Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (TI 1), LLC, Grosvenor
 Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (TE), LLC, the Master Fund and the Fund.

     The Board of Directors is expected to form an Audit Committee, comprised of
the Independent Directors, which will be responsible for overseeing the Fund's  
accounting and financial reporting policies and practices, its internal controls
and, as appropriate, the internal controls of certain service providers and for 
acting as a liaison between the Fund's independent accountants and the Board    

     The Fund is expected to pay each of the Independent Directors a per meeting
fee of $500 for attendance at quarterly or special meetings of the Board of     
Directors (whether telephonic or in-person) and $1,000 for each Audit           
Committee meeting (whether telephonic or in-person). In addition, each          
Independent Director will receive an annual retainer in the aggregate amount of 
$10,000 ($11,000 for the chairman of the Audit Committee) from the Fund, the    
Master Fund, Grosvenor Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (TI 1), LLC and Grosvenor 
Registered Multi-Strategy Fund (TE), LLC, and Independent Directors are         
reimbursed for their reasonable out-of-pocket expenses. The Directors do not    
receive any pension or retirement benefits from the Fund.                       

        The following table sets forth the dollar range of equity securities
beneficially owned by each Director as of March 31, 2009.                       

B-41

P-->N-244th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 44th
                                                                [Download Table]

                                            Aggregate Dollar Range of
                                             Equity Securities of All
                                              Registered Investment  
                                              Companies Overseen by  
                   Dollar Range of Equity     Director in Family of  
Name of Director   Securities of the Fund     Investment Companies   
----------------   ----------------------   -------------------------


    No Independent Director owns beneficially or of record any security of the
Adviser or any person (other than a registered investment company) directly or  
indirectly controlling, controlled by or under common control with the Fund or  
the Adviser.                                                                    

ITEM 19. CONTROL PERSONS AND PRINCIPAL HOLDERS OF SECURITIES. 

As the sole member of the Registrant, Steven L. Suss is deemed to be a
control person of the Registrant. In addition, by virtue of Mr. Suss being an   
officer of the Adviser, the Adviser may be deemed a control person of the       
Registrant. However, Mr. Suss shall withdraw from the Fund immediately preceding
the commencement of operations of the Fund and, thus, at such time, the Adviser 
would no longer be deemed a control person of the Registrant. For purposes of   
this item, "control" means (1) the beneficial ownership, either directly or     
through one or more controlled companies, of more than 25 percent of the voting 
securities of a company; (2) the acknowledgment or assertion by either the      
controlled or controlling party of the existence of control; or (3) an          
adjudication under Section 2(a)(9) of the 1940 Act, which has become final, that
control exists.                                                                 

ITEM 20. INVESTMENT ADVISORY AND OTHER SERVICES. 

  The Adviser is a Delaware corporation and is registered as an investment
adviser under the Advisers Act. The Adviser serves as the investment adviser to 
registered investment companies and private investment companies. The offices of
the Adviser are located at 100 Federal Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02110 and  
its telephone number is 866-921-7951.                                           

    The Adviser is an indirect wholly-owned subsidiary of Bank of America. The
Adviser and the companies controlling the Adviser (including Bank of America)   
may be deemed to "control" the Fund, as such term is defined by the 1940 Act.   

  Bank of America, the Adviser and their affiliates are subject to certain
U.S. banking laws, including the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended   
(the "BHCA"), and to regulation by the Federal Reserve. None of Bank of America,
the Adviser or any of their affiliates expects to control the Fund or the Master
Fund for purposes of the BHCA. However, if Bank of America, directly or         
indirectly through its subsidiaries, makes capital contributions to the Fund or 
the Master Fund in an aggregate amount such that Bank of America may be deemed  
to control the Fund or the Master Fund for purposes of the BHCA, or if Bank of  
America is otherwise deemed to control the Fund or the Master Fund for purposes 
of the BHCA, the Fund or the Master Fund, as the case may be, may be subject to 
certain investment limitations and other limitations. For example, if Bank of   
America is deemed to control the Master Fund, the Master Fund may be unable to  
purchase securities of an Investment Fund (or other company) if the aggregate   
ownership of the Investment Fund by the Master Fund, when aggregated with the   
investments (if any) of Bank of America and its affiliates in such Investment   
Fund (or other company), equal 5% or more of the outstanding shares of any class
of voting securities or 25% or more of the total equity (including subordinated 
debt) of the Investment Fund (or other company). In addition,                   

B-42

P-->N-245th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 45th
other restrictions on the transactions and relationships between Bank of        
America, the Adviser and their affiliates, on the one hand, and the Fund or the 
Master Fund, on the other hand, may apply.                                      

   The Servicing Agent, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith, Incorporated,
provides certain investor and account maintenance services to the Fund. These   
services include, but are not limited to, handling Member inquiries regarding   
the Fund; assisting in the enhancement of communications between Members and the
Fund; notifying the Fund of any changes to Member information, such as changes  
of address; and providing such other information and Member services as the Fund
may reasonably request. As consideration for these services, the Fund pays a    
monthly Servicing Fee to the Servicing Agent at an annualized rate of 0.25% of  
the average net assets of the Fund determined as of the last business day of the
previous month (after adjustment for any subscriptions effective on that date). 
The Servicing Agent is an indirect subsidiary of Bank of America.               

    The Board of Directors has selected [     ] ("[     ]") as the independent
registered public accounting firm of the Fund. [     ]'s principal business     
address is located at [     ].                                                  

ITEM 21. PORTFOLIO MANAGERS 

Grosvenor's Investment Committee is responsible for overseeing the    
identification and evaluation of investment strategies and approving (or        
disapproving) the investment strategies in which the Master Fund may invest.    

OTHER FUNDS AND ACCOUNTS MANAGED                                                

   The table below provides information regarding the other accounts managed
by the Investment Committee as of June 30, 2009:                                

                                                        [Enlarge/Download Table]

                                                                 NUMBER OF                       
                                                                 ACCOUNTS                        
                                                                MANAGED  FOR      ASSETS MANAGED 
                                                               WHICH ADVISORY       FOR WHICH    
                                  NUMBER OF                        FEE IS          ADVISORY FEE  
                                   ACCOUNTS                      PERFORMANCE-     IS PERFORMANCE-
TYPE OF ACCOUNT                    MANAGED                         BASED(2)           BASED(3)   
---------------                   ---------                 --------------------  ---------------

DAVID B. SMALL                                                                                   
Registered Investment Companies       1       $450 million            1            $450 million  
Other pooled investment vehicles     33        $18 billion           21            $6.3 billion  
Other accounts                        1       $452 million            0                 N/A      

BRIAN A. WOLF                                                                                    
Registered Investment Companies       1       $450 million            1            $450 million  
Other pooled investment vehicles     39      $19.4 billion           20            $6.1 billion  
Other accounts                        1       $452 million            0                 N/A      

DAVID S. RICHTER                                                                                 
Registered Investment Companies       1       $450 million            1            $450 million  

B-43

P-->N-246th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 46th
                                                                [Download Table]
                                                                        
Other pooled investment vehicles  43  $19.7 billion  22   $6.4 billion  
Other accounts                     1   $452 million   0       N/A       

MICHAEL J. SACKS (4)                                                    
Registered Investment Companies    0       N/A       N/A        N/A     
Other pooled investment vehicles   5   $5.7 billion   1    $804 thousand
Other accounts                     0       N/A       N/A        N/A     

(1)  For purposes of this column, "master-feeder" structures, which may include 
multiple "feeder" funds, are counted as one account.                  

(2)  For purposes of this column, "feeders" into a "master fund" are counted as 
individual accounts where they have performance-based fees.           

(3)  Total AUM for each account is included. Note, however, that in some        
accounts, some investors may not be subject to performance-based fees.

(4)  Michael J. Sacks, Grosvenor's Chief Executive Officer, is not a member of  
     the Investment Committee, but has veto power over all decisions made by the
Investment Committee.                                                 

COMPENSATION STRUCTURE. Mr. Sacks and the members of the Investment   
Committee each receive a fixed base salary as well as an annual bonus based upon
the success of the firm. In addition, each holds an equity participation, which 
entitles him to distributions. Compensation is not based upon the performance or
net asset value of the Fund or any of the other accounts managed by the         
Investment Committee.                                                           

OWNERSHIP BY PORTFOLIO MANAGERS. As of the date of this Registration  
Statement, none of the individuals at Grosvenor responsible for the day-to-day  
investment management of the Master Fund owns any interests in the Master Fund. 

CONFLICTS OF INTEREST. Grosvenor is subject to significant conflicts of interest
in managing the business and affairs of the Master Fund and in making investment
decisions for the Master Fund. Such conflicts could affect Grosvenor's          
objectivity and the performance of the Master Fund. Certain of these conflicts  
are described below.                                                            

GENERAL                                                                         

 Grosvenor and its related persons (which, for purposes of this section,
include persons who are either currently or formerly related to Grosvenor) will 
not devote their full business time to the business and affairs of the Master   
Fund. Grosvenor and its related persons are free to engage in any other business
or act as investment adviser to or investment manager of any other person or    
entity, whether or not having investment objectives similar to those of the     
Master Fund, on terms (including terms relating to fees and liquidity) that are 
the same as or different from those available to the investors in the Master    
Fund. Nothing in the governing documents of the Master Fund limits or restricts 
the right of Grosvenor and its related persons to engage in and devote time and 
attention to other businesses or to render services of whatever kind or nature. 

     Grosvenor and its related persons are currently involved in, and may in the
future become involved in, other business ventures, including: (i) investing in,
entering into fee-, revenue- and/or profit-sharing agreements ("Fee Sharing     
Agreements") with, operating and/or managing other investment management or     
investment advisory firms ("Related Investment Management Firms"); and (ii)     
managing and/or administering other investment funds and accounts. The Master   
Fund will not share in the risks or                                             

B-44

P-->N-247th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 47th
rewards of such other ventures. Further, such other ventures will both compete  
with the Master Fund for the time and attention of Grosvenor and its related    
persons and potentially create additional conflicts of interest or raise other  
special considerations, as described more fully below. In addition, Grosvenor   
and its related persons, in investing and trading for accounts (including their 
proprietary accounts) other than the Master Fund, may make use of information   
obtained by them in the course of investing for the Master Fund. Grosvenor and  
its related persons will have no obligation to compensate the Master Fund in any
respect for their receipt of such information or to account to the Master Fund  
for any profits earned from their use of such information.                      

     Grosvenor personnel may discuss investment ideas with portfolio managers at
firms other than Grosvenor. Such discussions may be mutually beneficial, but may
under certain circumstances benefit third-parties with information developed in 
connection with operating the Master Fund (and for which the Master Fund has    
paid to develop). It is also possible that such discussions could ultimately    
prove to be detrimental to the Master Fund, although Grosvenor considers that   
possibility to be unlikely.                                                     

DIFFERENCES IN GROSVENOR-MANAGED ACCOUNTS                                       

Grosvenor and its related persons currently manage or advise numerous 
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts in addition to the Master Fund, and expect to manage 
or advise additional Grosvenor-Managed Accounts in the future. Certain of the   
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts have or will have investment objectives that are     
identical or substantially similar to those of the Master Fund. It is not       
anticipated, however, that the Master Fund and other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts 
having identical or substantially similar investment objectives will have       
identical or substantially similar investment portfolios. Differing investment  
portfolios can be expected to result from several factors, including, without   
limitation, the following:                                                      

-    different investment decisions made by the different Grosvenor   
  Portfolio Managers assigned to the different Grosvenor-Managed
Accounts;                                                   

-    regulatory and/or tax restrictions that apply to certain         
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts but not to others;               

   -    investment constraints imposed by the Investment Managers on certain
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts but not on others;               

-    the availability of particular Investment Funds for investment by
  Grosvenor-Managed Accounts at certain times but not at others;

-    different risk/return characteristics (notwithstanding that such 
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts generally have similar investment
objectives);                                                

   -    client-imposed portfolio management restrictions and/or other client
instructions; and                                           

-    the amount of cash available for investment by different         
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts at certain times.                

    As a result of factors such as these, the Master Fund may have a different
investment portfolio (and, as a result, different performance results) from     
other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts even though the Master Fund and such other     
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts may have identical or substantially similar          
investment objectives.                                                          

B-45

P-->N-248th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 48th
The Master Fund and other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts may be managed by
different Grosvenor Portfolio Managers even though the Master Fund and such     
other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts may have identical or substantially similar    
investment objectives. Grosvenor Portfolio Managers are authorized to invest the
assets of the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts for which they have investment         
responsibility in a wide range of Investment Funds. As a result, it is expected 
that the Master Fund and other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts will have different   
investment portfolios resulting from different investment decisions made by     
their respective Grosvenor Portfolio Managers, even if they have identical or   
substantially similar investment objectives. Further, the factors described     
above are likely to result in different portfolios for Grosvenor-Managed        
Accounts that are managed by the same Grosvenor Portfolio Managers, even though 
such Grosvenor-Managed Accounts have identical or substantially similar         
investment objectives.                                                          

Regulatory and/or tax restrictions may prohibit the Master Fund from  
participating in investment opportunities that are available to one or more     
other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. For example, certain Grosvenor Parties or     
their advisory clients (including other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts) have Fee    
Sharing Agreements with certain "early-stage" or "start-up" investment          
management firms ("Emerging Managers") pursuant to which they share in the fees,
revenues and/or profits of such Emerging Managers in exchange for "seeding" the 
Emerging Managers' operations. Also, as discussed above, Grosvenor Parties or   
their advisory clients (including other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts) have        
invested or may invest in, have entered into or may enter into Fee Sharing      
Agreements with, may operate and/or may manage Related Investment Management    
Firms. In certain cases, arrangements with Emerging Managers or Related         
Investment Management Firms enable Grosvenor Parties and their advisory clients 
to invest in Investment Funds sponsored by such Emerging Managers or Related    
Investment Management Firms on terms that are more favorable than those         
otherwise available to clients of such Emerging Managers or Related Investment  
Management Firms. Grosvenor does not intend to cause the Master Fund to enter   
into Fee Sharing Agreements with Emerging Managers or Related Investment        
Management Firms. Grosvenor does not intend to allocate the Master Fund's assets
to any Emerging Manager or Related Investment Management Firm in which any of   
the Grosvenor Parties has an investment or with whom any of Grosvenor Parties   
has a Fee Sharing Agreement.                                                    

 Similarly, the Investment Managers of the Investment Funds in which the
Master Fund wishes to invest may impose investment restrictions on the Master   
Fund but not on other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. Such restrictions could render
the Master Fund ineligible to invest, in whole or in part, in an Investment Fund
in which one or more other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts are free to invest, to the
possible detriment of the Master Fund.                                          

MULTIPLE GROSVENOR-MANAGED ACCOUNTS INVESTING IN THE SAME INVESTMENT FUND       

  A number of different Grosvenor-Managed Accounts (and persons associated
with Grosvenor) may invest or be invested in the same Investment Fund at the    
same time (although such parties may have made their respective investments in  
such Investment Fund at different times and, accordingly, may experience        
different investment results in connection with such investments). The ability  
of these different Grosvenor-Managed Accounts (and persons associated with      
Grosvenor) to withdraw/redeem from such Investment Fund may differ materially   
due to the timing of their respective investments in such Investment Fund, the  
different classes of interest in such Investment Fund in which they invest,     
special arrangements negotiated with the Investment Manager of such Investment  
Fund and/or other factors. The reasons why the various different                
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts (or persons associated with Grosvenor) may wish or be
compelled to withdraw/redeem from a particular Investment Fund also may differ  
materially. Similarly, the ability of the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts (or persons
associated with Grosvenor) to invest in a particular Investment Fund also may   
differ materially.                                                              

B-46

P-->N-249th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 49th
   Withdrawals/redemptions or subscriptions by one or more Grosvenor-Managed
Accounts (and/or by persons associated with Grosvenor) from or to a particular  
Investment Fund could in certain cases adversely affect other Grosvenor-Managed 
Accounts that are invested in such Investment Fund. Significant                 
withdrawals/redemptions or subscriptions could, for example, cause portfolio    
damage, portfolio dilution, depletion of liquidity, costly portfolio            
rebalancings, imposition of withdrawal "gates" and under-allocation to certain  
positions. In cases such as these, Grosvenor would have a conflict of interest  
in making withdrawals/redemptions or subscriptions for the Grosvenor-Managed    
Accounts. This conflict of interest could be exacerbated in situations where one
or more Grosvenor-Managed Accounts may withdraw/redeem from a particular        
Investment Fund as of a date as of which one or more other Grosvenor-Managed    
Accounts are not able to do so. For example, certain Grosvenor-Managed Accounts 
may have invested in a particular Investment Fund pursuant to a "lock-up" that  
has expired, whereas one or more other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts may still be  
subject to "lock-ups" in connection with their investments in such Investment   
Fund because they either (i) purchased their interests in such Investment Fund  
subsequent to the time that such other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts purchased     
their interests in such Investment Fund or (ii) opted for liquidity classes in  
such Investment Fund that are different from the liquidity classes owned by such
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. In addition, certain withdrawal/redemption "gates"  
are, for example, calculated based on withdrawals/redemptions during an entire  
quarter or other period, so that one or more Grosvenor-Managed Accounts'        
withdrawals/redemptions (and/or those of persons associated with Grosvenor)     
during a quarter could cause the gate to prevent one or more other              
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts withdrawing/redeeming at quarter-end, whereas the    
earlier withdrawals/redemptions are unaffected. Alternatively, certain          
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts may not be in a position to invest in an Investment  
Fund--due to lack of available cash, position concentration limits or other     
reasons--at the same time that other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts (and/or persons 
associated with Grosvenor) are able to do so, perhaps at a net asset value that 
Grosvenor believes is attractive from an investment standpoint. Grosvenor's     
management of one or more Grosvenor-Managed Accounts' investments in a          
particular Investment Fund could be adversely affected by Grosvenor's           
decision-making with respect to one or more other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts    
that are also invested in such Investment Fund.                                 

"AGGREGATION" OF GROSVENOR-MANAGED ACCOUNTS                                     

     In certain cases, Investment Funds may permit Grosvenor to "aggregate" some
or all of the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts invested in such Investment Fund I.E., 
all investments made by such Grosvenor-Managed Accounts will be treated as if   
they had been made by the same investor. Under arrangements such as these,      
certain Grosvenor-Managed Accounts could make complete withdrawals/redemptions  
under an individual investor "gate" provided that other Grosvenor-Managed       
Accounts did not withdraw/redeem, as the former Grosvenor-Managed Accounts could
make use of the withdrawal/redemption capacity allocable to the entire          
"aggregation group." Grosvenor thus has a conflict of interest in allocating    
"gate" capacity and other investment attributes among the Grosvenor-Managed     
Accounts included in the same "aggregation group." For example, if a            
Grosvenor-Managed Account that is part of an "aggregation group" were to receive
significant withdrawal/redemption requests, require liquidity for other reasons 
or rebalance its portfolio, it could withdraw/redeem from an aggregate          
investment and reduce withdrawal/redemption capacity for other members of the   
"aggregate group."                                                              

         In the case of certain Investment Funds, Grosvenor is able to negotiate
favorable business terms with their Investment Managers, but often on the       
condition that the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, collectively, maintain an        
aggregate minimum level of invested capital (I.E., capital invested by all      
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts) in a given Investment Fund or group of Investment   
Funds managed by                                                                

B-47

P-->N-250th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 50th
the same Investment Manager. The need to maintain an aggregate minimum          
investment by all Grosvenor-Managed Accounts in a particular Investment Fund or 
group of Investment Funds managed by the same Investment Manager in order to    
retain favorable business terms for all Grosvenor-Managed Accounts that invest  
in such Investment Fund(s) creates a conflict of interest in that it creates an 
incentive for Grosvenor to cause a Grosvenor-Managed Account to invest in or not
to withdraw/redeem from a given Investment Fund (or instead of                  
withdrawing/redeeming, to transfer an interest in such Investment Fund to       
another Grosvenor-Managed Account, which might not otherwise have invested in   
such Investment Fund) in order to maintain the minimum threshold investment.    
Grosvenor proprietary capital--whether invested directly in an Investment Fund  
or through a Grosvenor-Managed Account--may be among the capital which benefits 
from the minimum investment threshold being maintained, creating an additional  
conflict of interest.                                                           

TRANSFERS OF INTERESTS IN INVESTMENT FUNDS                                      

     The Grosvenor Portfolio Managers for one or more Grosvenor-Managed Accounts
(each, a "Divesting Account") may determine that it is appropriate for such     
Divesting Accounts to dispose of (or decrease) their investments in a particular
Investment Fund as of a particular date, while the Grosvenor Portfolio Managers 
for one or more other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts (each, an "Investing Account") 
may determine that it is appropriate for such Investing Accounts to invest (or  
increase their investments) in such Investment Fund as of the same date. In     
certain cases, Grosvenor will implement decisions such as these by causing a    
Divesting Account to withdraw/redeem its interest from an Investment Fund at the
net asset value thereof (as calculated and reported by the Investment Manager of
such Investment Fund), and simultaneously causing an Investing Account to invest
in an interest in such Investment Fund at the net asset value thereof. In other 
cases, Grosvenor will implement such decisions by causing a Divesting Account to
assign its interest in an Investment Fund to an Investing Account in exchange   
for a cash payment from the Investing Account equal to the reported net asset   
value if the interest being assigned to the Investing Account (as calculated and
reported by the Investment Manager of such Investment Fund).                    

For purposes of convenience:                                                    

-    Grosvenor refers to transactions of the types described above as 
      "transfers" (even though the first types of transactions described
above do not involve any transfer between the affected      
        Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, but only a divestment from an Investment
      Fund by one or more Grosvenor-Managed Accounts and a substantially
        simultaneous investment in such Investment Fund by one or more other
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts);                                

-    Grosvenor refers to a transaction in which a Divesting Account   
          withdraws/redeems its interest from an Investment Fund (in whole or in
    part) at the net asset value thereof, while an Investing Account
         substantially simultaneously invests (or increases its investment) in
such Investment Fund, as a "cash transfer;" and             

     -    Grosvenor refers to a transaction in which a Divesting Account assigns
       its interest in an Investment Fund (in whole or in part) at the net
 asset value thereof to an Investing Account, as a "book entry
transfer."                                                  

In no instance does any party, including Grosvenor or the Investment Manager of 
any affected Investment Fund, receive any additional compensation specifically  
as a result of any cash transfer or book entry transfer. However, the practice  
of engaging in cash transfers could create certain risks for                    
investors/participants in affected Grosvenor-Managed Accounts.                  

B-48

P-->N-251st Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 51st
    For example, in certain cases, Grosvenor is able to negotiate arrangements
with Investment Managers--either at the inception of Grosvenor's relationship   
with an Investment Manager or on a case-by-case basis after Grosvenor has       
established such a relationship--that permit a Grosvenor-Managed Account that is
the "cash transferee" of an interest in such Investment Manager's Investment    
Fund to "stand in the shoes" of the transferor Grosvenor-Managed Account for    
purposes of determining such business terms as the duration of any "lock-up     
period," the continuation of any performance/incentive fee or other             
performance/incentive compensation "loss carryforwards," the applicability of   
withdrawal charges, ETC. Grosvenor generally intends to take advantage, to the  
fullest extent permitted by law, of the ability of transferee Grosvenor-Managed 
Accounts to receive "carryover" business terms. In certain cases, however,      
regulatory considerations may prohibit Grosvenor from effecting transactions in 
which business terms are carried over from the transferor Grosvenor-Managed     
Account to the transferee Grosvenor-Managed Account. For example, the U.S.      
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA") does not  
permit any such "carryover" business terms to apply in the case of transfers of 
interests in Investment Funds by Grosvenor-Managed Accounts that are subject to 
ERISA to any other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, regardless of whether the        
transferee Grosvenor-Managed Accounts are subject to ERISA. ERISA, however, does
not appear to prohibit "carryover" business terms applying in the case of       
transfers from Grosvenor-Managed Accounts that are not subject to ERISA to      
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts that are subject to ERISA.                           

Further, in cases where there is "limited capacity" in a particular   
Investment Fund that Grosvenor determines to be an attractive investment        
opportunity and if Grosvenor has any reason to favor a particular               
Grosvenor-Managed Account over another Grosvenor-Managed Account, there is an   
incentive for Grosvenor to cause the "unfavored" Grosvenor-Managed Account to   
transfer its interest in such Investment Fund to the "favored" Grosvenor-Managed
Account.                                                                        

Similarly (and regardless of whether there is "limited capacity" in a 
particular Investment Fund), if the fee structure of a particular               
Grosvenor-Managed Account is more favorable to Grosvenor than the fee structure 
of another Grosvenor-Managed Account, the ability to cause such                 
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts to participate in "carryover" transfers of interests 
in such Investment Fund creates an incentive for Grosvenor to cause the account 
having an "unfavorable" fee structure to transfer a "winning" position to the   
account having a "favorable" fee structure, or to cause the account having a    
"favorable" fee structure to transfer a "losing" position to the account having 
an unfavorable fee structure.                                                   

INVESTMENTS BY GROSVENOR, ITS RELATED PERSONS AND GROSVENOR-MANAGED ACCOUNTS    

     Grosvenor and its related persons may invest in Grosvenor-Managed Accounts.
In addition, Grosvenor, its related persons and one or more Grosvenor-Managed   
Accounts may place assets under the management of, or otherwise procure         
investment advisory or investment management services from, any Investment      
Manager directly or indirectly used by one or more other Grosvenor-Managed      
Accounts, including the Master Fund. Without limiting the generality of the     
foregoing, Grosvenor, its related persons and one or more Grosvenor-Managed     
Accounts may invest in, or withdraw/redeem investments from, an Investment Fund 
in which the Master Fund and/or one or more other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts are
invested, from which they are withdrawing/redeeming their investments or in     
which they are not invested.                                                    

     In certain instances, Grosvenor may be required to allocate limited
investment opportunities in Investment Funds among Grosvenor, its related       
persons, the Master Fund and other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. Grosvenor has    
developed policies and procedures for allocating limited investment             
opportunities in a manner that it believes to be equitable to Grosvenor, its    
related persons and the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts (including the Master Fund). 
Under these policies and procedures, to the                                     

B-49

P-->N-252nd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 52nd
extent that Grosvenor, its related persons and one or more Grosvenor-Managed    
Accounts (each of the foregoing, a "Participating Account") wish to invest in a 
particular Investment Fund (and have funds available to make such investment)   
but such Investment Fund has "limited capacity" and is willing to accept only a 
portion of the aggregate investment that Grosvenor, its related persons and such
Grosvenor-Managed Account(s) wish to make, the aggregate capacity made available
by such Investment Fund to the Participating Accounts generally is allocated to 
each Participating Account in the proportion that the amount such Participating 
Account wishes to invest bears to the aggregate amount that all Participating   
Accounts wish to invest, subject to certain exceptions set forth in such        
policies and procedures. Grosvenor and its related persons also may participate 
in limited investment opportunities through their investments in                
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts that participate in such opportunities. In certain   
cases, Grosvenor may determine that it and/or its related persons shall not     
directly participate in an Investment Fund that has "limited capacity" unless   
and until all Grosvenor-Managed Accounts that wish to invest in such Investment 
Fund (including, for this purpose, Grosvenor-Managed Accounts in which Grosvenor
and/or its related persons participate) have invested the full amount of capital
they wish to invest in such Investment Fund.                                    

   Grosvenor, its related persons and one or more Grosvenor-Managed Accounts
that place assets under the management of, or otherwise procure investment      
advisory or investment management services from, any Investment Manager directly
or indirectly used by the Master Fund and/or one or more other Grosvenor-Managed
Accounts may do so on terms (including terms relating to fees and liquidity)    
that are more advantageous than those applicable to the investments that may be 
made by the Master Fund and/or such other Grosvenor-Managed Account(s) with such
Investment Manager. To the extent that Grosvenor or its related persons invest  
with a given Investment Manager on terms that are more advantageous than those  
on which the Master Fund and/or one or more other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts may
invest with such Investment Manager, Grosvenor and its related persons may have 
an incentive to maintain or increase the investment by the Master Fund and such 
other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts with such Investment Manager in order to obtain
and/or maintain such advantageous terms for the benefit of Grosvenor and its    
related persons.                                                                

   Grosvenor and its related persons may from time to time invest, for their
respective proprietary accounts, in early-stage Investment Funds (including     
Non-Advised Funds, as defined below), at times when investments in such         
Investment Funds would not be appropriate for the Master Fund or other          
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. If Grosvenor should subsequently determine, in      
accordance with its then-current criteria applicable to the selection of        
Investment Funds for the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, that such an Investment    
Fund is an appropriate investment for the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, Grosvenor 
and its related persons will not be required to restructure the terms on which  
they invest in such Investment Fund in order to make investments in such        
Investment Fund available to the Master Fund if, for regulatory or other        
reasons, the Master Fund would be (or, in Grosvenor's reasonable determination, 
may be) precluded from investing in such Investment Fund in the absence of such 
restructuring.                                                                  

   Grosvenor and its related persons may from time to time invest, for their
respective proprietary accounts, in certain investment funds that are           
administered, but not advised, by Grosvenor (the "Non-Advised Funds") and from  
which they receive administrative or similar fees. In many cases, such          
investments may be made at times when investments in the Non-Advised Funds are  
not appropriate for Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. If Grosvenor should subsequently
determine, in accordance with its then-current criteria applicable to the       
selection of Investment Funds for the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, that such a   
Non-Advised Fund is an appropriate investment for the Grosvenor-Managed         
Accounts, Grosvenor may cause the Master Fund and/or one or more other          
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts to invest in such Non-Advised Fund even though       
Grosvenor continues to receive administrative or similar                        

B-50

P-->N-253rd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 53rd
fees from such Non-Advised Fund. Moreover, Grosvenor will not be required to    
reduce, eliminate or restructure the administrative or similar fees it receives 
from such Non-Advised Fund in order to make investments in such Non-Advised Fund
available to the Master Fund if, for regulatory or other reasons, the Master    
Fund would be (or, in Grosvenor's reasonable determination, may be) precluded   
from investing in such Non-Advised Fund in the absence of such fee reduction,   
elimination or restructuring.                                                   

POSSIBLE INCENTIVE TO FAVOR ONE OR MORE GROSVENOR-MANAGED ACCOUNTS OVER THE     
MASTER FUND                                                                     

    A Grosvenor Portfolio Manager might have an incentive to favor one or more
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts over the Master Fund (for example, with regard to the
selection of Investment Funds for those Grosvenor-Managed Accounts or the       
allocation of investment opportunities in Investment Funds that have limited    
investment capacity), because the "favored" Grosvenor-Managed Accounts might pay
Grosvenor more for its services than the Master Fund. Similarly, a Grosvenor    
Portfolio Manager may have an incentive to favor one or more Grosvenor-Managed  
Accounts over the Master Fund if such Grosvenor Portfolio Manager has a personal
investment in such "favored" Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. No assurance can be    
given that (i) the Master Fund will participate in all investment opportunities 
in which other client or proprietary accounts of Grosvenor and its related      
persons participate, (ii) particular investment opportunities allocated to      
client or proprietary accounts of Grosvenor and its related persons other than  
the Master Fund will not outperform investment opportunities allocated to the   
Master Fund, or (iii) the Master Fund, on the one hand, and other               
similarly-situated client and proprietary accounts of Grosvenor and its related 
persons, on the other hand, will receive equal or similar treatment.            

DIFFERENT REPORTING PACKAGES                                                    

Different participants in the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, as well as  
certain other persons (including persons who currently have, or who previously  
have had, a direct or indirect interest in Grosvenor or who otherwise currently 
are, or who previously have been, associated with Grosvenor), receive oral      
and/or written reports from Grosvenor that differ in form, substance, level of  
detail, timing and/or frequency, based on factors such as: (i) the size of their
investments in the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts; (ii) requests for specific types 
of information made by such participants or persons acting on their behalf;     
(iii) negotiations between Grosvenor and such participants or other persons     
acting on their behalf; and/or (iv) Grosvenor's internal assessment of the      
likely reporting needs of such participants or of persons acting on their       
behalf.                                                                         

In particular, certain reports may include information relating to    
Investment Funds in which the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, including the Master  
Fund, invest (or in which they are contemplating an investment).                

  Grosvenor ordinarily does not place restrictions on a recipient's use of
the information contained in such reports. A recipient could, for example, use  
information that has not been provided to other recipients to determine whether 
to:                                                                             

-    withdraw/redeem from a Grosvenor-Managed Account or increase its 
investment in a Grosvenor-Managed Account;                  

 -    invest directly in Investment Funds in which the Grosvenor-Managed
       Accounts, including the Master Fund, are invested (or in which they
       are contemplating investments), potentially in competition with the
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, including the Master Fund; or   

B-51

P-->N-254th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 54th
   -    withdraw/redeem from Investment Funds in which the Grosvenor-Managed
         Accounts, including the Master Fund, are invested (or from which they
are contemplating withdrawing/redeeming their investments), 
   potentially to the detriment of the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts,
including the Master Fund.                                  

RECEIPT OF SENSITIVE INFORMATION                                                

  Grosvenor may from time to time receive, from Investment Managers of the
Investment Funds in which the Grosvenor-Managed Accounts invest, information    
that is not generally known to other investors in such Investment Funds. In     
these cases, legal or regulatory constraints could prevent Grosvenor from acting
in the manner in which it otherwise would act on behalf of one or more          
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts, including the Master Fund.                          

PROXY VOTING                                                                    

Grosvenor has developed certain policies and procedures to manage the 
conflicts of interest that may arise in connection with voting proxies on behalf
of the Master Fund and the other Grosvenor-Managed Accounts. These policies and 
procedures are summarized in Schedule F of Part II of Grosvenor's SEC Form ADV. 

TRADE AND CLERICAL ERRORS                                                       

Subject to the considerations set forth below, Grosvenor is under no  
obligation to reimburse the Master Fund for any errors or mistakes made by      
Grosvenor, its employees or agents with respect to Grosvenor's placing or       
executing trades for the Master Fund or for any other administrative or clerical
errors or mistakes made by the foregoing (collectively, "Trade or Clerical      
Errors"), as Grosvenor considers such errors and mistakes to be a cost of doing 
business. However, pursuant to the standard of care provisions of the governing 
documents of the Master Fund, Grosvenor will be obligated to reimburse the      
Master Fund for losses sustained by the Master Fund as a result of any Trade or 
Clerical Error that is caused by Grosvenor's failure to adhere to the standard  
of care set forth in such provisions. Grosvenor, subject to its fiduciary       
obligations, will determine: (i) whether or not any Trade or Clerical Error is  
required to be reimbursed in accordance with such standard of care provisions;  
and (ii) if so, the extent of the loss that has been incurred by the Master     
Fund. Grosvenor has an inherent conflict of interest with respect to determining
whether or not a Trade or Clerical Error is required to be reimbursed in        
accordance with the applicable standard of care provisions and with respect to  
determining the extent of the loss that has been incurred by the Master Fund. If
a Trade or Clerical Error occurs other than as a result of Grosvenor's failure  
to adhere to the applicable standard of care, Grosvenor, in its sole discretion,
reserves the right to reimburse the Master Fund for any losses sustained by the 
Master Fund as a result of such Trade or Clerical Error. Grosvenor's            
reimbursement of the Master Fund for a Trade or Clerical Error in such a        
situation will not constitute a waiver of Grosvenor's general policy to cause   
the Master Fund to bear the losses associated with other Trade or Clerical      
Errors that occur other than as a result of Grosvenor's failure to adhere to the
applicable standard of care. Any net gain resulting from Trade or Clerical      
Errors will be for the benefit of the Master Fund and will not be retained by   
Grosvenor.                                                                      

OTHER CONSIDERATIONS                                                            

Grosvenor ordinarily will not cause the Master Fund to incur brokerage
commissions in connection with its investments in Investment Funds (which are,  
and are expected to continue to be, the primary focus of the Master Fund's      
investment activities). However, Grosvenor may from time to time cause the      
Master Fund to: (i) engage in limited hedging transactions; (ii) make Direct    
Investments; and/or (iii) invest in bank demand deposit accounts and/or         
high-quality, short-term instruments that earn interest                         

B-52

P-->N-255th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 55th
at competitive rates (and/or in commingled investment products (E.G., "money    
market" funds) that invest in such instruments). In these cases, Grosvenor will 
have the authority to determine the financial intermediaries to be used in      
connection with such transactions and to negotiate the amount of commission or  
other compensation to be paid to such intermediaries in connection with such    
transactions. Grosvenor will negotiate such compensation on a case-by-case basis
and will not seek to obtain products, research or services other than           
transactional services from such intermediaries.                                

   Certain of the Investment Funds in which the Master Fund invests may hold
notes or other securities issued from time to time by Grosvenor, and Grosvenor  
may be aware that such Investment Funds do so. The fact that certain Investment 
Funds may hold notes or other securities issued by Grosvenor could, under       
certain facts and circumstances, potentially alter Grosvenor's objectivity in   
determining whether or not to invest in such Investment Funds and/or whether or 
not to withdraw/redeem from such Investment Funds. Grosvenor, however, does not 
expect that it would ever make portfolio management decisions for the Master    
Fund that would be different from the decisions it would make for the Master    
Fund if such potential conflict did not exist.                                  

Grosvenor and its principals, and the Investment Managers and their   
principals, may engage in philanthropic activities through contributions of     
their time and/or financial resources to charitable organizations. Grosvenor and
its principals, on the one hand, and the Investment Managers and their          
principals, on the other hand, may from time to time ask each other to          
participate in their respective philanthropic activities. Grosvenor and its     
principals, and the Investment Managers and their principals, are free to       
participate in philanthropic opportunities brought to their attention by one    
another. Under no circumstances will such participation or lack thereof be a    
factor in Grosvenor's investment management process.                            

     Similarly, Grosvenor and its principals, and investors in Grosvenor-Managed
Accounts and their principals, may engage in philanthropic activities through   
contributions of their time and/or financial resources to charitable            
organizations. Grosvenor and its principals, on the one hand, and investors in  
Grosvenor-Managed Accounts and their principals, on the other hand, may from    
time to time ask each other to participate in their respective philanthropic    
activities. Grosvenor and its principals, and investors in Grosvenor-Managed    
Accounts and their principals, are free to participate in philanthropic         
opportunities brought to their attention by one another. Under no circumstances 
will such participation or lack thereof be a factor in Grosvenor's investment   
management process.                                                             

    Grosvenor has frequent interaction with consultants and financial advisors
who represent prospective and existing investors in the Grosvenor-Managed       
Accounts, including investors that are subject to ERISA. Grosvenor does not pay 
these consultants or financial advisors to recommend any Grosvenor-Managed      
Account to their clients. However, consultants and financial advisors have from 
time to time invited Grosvenor and its principals to participate in particular  
philanthropic activities, and can be expected to continue to do so in the       
future. Grosvenor has participated in such philanthropic activities in the past 
and can be expected to continue to do so in the future. Under no circumstances  
will such participation or lack thereof be a factor in Grosvenor's investment   
management process.                                                             

 Grosvenor from time to time provides meals and entertainment to persons
associated with consultants, financial advisors, clients and prospective        
clients. In certain cases, Grosvenor may provide such meals and entertainment to
clients or prospective clients at the request of consultants, financial planners
or other third-parties.                                                         

B-53

P-->N-256th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 56th
  Grosvenor may from time to time compensate unaffiliated third-parties in
connection with Grosvenor's participation in investor introduction conferences  
sponsored by such third-parties in which Grosvenor meets with prospective       
investors introduced to Grosvenor by such third-parties.                        

 Grosvenor may from time to time enter into arrangements with consulting
firms that represent existing and prospective clients, pursuant to which such   
consulting firms provide Grosvenor certain performance or other data on the     
"fund of funds" industry. Grosvenor may compensate such consulting firm for such
services on an annual flat-fee or other basis. In no event will Grosvenor enter 
into any such arrangement unless it first determines to its reasonable          
satisfaction that the firm that provides services to Grosvenor for compensation 
from Grosvenor discloses that fact to all clients to whom it recommends         
Grosvenor.                                                                      

   Persons associated with Grosvenor may be related by blood or marriage to,
or otherwise have personal relationships with, persons associated with          
consulting firms. In certain cases, such persons associated with consulting     
firms may be responsible for: (i) analyzing and/or monitoring "fund of funds"   
investment managers on behalf of such consulting firms; (ii) recommending "fund 
of funds" investment managers to the investment committees or similar governing 
committees of such consulting firms; (iii) selecting the "funds of funds"       
investment managers that such consulting firms will present to their clients as 
potential managers of such clients' assets; (iv) recommending particular "fund  
of funds" investment managers to clients of such consulting firms; (v)          
recommending that clients of such consulting firms continue to retain the       
services of, or discharge, "fund of funds" investment managers; and/or (vi)     
otherwise playing an instrumental role in the process whereby clients of such   
consulting firms select, and/or retain or discharge, "fund of funds" investment 
managers. In cases where persons associated with consulting firms have one or   
more responsibilities of the types described above and are related by blood or  
marriage to, or otherwise have personal relationships with, persons associated  
with Grosvenor, such persons may have an incentive to select Grosvenor as a     
potential manager of the assets of clients of such consulting firms, to         
recommend Grosvenor to clients of such consulting firms and/or to recommend that
clients of such consulting firms continue to utilize Grosvenor's services.      
Grosvenor believes that is the responsibility of consulting firms to recuse     
interested individuals or take other appropriate steps to protect the integrity 
of their decision-making processes, and to make appropriate disclosures of      
potential conflicts of interest to their clients. Grosvenor urges prospective   
investors who utilize the services of consulting firms to inquire of such       
consulting firms whether they are subject to such a conflict of interest.       

GROSVENOR'S FIDUCIARY DUTIES                                                    

    Grosvenor has fiduciary duties to the Master Fund to act in good faith and
with fairness in all its dealings with the Master Fund. Grosvenor will take such
duties into account in dealing with all actual and potential conflicts of       
interest.                                                                       

THE INVESTMENT MANAGERS 

    The Investment Managers are likely to be subject to many of the same types
of conflicts of interest to which Grosvenor is subject. For example, the        
Investment Managers may be involved in other business ventures, including the   
management and/or administration of other investment funds and accounts whose   
investment objectives are identical or substantially similar to those of the    
Investment Funds. The Master Fund will not share in the risks or rewards of such
other ventures. In addition, such other ventures will compete with the relevant 
Investment Funds for the time and attention of the relevant Investment Managers,
and might create additional conflicts of interest or raise other special        
considerations.                                                                 

B-54

P-->N-257th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 57th
The Investment Managers have responsibility for investing the capital 
allocated to them. The Investment Managers also manage other accounts (including
other accounts in which they may have an interest) and may have financial and   
other incentives to favor such accounts over the Investment Funds in which the  
Master Fund invests. In investing on behalf of other clients, as well as the    
Investment Funds in which the Master Fund invests, the Investment Managers must 
allocate their resources, as well as limited market opportunities. Doing so     
could increase the level of competition for the same trades that otherwise might
be made for the Investment Funds in which the Master Fund invests, including the
priorities of order entry, as well as make it difficult or impossible to take or
liquidate a particular position at a price indicated by an Investment Manager's 
strategy.                                                                       

   In addition, in connection with investing and trading for other accounts,
including their proprietary accounts, the Investment Managers may make use of   
information obtained by them in the course of investing and trading for the     
Investment Funds. They will have no obligation to compensate the Investment     
Funds in any respect for their receipt of such information or to account to any 
such Investment Fund for any profits earned from their use of such information. 

The Investment Managers and their principals, in managing investment  
accounts other than the Investment Funds, may employ trading methods, policies  
and strategies which differ from those which they employ on behalf of such      
Investment Funds. Therefore, the results of the Master Fund's investments in    
such Investment Funds may differ from the results of other accounts managed by  
such Investment Managers.                                                       

     The Investment Managers value the illiquid, longer-term investments held by
their Investment Funds in a variety of different ways, and have considerable    
discretion in doing so. The Investment Managers have a conflict of interest in  
arriving at such valuations, which affect both the performance of their         
Investment Funds and the advisory compensation received by the Investment       
Managers.                                                                       

   The Investment Managers have a conflict of interest in allocating capital
to longer-term and/or illiquid investments. While such positions may hold       
significant profit potential (and, therefore, the potential to generate         
substantial performance/incentive fees or other performance/incentive           
compensation), they can create material valuation and illiquidity risks for     
investors. In addition, performance/incentive fees or other                     
performance/incentive compensation may be calculated separately in respect of   
certain longer-term and/or illiquid investments irrespective of the overall     
performance of an Investment Fund.                                              

The Investment Managers select the brokers and dealers that execute   
transactions for their respective Investment Funds and negotiate the related    
brokerage commissions and other transaction costs. In selecting brokers and     
dealers and/or in negotiating commissions and other compensation, Investment    
Managers (subject to their overall duty to obtain "best execution" of all       
transactions for the Investment Funds they manage):                             

   -    have authority to and may consider the full range and quality of the
 services and products provided by various brokers and dealers
        (including factors such as the ability of the brokers and dealers to
execute transactions efficiently, their responsiveness to   
instructions, their facilities, reliability and financial   
      responsibility, and the value of any research or other services or
products they provide); and                                 

   -    do not necessarily select brokers and dealers that charge the lowest
transaction costs.                                          

B-55

P-->N-258th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 58th
     An Investment Manager may cause an Investment Fund to pay transaction costs
to a broker or dealer even though such Investment Manager and/or clients of such
Investment Manager other than such Investment Fund are the exclusive            
beneficiaries of non-execution related products and services provided by such   
broker or dealer.                                                               

Grosvenor is authorized to consent on behalf of the Master Fund to the
Investment Managers engaging in "soft dollar" practices, regardless of whether  
such practices conform to the requirements of Section 28(e) of the Securities   
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.                                               

FUND OWNERSHIP                                                                  

As of the date of this Registration Statement, the members of the     
Investment Committee do not own Interests.                                      

ITEM 22. BROKERAGE ALLOCATION AND OTHER PRACTICES. 

The Investment Managers select the brokers and dealers that execute   
transactions for their respective Investment Funds and negotiate the related    
brokerage commissions and other transaction costs. In selecting brokers and     
dealers and/or in negotiating commissions and other compensation, Investment    
Managers (subject to their overall duty to obtain "best execution" of all       
transactions for the Investment Funds they manage):                             

   -    have authority to and may consider the full range and quality of the
 services and products provided by various brokers and dealers
        (including factors such as the ability of the brokers and dealers to
execute transactions efficiently, their responsiveness to   
instructions, their facilities, reliability and financial   
      responsibility, and the value of any research or other services or
products they provide); and                                 

   -    do not necessarily select brokers and dealers that charge the lowest
transaction costs.                                          

     An Investment Manager may cause an Investment Fund to pay transaction costs
to a broker or dealer even though such Investment Manager and/or clients of such
Investment Manager other than such Investment Fund are the exclusive            
beneficiaries of non-execution related products and services provided by such   
broker or dealer.                                                               

    Grosvenor is authorized to consent on behalf of the Fund to the Investment
Managers engaging in "soft dollar" practices, regardless of whether such        
practices conform to the requirements of Section 28(e) of the Securities        
Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.                                               

ITEM 23. TAX STATUS. 

       TAX ELECTIONS; RETURNS; TAX AUDITS. The Code generally provides for
optional adjustments to the basis of partnership property upon distributions of 
partnership property to a partner and transfers of partnership interests        
(including by reason of death) provided that a partnership election has been    
made pursuant to Section 754. Under the LLC Agreement, the Board of Directors,  
in its sole discretion, may cause the Fund to make such an election. Any such   
election, once made, cannot be revoked without the Service's consent. The actual
effect of any such election may depend upon whether any Investment Partnership  
also makes such an election. As a result of the complexity and added expense of 
the tax accounting required to implement such an election, the Board of         
Directors presently does not intend to make such election.                      

B-56

P-->N-259th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 59th
         The Board of Directors decides how to report the partnership items on
the Fund's tax returns, and all Members are required under the Code to treat the
items consistently on their own returns, unless they file a statement with the  
Service disclosing the inconsistency. Given the uncertainty and complexity of   
the tax laws, it is possible that the Service may not agree with the manner in  
which the Fund's items have been reported. In the event the income tax returns  
of the Fund are audited by the Service, the tax treatment of the Fund's income  
and deductions generally is determined at the limited liability company level in
a single proceeding rather than by individual audits of Members. A Member chosen
by the Board of Directors and designated as the "Tax Matters Partner", has      
considerable authority to make decisions affecting the tax treatment and        
procedural rights of all Members. In addition, the Tax Matters Partner has the  
authority to bind certain Members to settlement agreements and the right on     
behalf of all Members to extend the statute of limitations relating to Members' 
tax liabilities with respect to Fund items.                                     

        MANDATORY BASIS ADJUSTMENTS. Each of the Fund and the Master Fund is
generally required to adjust its tax basis in its assets in respect of all      
members in cases of partnership distributions that result in a "substantial     
basis reduction" (i.e., in excess of $250,000) in respect of the partnership's  
property. Each of the Fund and the Master Fund is also required to adjust its   
tax basis in its assets in respect of a transferee, in the case of a sale or    
exchange of an interest, or a transfer upon death, when there exists a          
"substantial built-in loss" (i.e., in excess of $250,000) in respect of         
partnership property immediately after the transfer. For this reason, the Fund  
will require: (i) a Member who receives a distribution from the Fund in         
connection with a complete withdrawal; (ii) a transferee of an Interest         
(including a transferee in case of death); and (iii) any other Member in        
appropriate circumstances to provide the Fund with information regarding its    
adjusted tax basis in its Interest.                                             

       DISTRIBUTIONS OF PROPERTY. A partner's receipt of a distribution of
property from a partnership is generally not taxable. However, under Section 731
of the Code, a distribution consisting of marketable securities generally is    
treated as a distribution of cash (rather than property) unless the distributing
partnership is an "investment partnership" within the meaning of Section        
731(c)(3)(C)(i) and the recipient is an "eligible partner" within the meaning of
Section 731(c)(3)(C)(iii). The Fund will determine at the appropriate time      
whether it qualifies as an "investment partnership." Assuming it so qualifies,  
if a Member is an "eligible partner", which term should include a Member whose  
contributions to the Fund consisted solely of cash and/or securities, the rule  
treating a distribution of property as a distribution of cash would not apply.  

      SECTION 1256 CONTRACTS. In the case of Section 1256 Contracts, the
Code generally applies a "mark-to-market" system of taxing unrealized gains and 
losses on such contracts and otherwise provides for special rules of taxation. A
Section 1256 Contract includes certain regulated futures contracts and certain  
other contracts. Under these rules, Section 1256 Contracts held by the Fund at  
the end of each taxable year of the Fund are treated for Federal income tax     
purposes as if they were sold by the Fund for their fair market value on the    
last business day of such taxable year. The net gain or loss, if any, resulting 
from such deemed sales (known as "marking to market"), together with any gain or
loss resulting from actual sales of Section 1256 Contracts, must be taken into  
account by the Fund in computing its taxable income for such year. If a Section 
1256 Contract held by the Fund at the end of a taxable year is sold in the      
following year, the amount of any gain or loss realized on such sale will be    
adjusted to reflect the gain or loss previously taken into account under the    
"mark-to-market" rules.                                                         

       With certain exceptions, capital gains and losses from such Section
1256 Contracts generally are characterized as short-term capital gains or losses
to the extent of 40% thereof and as long-term capital gains or losses to the    
extent of 60% thereof. If an individual taxpayer incurs a net capital loss for a
year, the portion thereof, if any, which consists of a net loss on Section 1256 
Contracts may, at the                                                           

B-57

P-->N-260th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 60th
election of the taxpayer, be carried back three years. Losses so carried back   
may be deducted only against net capital gain to the extent that such gain      
includes gains on Section 1256 Contracts. A Section 1256 Contract does not      
include any "securities futures contract" or any option on such a contract,     
other than a "dealer securities futures contract" (SEE "Certain Securities
Futures Contracts").                                                            

CERTAIN SECURITIES FUTURES CONTRACTS. Generally, a securities futures
contract is a contract of sale for future delivery of a single security or a    
narrow-based security index. Any gain or loss from the sale or exchange of a    
securities futures contract (other than a "dealer securities futures contract") 
is treated as gain or loss from the sale or exchange of property that has the   
same character as the property to which the contract relates has (or would have)
in the hands of the taxpayer. If the underlying security would be a capital     
asset in the taxpayer's hands, then gain or loss from the sale or exchange of   
the securities futures contract would be capital gain or loss. Capital gain or  
loss from the sale or exchange of a securities futures contract to sell property
(i.e., the short side of a securities futures contract) generally will be       
short-term capital gain or loss.                                                

       A "dealer securities futures contract" is treated as a Section 1256
Contract. A "dealer securities futures contract" is a securities futures        
contract, or an option to enter into such a contract, that: (i) is entered into 
by a dealer (or, in the case of an option, is purchased or granted by the       
dealer) in the normal course of its trade or business activity of dealing in the
contracts; and (ii) is traded on a qualified board of trade or exchange.        

          MIXED STRADDLE ELECTION. The Code allows a taxpayer to elect to offset
gains and losses from positions which are part of a "mixed straddle." A "mixed  
straddle" is any straddle in which one or more but not all positions are Section
1256 Contracts. Pursuant to Temporary Regulations, the Fund (and any Investment 
Partnership) may be eligible to elect to establish one or more mixed straddle   
accounts for certain of its mixed straddle trading positions. The mixed straddle
account rules require a daily "marking to market" of all open positions in the  
account and a daily netting of gains and losses from positions in the account.  
At the end of a taxable year, the annual net gains or losses from the mixed     
straddle account are recognized for tax purposes. The application of the        
Temporary Regulations' mixed straddle account rules is not entirely clear.      
Therefore, there is no assurance that a mixed straddle account election by the  
Fund will be accepted by the Service.                                           

        POSSIBLE "MARK-TO-MARKET" ELECTION. To the extent that an Investment
Partnership is directly engaged in a trade or business as a trader in           
"commodities" or "securities," it may elect under Section 475 of the Code to    
"mark-to-market" the commodities or securities held in connection with such     
trade or business. Under such election, commodities or securities held by such  
Investment Partnership at the end of each taxable year will be treated as if    
they were sold by the Investment Partnership for their fair market value on the 
last day of such taxable year, and gains or losses recognized thereon will be   
treated as ordinary income or loss. Moreover, even if the Investment Partnership
determines that its securities activities will constitute trading rather than   
investing, there can be no assurance that the Service will agree, in which case 
the Investment Partnership may not be able to mark-to-market its positions.     

        SHORT SALES. Gain or loss from a short sale of property is generally
considered as capital gain or loss to the extent the property used to close the 
short sale constitutes a capital asset in the Fund's hands. Except with respect 
to certain situations where the property used to close a short sale has a       
long-term holding period on the date the short sale is entered into, gains on   
short sales generally are short-term capital gains. A loss on a short sale will 
be treated as a long-term capital loss if, on the date of the short sale,       
"substantially identical property" has been held by the Fund for more than one  
year. In addition, these rules may also terminate the running of the holding    
period of "substantially identical property" held by the Fund.                  

B-58

P-->N-261st Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 61st
          Gain or loss on a short sale will generally not be realized until such
time that the short sale is closed. However, if the Fund holds a short sale     
position with respect to stock, certain debt obligations or partnership         
interests that has appreciated in value and then acquires property that is the  
same as or substantially identical to the property sold short, the Fund         
generally will recognize gain on the date it acquires such property as if the   
short sale were closed on such date with such property. Similarly, if the Fund  
holds an appreciated financial position with respect to stock, certain debt     
obligations, or partnership interests and then enters into a short sale with    
respect to the same or substantially identical property, the Fund generally will
recognize gain as if the appreciated financial position were sold at its fair   
market value on the date it enters into the short sale. The subsequent holding  
period for any appreciated financial position that is subject to these          
constructive sale rules will be determined as if such position were acquired on 
the date of the constructive sale.                                              

         EFFECT OF STRADDLE RULES ON MEMBERS' POSITIONS. The Service may treat
certain positions held (directly or indirectly) by a Member and its indirect    
interest in similar positions held by the Fund as "straddles" for Federal income
tax purposes. Investors should consult their tax advisors regarding the         
application of the "straddle" rules to their investment in the Fund.            

LIMITATION ON DEDUCTIBILITY OF INTEREST AND SHORT SALE EXPENSES. For
noncorporate taxpayers, Section 163(d) of the Code limits the deduction for     
"investment interest" (I.E., interest or short sale expenses for "indebtedness  
properly allocable to property held for investment"). Investment interest is not
deductible in the current year to the extent that it exceeds the taxpayer's "net
investment income," consisting of net gain and ordinary income derived from     
investments in the current year less certain directly connected expenses (other 
than interest or short sale expenses). For this purpose, Qualified Dividends and
long-term capital gains are excluded from net investment income unless the      
taxpayer elects to pay tax on such amounts at ordinary income tax rates.        

     For purposes of this provision, the Fund's activities (other than
certain activities that are treated as "passive activities" under Section 469 of
the Code) will be treated as giving rise to investment income for a Member, and 
the investment interest limitation would apply to a noncorporate Member's share 
of the interest and short sale expenses attributable to the Fund's operation. In
such case, a noncorporate Member would be denied a deduction for all or part of 
that portion of its distributive share of the Fund's ordinary losses            
attributable to interest and short sale expenses unless it had sufficient       
investment income from all sources including the Fund. A Member that could not  
deduct losses currently as a result of the application of Section 163(d) would  
be entitled to carry forward such losses to future years, subject to the same   
limitation. The investment interest limitation would also apply to interest paid
by a noncorporate Member on money borrowed to finance its investment in the     
Fund. Potential investors are advised to consult with their own tax advisors    
with respect to the application of the investment interest limitation in their  
particular tax situations.                                                      

   DEDUCTIBILITY OF FUND INVESTMENT EXPENDITURES AND CERTAIN OTHER
EXPENDITURES. Investment expenses (E.G., investment advisory fees) of an        
individual, trust or estate are deductible only to the extent they exceed 2% of 
adjusted gross income. In addition, the Code further restricts the ability of an
individual with an adjusted gross income in excess of a specified amount (for   
2009, $166,800 or $83,400 for a married person filing a separate return) to     
deduct such investment expenses. Under such provision, there is a limitation on 
the deductibility of investment expenses in excess of 2% of adjusted gross      
income to the extent such excess expenses (along with certain other itemized    
deductions) exceed the lesser of: (i) 3% of the excess of the individual's      
adjusted gross income over the specified amount; or (ii)                        

B-59

P-->N-262nd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 62nd
80% of the amount of certain itemized deductions otherwise allowable for the    
taxable year.(1) Moreover, such investment expenses are miscellaneous itemized  
deductions which are not deductible by a noncorporate taxpayer in calculating   
its alternative minimum tax liability.                                          

        Pursuant to a published ruling recently issued by the Service, these
limitations on deductibility will apply to a noncorporate Member's share of the 
expenses of the Fund and the Master Fund (including the Management Fee, the     
Advisory Fee, the fee paid to the Administrator and any fee payable to a        
Subadviser), to the extent such expenses are allocable to the Fund's or the     
Master Fund's investments in Investment Partnerships or to any other investment 
activity of the Fund or the Master Fund. These limitations will also apply to a 
noncorporate Member's share of the investment expenses of any Investment        
Partnership (including any fee payable to the managers of such Investment       
Partnership and payments made on certain derivative instruments entered into by 
such Investment Partnership), to the extent such Investment Partnership is not  
in a trade or business within the meaning of the Code.                          

      The consequences of these limitations will vary depending upon the
particular tax situation of each taxpayer. Accordingly, noncorporate Members    
should consult their tax advisors with respect to the application of these      
limitations.                                                                    

          Recently enacted legislation extends the period of time over which the
Fund may elect to deduct organizational expenses for tax purposes from a period 
of at least 60 months to a fixed period of 180 months.                          

A Member will not be allowed to deduct syndication expenses 
attributable to the acquisition of an Interest, including placement fees, paid  
by such Member or the Fund. Any such amounts will be included in the Member's   
adjusted tax basis for its Interest.                                            

       APPLICATION OF RULES FOR INCOME AND LOSSES FROM PASSIVE ACTIVITIES.
The Code restricts the deductibility of losses from a "passive activity" against
certain income which is not derived from a passive activity. This restriction   
applies to individuals, personal service corporations and certain closely held  
corporations. Pursuant to Temporary Regulations issued by the Treasury          
Department, income or loss from the Fund's securities investment and trading    
activity generally will not constitute income or loss from a passive activity.  
Therefore, passive losses from other sources generally could not be deducted    
against a Member's share of such income and gain from the Fund. However, income 
or loss attributable to certain activities of the Fund, including lending       
activities or investments in partnerships engaged in certain trades or          
businesses, certain private claims or certain fundings of reorganization plans  
may constitute passive activity income or loss.                                 

     APPLICATION OF BASIS AND "AT RISK" LIMITATIONS ON DEDUCTIONS. The
amount of any loss of the Fund that a Member is entitled to include in its      
income tax return is limited to its adjusted tax basis in its Interest as of the
end of the Fund's taxable year in which such loss occurred. Generally, a        
Member's adjusted tax basis for its Interest is equal to the amount paid for    
such Interest, increased by the sum of: (i) its share of the Fund's liabilities,
as determined for Federal income tax purposes; and (ii) its distributive share  
of the Fund's realized income and gains, and decreased (but not below zero) by  
the sum of: (i) distributions (including decreases in its share of Fund         
liabilities) made by the Fund to such Member; and (ii) such Member's            
distributive share of the Fund's realized losses and expenses.                  

----------                                                                      
(1)  Under recently enacted legislation, the latter limitation on itemized      
    deductions was reduced starting in calendar year 2006, was further reduced
    starting in 2008, and will be completely eliminated in 2010. However, this
legislation contains a "sunset" provision that will result in the     
limitation on itemized deductions being restored in 2011.             

B-60

P-->N-263rd Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 63rd
    Similarly, a Member that is subject to the "at risk" limitations
(generally, non-corporate taxpayers and closely held corporations) may not      
deduct losses of the Fund to the extent that they exceed the amount such Member 
has "at risk" with respect to its Interest at the end of the year. The amount   
that a Member has "at risk" will generally be the same as its adjusted basis as 
described above, except that it will generally not include any amount           
attributable to liabilities of the Fund or any amount borrowed by the Member on 
a non-recourse basis.                                                           

        Losses denied under the basis or "at risk" limitations are suspended
and may be carried forward in subsequent taxable years, subject to these and    
other applicable limitations.                                                   

"PHANTOM INCOME" FROM FUND INVESTMENTS. Pursuant to various 
"anti-deferral" provisions of the Code (the "Subpart F" and "passive foreign    
investment company" provisions), investments (if any) by the Fund in certain    
foreign corporations may cause a Member to: (i) recognize taxable income prior  
to the Fund's receipt of distributable proceeds; (ii) pay an interest charge on 
receipts that are deemed as having been deferred; or (iii) recognize ordinary   
income that, but for the "anti-deferral" provisions, would have been treated as 
long-term or short-term capital gain.                                           

CERTAIN REPORTING OBLIGATIONS.                                                  

       Certain investors that own (directly or indirectly) over 50% of the
capital or profits of the Fund may be required to file Form TD F 90-22.1 (an    
"FBAR") with respect to the Fund's investments in foreign financial accounts,   
which may include non-U.S. investment entities. Failure to file a required FBAR 
may result in civil and criminal penalties. Investors should consult with their 
own advisors as to whether they are obligated to file an FBAR with respect to an
investment in the Fund.                                                         

TAX SHELTER REPORTING REQUIREMENTS 

   The Regulations require the Fund to complete and file Form 8886
("Reportable Transaction Disclosure Statement") with its tax return for any     
taxable year in which the Fund participates in a "reportable transaction."      
Additionally, each Member treated as participating in a reportable transaction  
of the Fund is required to file Form 8886 with its tax return (or, in certain   
cases, within 60 days of the return's due date). If the Service designates a    
transaction as a reportable transaction after the filing of a taxpayer's tax    
return for the year in which the Fund or a Member participated in the           
transaction, the Fund and/or such Member may have to file Form 8886 with respect
to that transaction within 90 days after the Service makes the designation. The 
Fund and any such Member, respectively, must also submit a copy of the completed
form with the Service's Office of Tax Shelter Analysis. The Fund intends to     
notify Members that it believes (based on information available to the Fund) are
required to report a transaction of the Fund or an Investment Partnership, and  
intends to provide such Members with any available information needed to        
complete and submit Form 8886 with respect to the transactions of the Fund and  
the Investment Partnerships. In certain situations, there may also be a         
requirement that a list be maintained of persons participating in such          
reportable transactions, which could be made available to the Service at its    
request.                                                                        

        A Member's recognition of a loss upon its disposition of an interest
in the Fund could also constitute a "reportable transaction" for such Member,   
requiring such Member to file Form 8886.                                        

      A significant penalty is imposed on taxpayers who participate in a
"reportable transaction" and fail to make the required disclosure. The penalty  
is generally $10,000 for natural persons and $50,000 for other persons          
(increased to $100,000 and $200,000, respectively, if the reportable            

B-61

P-->N-264th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 64th
transaction is a "listed" transaction). Investors should consult with their own 
advisors concerning the application of these reporting obligations to their     
specific situations.                                                            

ITEM 24. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS. 

    The Fund will issue a complete set of financial statements on an
annual basis prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting          
principles.                                                                     

B-62

P-->N-265th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 65th
 PART C- OTHER INFORMATION

ITEM 25. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND EXHIBITS 

1.   Financial Statements:                                                      

         As of the filing date of the Registrant's Registration Statement, the
   Registrant has no assets, and accordingly, financial statements have been
omitted.                                                              

2.   Exhibits:                                                                  

(a)  (1) Certificate of Formation, filed herewith.

(2) Limited Liability Company Agreement*

(b)  Not Applicable                               

(c)  Not Applicable                               

(d)  See Item 25(2)(a)(2)                         

(e)  Not Applicable                               

(f)  Not Applicable                               

(g)  Management Agreement*                        

(h)  Not Applicable                               

(i)  Not Applicable                               

(j)  Custodian Services Agreement*                

        (k)  (1) Administration and Accounting Services Agreement*

(2) Servicing Agreement*                

                 (3) Master/Feeder Agreement between Fund and Master Fund*

(l)  Not Applicable                               

(m)  Not Applicable                               

(n)  Not Applicable                               

(o)  Not Applicable                               

(p)  Not Applicable                               

(q)  Not Applicable                               

C-1 

P-->N-266th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 66th
(r)  (1) Code of Ethics*                          

(2) Code of Ethics of Adviser*          

(3) Code of Ethics of Placement Agent*  

*    To be filed by amendment.                                                  

ITEM 26. MARKETING ARRANGEMENTS 

Not Applicable.                                                       

ITEM 27. OTHER EXPENSES OF ISSUANCE AND DISTRIBUTION 

All figures are estimates:                                            

                                                                [Download Table]
                                                                                
Accounting fees and expenses..........................................   $[    ]
Legal fees and expenses...............................................   $[    ]
Printing and offering expenses........................................   $[    ]
Miscellaneous.........................................................   $[    ]
   Total........................................ .....................   $[    ]

ITEM 28. PERSONS CONTROLLED BY OR UNDER COMMON CONTROL 

After completion of the private offering of Interests, the Registrant 
expects that no person will be directly or indirectly under common control with 
the Registrant.                                                                 

ITEM 29. NUMBER OF HOLDERS OF SECURITIES 

As of [________], 2009, the number of record holders of each class of 
securities of the Registrant is shown below:                                    

                                                                [Download Table]

TITLE OF CLASS                        NUMBER OF RECORD HOLDERS
--------------                        ------------------------
                                                              
Limited Liability Company Interests   [  ]                    

ITEM 30. INDEMNIFICATION 

[To be completed by amendment.]                                       

ITEM 31. BUSINESS AND OTHER CONNECTIONS OF INVESTMENT ADVISER 

  Information as to the members and officers of Banc of America Investment
Advisors, Inc., the Master Fund's Investment Adviser, is included in its Form   
ADV as filed with the Commission (File No. 801-26296), and is incorporated      
herein by reference.                                                            

C-2 

P-->N-267th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 67th
ITEM 32. LOCATION OF ACCOUNTS AND RECORDS 

 PNC Global Investment Servicing (U.S.) Inc., maintains certain required
accounting related and financial books and records of the Fund at 103 Bellevue  
Parkway, Wilmington, Delaware 19809. The other required books and records are   
maintained by Banc of America Investment Advisors, Inc., the Master Fund        
Investment Adviser, at 100 Federal Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02110.         

ITEM 33. MANAGEMENT SERVICES 

Not applicable.                                                       

ITEM 34. UNDERTAKINGS 

Not Applicable.                                                       

C-3 

P-->N-268th Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 68th
     Pursuant to the requirements of the 1940 Act, the Fund has duly caused this
Registration Statement to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto 
duly authorized, in the City of Stamford and the State of Connecticut, on the   
18th day of November, 2009.                                                     

                                   GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY
                FUND (TI 2), LLC
                    (Name of Registrant)

                      By: /s/ Steven L. Suss
                                            ------------------------------------
                            Name: Steven L. Suss
                                Title: Authorized Person

P-->N-2Last Page of 69TOC1stPreviousNext↓BottomJust 69th
 EXHIBIT INDEX

                                                                [Download Table]

EXHIBIT NUMBER        DOCUMENT DESCRIPTION        
--------------        ----------------------------
                                                  
(a)(1)                Certificate of Formation    

R-->Dates Referenced Herein   and   Documents Incorporated by Reference
Referenced-On PageThis ‘N-2’ Filing    Date First  Last      Other Filings3/31/1145N-CSR,  NSAR-B,  NT-NCSR3/31/10343NSAR-BFiled on:11/18/091N-8A10/26/0959/30/09126/30/09453/31/09433/31/071412/30/052211/30/05223/2/05222/10/05222/9/05227/12/026 List all Filings 
↑TopFiling Submission 0000950123-09-063923   –   Alternative Formats (Word / Rich Text, HTML, Plain Text, et al.)
Copyright © 2017 Fran Finnegan & Company.  All Rights Reserved.About – Privacy – Redactions – Help —
Fri, 28 Jul 22:40:00.1 GMT 



Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 1) LLC | BOSTON, MA
















LOGIN



Username



Password





Remember me

 Forgot your password? 
 Forgot your username? 


JOIN NOW



Name (not published)



Username



Email



Password












                                                 
                                        










States Choose a State


Choose a State to View



AlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareWashington DCFloridaGeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMarylandMassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevadaNew HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahomaOregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtahVermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming




Cities Most Popular Cities


Most Popular Cities



HoustonBostonDallasSan AntonioAustinStamfordFort WorthHartfordNew HavenBridgeportGreenwichEl PasoArlingtonNorwalkCambridgeDanburyProvidenceWestportWorcesterMilfordFairfieldNew YorkWaterburyPlanoCorpus ChristiWest HartfordNewtonSpringfieldLubbockAmarilloHamdenIrvingWilmingtonWalthamBristolSpringStratfordQuincyWarwickMiddletownFraminghamWallingfordGarlandTylerCranstonRichardsonMeridenSheltonWacoNew Britain







Grosvenor Registered Multi-strategy Fund (ti 1) LlcForeign Limited Liability Company (LLC) You are here:Home»Massachusetts»Boston»Grosvenor Registered Multi-strategy Fund (ti 1) Llc









Contact Information Grosvenor Registered Multi-strategy Fund (ti 1) Llc1 Financial CenterBoston, MA 02111

Other InformationEntity Status: ActiveType of Entity: Foreign Limited Liability Company (llc)Entity Creation Date: Nov 18, 2009Days in Business: 2809 daysCompany DescriptionGrosvenor Registered Multi-strategy Fund (ti 1) Llc is located in Boston, Massachusetts and is listed as an active Foreign Limited Liability Company (llc). Grosvenor Registered Multi-strategy Fund (ti 1) Llc was started on Nov 18, 2009 which was 2809 days ago.Registered AgentNational Corporate Research, Ltd.10 Milk St., Ste 1055Boston, MA 02108









 Edit ProfileEdited: 12/1/2011To edit this profile, please click here. You will be able to add a custom description, social networks, website, phone number, and many more features to your ISHCC.org profile. Reviews0 ReviewsTo add a review, please click here (you must be logged in to add a review).Add Review and Rating





Your ReviewRating: 





Your review hereYou must be logged in to add a review for company 163529. If you do not have an account, create an account by clicking here.
 


SOCIAL

Twitter
Facebook
Linked In
Follow us on Google+



COMMUNITY

About Us
Contact Us
Privacy Policy



CATEGORIES

Eating Places
Legal Services
Business Services
Beauty Shops
Real Estate
Construction



Copyright © ISHCC.org. All rights reserved.





















 SECGems: GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC 







































  







			Data feeds now available
			Excel / CSV / Java / Python /etc 
Database
Learn more









  




  


  






























 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC 
		     










 Info




 Ownership




 Filings














←


 1 


 2 


→



 Ownership filings:    (1 of 20 - Total: 22)








Filing date
2017-06-21
Submission
 0001647922-17-000004.nc

Form
4  Ownership: Statement of changes in beneficial ownership. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Okeke Maria Elizabeth
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Assistant Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2017-06-21
Submission
 0001709912-17-000003.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  Nome

Reporting Owner
 Schmid John Anthony
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Assistant Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2016-09-15
Submission
 0001647832-16-000011.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 SULLIVAN KATHLEEN PATRICIA
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       CFO and Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2016-08-29
Submission
 0001647832-16-000007.nc

Form
4  Ownership: Statement of changes in beneficial ownership. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Weber Zack David
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Chief Financial Officer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2015-07-13
Submission
 0001475456-15-000001.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Sullivan Michael Mizushima
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       CCO, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2015-07-13
Submission
 0001475456-15-000002.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Okeke Maria Elizabeth
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Assistant Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2015-07-10
Submission
 0001212030-15-000004.nc

Form
4  Ownership: Statement of changes in beneficial ownership. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Misner Stephen W
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Assistant Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2014-06-20
Submission
 0001509654-14-000003.nc

Form
4  Ownership: Statement of changes in beneficial ownership. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Crotteau Jodie
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Vice President and CCO, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2012-06-25
Submission
 0001552989-12-000003.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Misner Stephen W
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Assistant Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2011-12-14
Submission
 0001515601-11-000003.nc

Form
4  Ownership: Statement of changes in beneficial ownership. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Knight Timothy Andrew
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Assistant Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2011-04-05
Submission
 0001509654-11-000009.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Crotteau Jodie
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       CCO and Vice President, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2011-04-05
Submission
 0001509654-11-000013.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Lederman Scott Jay
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       CEO and President, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2011-04-05
Submission
 0001509654-11-000017.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Kashyap Girish Suresh
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       CLO, VP and Secretary, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2011-04-05
Submission
 0001509654-11-000021.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Knight Timothy Andrew
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Assistant Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2011-04-05
Submission
 0001509654-11-000025.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Weber Zack David
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       CFO and Treasurer, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2011-03-30
Submission
 0001509654-11-000005.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Bienen Henry S
[
				      
				        Director,  
				      
				      
				      
				      
				      ]

 Gallagher Brian P
[
				      
				        Director,  
				      
				      
				      
				      
				      ]

 Raskin Victor J
[
				      
				        Director,  
				      
				      
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own













Filing date
2010-05-19
Submission
 0000902664-10-002783.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Suss Steven Lawrence
[
				      
				      
				        Officer, 
				       Chief Executive Officer & CFO, 
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own

Non-Derriv. holdingLimited Liability Company Interests0D












Filing date
2010-01-22
Submission
 0000902664-10-000137.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 BROTT ALAN
[
				      
				        Director,  
				      
				      
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own

Non-Derriv. holdingLimited Liability Company Interests0D












Filing date
2010-01-22
Submission
 0000902664-10-000138.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 HOVER JOHN C II
[
				      
				        Director,  
				      
				      
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own

Non-Derriv. holdingLimited Liability Company Interests0D












Filing date
2010-01-22
Submission
 0000902664-10-000139.nc

Form
3  Ownership: Initial statement of beneficial ownership of securities. Insider trading ( Directors, Officers, Significant Shareholders )
Issuer
 GROSVENOR REGISTERED MULTI-STRATEGY FUND (TI 2), LLC  

Reporting Owner
 Imbimbo Victor
[
				      
				        Director,  
				      
				      
				      
				      
				      ]







Type
Title
Conv/Exer price
Trans. date
Deemed Exe date
Trans Form Type
Trans Code
Eqty swap?
Footnote id
Trans timelines
# Shares
Value
Total Value
Price / share
Acq or Disp
Date exercisable
Expiration date
# Owned post trans
Value Owned post trans
Underlying security title
# Underlying securities
Value underlying securities
Direct or Indirect own
Nature indirect own

Non-Derriv. holdingLimited Liability Company Interests0D









←


 1 


 2 


→


 







db
 
 








































